celeb comments 'فقط گلدوووونه', 'عهههه چسب مایع خارجیا رو ببین تروخدا.. ما کجاییم اینا کجان', ' mozhde vz', ' mhdse hshmndi ', ' jrns s maryamaskari', ' nafas.n.o', 'خیلی خوب بود', ' mohadese.naji', ' negin.nr ', 'کاکتوس خیلی جالب بود', 'سنگاشونم خوبه ', ' fazollah خیلی جالب بود مرسی ', ' atta.sarmast', 'چسب ما باشه ده تا بریزیم توش درست نمیشه', ' masumeh omidvar', ' jilahonary', 'واقعا عالی ', 'والا هنوز تهرانم...انشالله در اولین فرصت سفر به نو میگم', ' ', ' ehsanrostami official شما میتونید ادم ها و یا هرچیزی که مربوط به اون ها میشه رو درست نقد کنید تا باعث پیشرفت بشید اما اصولا مسخره کردن ادم ها توش نقدی نیست و جنبه تخریب داره... من به شما جسارت خواصی در کامنت اولم نکردم فقط عین خودتون با خودتون برخورد کردم و شما ناراحت شدید... هزچه را برای خود میپسندی برای دیگران هم بپسند', 'پذیراییشون خوب نبود.یه گوشه از نمایشگاه پر از زباله بود.درکل بهتره از تولید ملی حمایت کنیم بهتره', 'سپاس از دیجی کالا واقعا این قسمت عالی بود احساس کردم واقعا با این مستند در حال هوای نو قرار گرفتم مجری برنامه هم خیلی خوب کار کرد من خودم خیلی خودرو پرنده رو دوست داشتم که در برنامه هم با یکی از مدیرانش مصاحبه کردین', 'مزخرف', 'سلام وقت بخ ر nبه نظر بنده ن ته مثبت و جالبه توجه nنما شگاه نو ا نه ه همون طور ه خودتون م دون د همه شر ت ها nخودرو چه شناخته شده و چه ناشناس n ه تازه پا به عرصه گذاشتن م تونن nتوانا ها و محصولاتشون رو به نما ش nبزارن و ا ن ه م دان عظ م برا رقابت nا جاد م نه به ا ن صورت ه مپان ها nسع م نن برا سب رضا ت و بازار فروش بهتر و وس ع تر ماش ن ها ارزون تر با ف ت ب شتر و حد ا ثر ام انات nعرضه نن ه ا ن واقعا عال ه nالبته مپان ها شناخته شده و nمعروف مثل لامبو بوگات ون گ ز گ بنز و ب او و و...... ب شتر ن رقابت رو در مدل ها مختلف و هم نطور لاس ها مختلف دارن. nاز ا ن ه ا ن فرصت رو به بنده داد ن n ه نظرات خودمو ب ان نم واقعا nمتش رم.', ' aliazad بنظر من مجری انگلیسیش خوب بود', 'عالی منتظر سایر ویدیو هاتون هستیم', ' ehsanrostami official مجری انگلیسیش خیلی خوب بود و نقدر توانایی مصاحبه بالایی داشت که با بزرگترین مدیران صنعت خودرو جهان فقط در این مستند مصاحبه کرده بود فکر کنم فقط با هشت نفر از بزرگترین مدیران صنعت خودرو جهان مصاحبه کرده که واقعا قابل ستایش هست', 'دیجی کالا دمت گرم دیجی کالا گل کاشتی مثل این برنامه رو تا حالا هیچ کسی در ایران نساخته موندم چطوری با مدیر مهندسی بوگاتی مصاحبه کردین نمایشگاه عالی بود عالی مخصوصا من با بوگاتی جدید خیلی حال کردم دم مجری برنامتون هم گرم فکر کنم اولین ایرانی بوده که با مدیر بوگاتی مصاحبه کرده', 'من عاشق بی ام و هستم و قسمتی که به بی ام و ام هشت پرداختین رو خیلی دوست داشتم از طرفی مصاحبه مجری برنامتون با مدیر بی ام و رو هم دوست داشتم جالب بود بی ام و میگه ما نمایندگی در ایران نداریم اما پرشیا خودرو با نام بی ام و محصول می فروشه در پایان کمال تشکر را از سازندگان رینگ اسپرت مخصوصا کارشناس توانای برنامه رینگ اسپرت دارم', 'یکی از بهترین بخش های مستند رینگ اسپرت بخشی بود که درباره خودرو سال صحبت شد و درباره روش انتخاب اون توضیح داده شد جالب بود که هر کشوری به محصول خودش رای می داد و برام جالب بود ولوو خودرو سال شد مصاحبه خوبی هم مجری کار درست برنامه با مدیر عامل ولوو انجام داد و ولوو درباره حضورش در ایران توضیح داد', 'واقعا ممنون از برنامه رینگ اسپرت که در این چند قسمت که پخش شد برای مخاطب از زاویه های مختلف صنعت خودرو برنامه ساخت اون هم با کیفیت و مهم تر از همه منصفانه. در مستند نمایشگاه خودرو تهران کاملا متوجه شدم که رینگ اسپرت مثل دیگر برنامه های معرفی خودرو در ایران پول نمی گیره که تعریف و تمجید کنه و این یعنی منه مخاطب باید قدردان این برنامه باشم و حمایتش کنم تا ادامه پیدا کنه. درباره نو هم فقط خوش به حال کسانی که می تونن ماشین هایی در این سطح رو سوار شن و لذتش رو ببرن. تو ایران که خودروسازها بی کیفت ها رو می سازن و می فروشن. یا وارد کننده ها ماشین هایی رو که پشنش برای بازار ایران کم شده وارد می کنن.', 'عین ایرانه فرقی نداره ', 'ماشین چه اخمی کرده ', 'ب ام و ام بهتر ن بخشش بود', 'اون تیکه که درباره مرسدس بود خیلی قشنگ بود البته من از مصاحبه مجری رینگ اسپرت با مس ول فراری هم حال کردم ولی فقط مرسدس چه رخی داره', 'متاسفانه امسال هم ماشین ها نتونستن استانداردهای جهانی سایپا رو پاس کنن...', 'یکی از معتبرترین و بهترین نمایشگاها', ' ', 'سپاس فراوان نوروزتان پیروز', ' mohsen shirazz kamalsajedi hasan.goodarzi farshad . ', 'نوروز تان فرخنده باد ', 'خوبه', 'خوبه اینا پیرمرد و پیرزن بودن وگرنه حوزه علمیه قم فردا تعطیل میکردن و تظاهرات ', 'با اجازه کپی ', ' ', 'سال نو مبارک', 'کد تخفیف هزار تومانی برای خرید بالای هزار تومان فقط تا امشب فعال است', 'dg noroz', ' فرا رسیدن نوروز جمشیدی n و غاز سال خورشیدی بر شما فرخنده باد... امید است سال نو پر از شادی پیروزی و برکت برای شما و خانواده محترم باشد.', 'سال نو مبارک', ' mir.parham collage sogolataeee', 'بخدا شما همه عکسارو نمیبینید ...', ' collage ax male toe ', ' ', ' hossein . ', 'اشتباه شما اینه که بین کسایی که عکس گرفتن قرعه u cکشی نمیکنید و فقط عکس هایی که حرفه ای و چیزی که شما میخواید باشه قرعه کشی میکنید. این اشتباهه همه که عکاس نیستن شما باید بین تمام کسانی که شرکت کردن و عکسشون مرتبط بود قرعه کشی کنید. نه بین چهار تا عکاس که چندین ساله کارشونه ', ' digikalamag', ' ', ' princessofmars ', ' lightningk ', ' shabka ', 'این ماشین در روستای ما بود تا چند سال پیش خیلی زیباشت', ' تومن کارت تخفیف لابد میگه باید تومن خرید کنی تا بتونی ازش استفاده کرد دیجیکالا شیکمش سیر شده مخاطباشو داره میپرونه', ' digikalamag نمیخواید برنده های موضوع قبلی که الگوهای تکرارشونده بود رو اعلام کنید', ' somayeh ', ' eli.trainer', ' rrain ', ' mohammadi ', 'دوستان اگه بادقت بخونید نوشته زیر عکستون منشن کنید نه اینجا ', ' meysam kamasayi', ' ', ' near.sky amirhosseinardekani farshad amiri ', ' pedram.mavaee ', ' rezaghelich ', ' ', 'تلفظ نو رو بگین تا یه سری مثل لوور دچار مشکل نشن ', ' miss.strange فوق العادس ', 'من متوجه نشدم ینی چی مگه با چشم غیرمسلح نمیشه همینطوری دید شفق قطبی رو ', ' amiraliafsharjam', 'فوق العاده زیباست', ' parya. ', ' parya. ', 'چرا در عرض های جغرافیایی بالا یا پایین قابل مشاهدش کسی میدونه', ' abbas gh چون نور خورشید با زاویه تقریبا موازی با زمین عبور میکنه', 'واقعا زیباست ', 'زیباس', 'خیلی زیباست', 'چقدر قشنگه', 'پست های خوبی دارید', 'very beautiful', ' zeynab.eb نگا چقد خوبه ', 'بی نظیره', ' sara haghiighi', ' mohmmd matory are kheili', ' alizade میشه', 'چه زیباست واقعا ', ' ', 'به به بسیار عالی ....ان شا الله خدا به کسبتون برکت بده و توفیق انجام کار های خیر فراوان پیدا کنین ', 'Dametun garm ', 'دمتون گرم', 'کاش شما بجای دولت و حکومت کشورو اداره میکردید', 'درود به غیرتتان...', ' ', 'عالی بود', 'ایول دارین ', 'یه تماسی هم با حسن روحانی می گرفتید هزینه پیامکاش رو میداد کانکس', 'درود به شرفتون و احسنت به انسانیتتون افتخار میکنم به اینکه مشتری شما هستم . ', 'درود بر همتون. جامعه ما ب همچ ن ادما ن از داره ', 'خدا اجرتون بده زحمت کشیدید ', 'حتی اگه ذره ایی هم کمک کنین فرین داره و ننگ بر مسولین بی تدبیر که با در مدهای میلیاردی از خاک این مملکت هیچ غلطی نمیکنن جز نمک زدن به زخم ملت', 'Kheyli harekate ghashangie vali gereftane in tasavir va be namayesh gozashtanesh manie in karo avaz mikone ', 'Afarin be sharafetoun', 'کارتون ارزشمند بود خدا قبول کنه', ' ', 'بهترین کار رو کردین', 'عالی بود لایک داره ', 'واقعا اووووف', 'استثناییه', 'پشماااااااام', 'بی نظیر', 'Yeeeeh baby', 'در یک حالت ', ' rezar ', 'عالیه', 'محشرر', 'Miracle', 'بهترین بازی سونی', 'WOW', 'perfect', 'فوق العاده', 'عالی u cترین', 'ووووو', ' این همه گرافیک یه جا ', ' a.m.pavandi', ' amoomamzi ', 'bekhatere in ps migirm ', 'عالی بود به پیج ما هم سر بزنید مهندس وب موزش کسب و کار اینترنتی موزش کسب در مد از اینترنت ا', 'من ا نو مفتم نم گ رم چه برسه بخوام بابتش ه قرون بدم ', 'ینی سهم اپل از خود یفون ارزون تره ', 'کاش ارسال رایگان بالای تومن رو دم عیدی فعال میکردید', 'فقط اونی که خریده', 'خدایا به اونا عقل بده به ما پول', 'یعنی مشه با هزار دلار سهم شرکت u c اپل خرید U f ', ' iclarified', ' سهم شرکت اپل یعنی چی ', 'دیوانه به تمام معنا بوده هرکی اینو خریده .... به قول خودت میرفت سهام اپل رو میخرید.', 'خاک تو سر هر کی که خریده خدا پول رو به کی میده ', 'لایک داره لطفا فالو کنی', 'من کپی اینو هزار دلار میخرم ', 'خدا شفاش بده', 'بعضی چیزا ارزشش بالاتره و صد در صد اونی که اینو خریده هزار برابر اون تعداد گوشی پول داره و نیازی نداره به اونا', ' mohammad vf موافقم', 'هر دوم ارزش خاص خودشو داره', ' a.nwrzpr سهام داداچ سهام بازار بورس ', ' جاهلیت مدرن', 'اولین فرم استخدام ', 'دوستان کسی هست بلد باشه چطور صدای گزارشگر رو عوض کنیم اگه کسی میدونه لطفا بگه . سپاس فراوان .', ' m h. .r n مرسی استاد', ' radin aghazade تو چ م خوا گل من ', ' pouriya tch sm.hamed mi rf.ahanchian', ' digikalamag نظرات رو بخونین طرفدارای پس کم نیستن برا اونم مسابقه بزارین', ' hadi yari. ', 'سلام خسته نباشید و وقتتون بخیر. سال نو هم پیشاپیش مبارک. فقط یک سوالی ک پیش میاد اینه ک از کجا میشه فهمید کلیپ ارسالی متعلق به خود شخص هست یا از هزاران گل و کلیپی ک در فضای مجازی موجود هستش. بهتره ذکر کنید از روی صفحه نمایش فیلم گرفته بشه و همزمان گزارش کنن. متشکر موفق باشید', 'یا حالا یکی fifa نداره pes داره چیکار کنه ', 'این فیفا چنده ', 'Pes چی پس ', 'عالللللی', ' ', ' alireza.n fifa ', ' vitalstyle.ir', 'خیلی بازی چرتیه هنوز من نتونستم درست توپو بگیرم وقتی دست حریفه اصلا هوش ندارن بازیکناش وقتی هم توپ رو هواست بازیکن بجای اینکه بطرف توپ مثل میخ سرجاش میمونه هر کاری هم میکنم تکون نمیخوره ... من روی پی اس فور دارم شاید پی سیش خوب باشه', ' sobhanfarajvan', ' ', ' pouya kawa', ' hadi m بونمنه دی ', ' pouya kawa اورنا فیلم یولا', ' ', 'دیجی کالا دیگه قابل اطمینان نیست هیچ بسته ای را به موقع نمیاره اگرم بیاره یه چیزه دیگه قالب میکنه....همین امروز باید چیزی برام می اورد ولی متاسفانه میگه سرمون شلوغه......وقتی یکی یه تاریخ و زمان را مشخص میکنه برای تحویل همون زمان فقط میتونه تحویل بگیره چرا ادمو مسخره ی خودشون میکنن......دیگه به هیچ عنوان از دیجی کالا چیزی نمیگیرمdkc- ....... ', 'تخفیفاتونو نگه دارید برا خودتون.لطفا مرسوله را به موقع ارسال کنید نه چند روز بعد شاید یکی بخواد کادو بده دیر بشه دیگه لطفی نداره dkc- ', ' ', ' ', 'Love It ', 'بسیار عالی', 'لایک ', 'بااجازه بزرگترا لایک', 'از ما هم د دن ن د ', 'چرا گوشی ها ارسال نمیشه', 'فاتحه شرکتتون رو خوندم رفت nدوماه هست من رو میپیچونین خرین بارم اپراتور گوشی رو قطع کرد nمتاسفام براتون شکایت رسمی میکنم', 'فروش انواع لوازم الکترونیکی و جانبی با قیمت پخش در ایران و ضمانت اصالت کالا همراه با مهلت تست هفته ای ارسال سریع در تهران و پست پیشتاز در شهرستان nدارای نماد اعتماد الکترونیکی nضمانت بازگشت وجه nهفت روز مهلت تست n .ir sinakala n sinakalaofficial', ' camp ', ' ', ' بسیار عاااالی', 'لطفا دایرکت چک کنید', ' ', ' erf kn', ' armaghan.ro', ' raana.hosseini fattane foroogh.abbasi ', ' hadisbahrami.hb negartahmasebipv yas.t mehrnoosh kianii k.i.a.n.i ', 'عاشقتم که ', ' miss.hale.az', 'بیشترین مار تگ کردنو داریا ', ' ', 'پیجتون عالیه ', 'اپ موبایلتون مشکل داره نمیشه درست صفحه تخفیفات را دید', 'وسایل ورزشی هم بزارید . مثل دمبل های قابل تنظیم', ' ', ' ', ' یا می u cدانستید ', ' ', 'کسی میدونی دیجی کالا تخفیفای خوبشو برای PS معمولا چه موقع هایی میذاره ', 'کسی میدونی دیجی کالا تخفیفای خوبشو برای PS معمولا چه موقع هایی میذاره ', 'دیجی جانه من PS slim G رو فقط تومن ارزون تر کن من بتونم بگیرم ', 'دیجی جانه من PS slim G رو فقط تومن ارزون تر کن من بتونم بگیرم ', 'من چطور م تونم موقع خر د از د ج بن م استفاده نم همش م مونه باطل م شه', 'ندیدم اینارو اطلاع رسانی این پیح چقدر ضعیفه', 'از دیجی استایل به هیچ عنوان خرید نکنید من یک لباس رو تغییر سایز دادم برداشتن یه لباس دیگه برا اوردن قبول هم نمیکنند که مغایرت داره', 'از دیجی استایل به هیچ عنوان خرید نکنید من یک لباس رو تغییر سایز دادم برداشتن یه لباس دیگه برا اوردن قبول هم نمیکنند که مغایرت داره', ' یا می u cدانستید ', ' ', ' ', 'لطفا به پیج ما سر بزنید', 'درخشان تر از اکنون باشید n انس دیجیتال مارکتینگ پراک nسایت ما uprock.net nتلگرام uprock n انس دیجیتال مارتنیگ nما را دنبال کنید ', ' ', ' ', 'لایک پست خوبی بو', ' ', ' ', 'خیلی زیبا', ' buybitcoin ', 'کدهای تخفیف باحال دیجی کالا و دیجی استایل و سفارش غذا و.... در کانال تلگرام کدبن واقعی لینک در بیو', ' ', ' کد تخفیف دیجیکالا هزار تومان تخفیف بر روی سبد های خرید بالای چهارصد هزار تومانی مخصوص اپلیکیشن nAPP n کد تخفیف های بیشتر در کانال تلگرام.لینک در بیو', ' ', 'فروشگاه لوازم جانبی ریا t.me mobilesaeedaria', ' ', 'سلام ایفون اس ای رو موجود کنید لطفا', 'دیجی کالا مدتی است کیفیت و مشتری مداری را فدای در مد کرده و بعضا اجناس بی کیفیت و گران تر از بازار و بدون مس ولیت پذیری می فروشد با تجربه چند بار اخیر ثابت شده است', 'دیجی کالا مدتی است کیفیت و مشتری مداری را فدای در مد کرده و بعضا اجناس بی کیفیت و گران تر از بازار و بدون مس ولیت پذیری می فروشد با تجربه چند بار اخیر ثابت شده است', ' ', 'کد تخفیف دیجیکالا میخوای لینک کانالم تو بیو هس', ' ', ' ف روش وی ه ی ف رش ک اش ان nکی فی ت درج ه یک nزی ر قیم ت ب ازار nبا ه ر خ رید ه دیه از م ا دری افت ک نید', ' ', ' ادکلن اورجینال میخوای با قیمت مناسب ', ' ف روش وی ه ی ف رش ک اش ان nکی فی ت درج ه یک nزی ر قیم ت ب ازار nبا ه ر خ رید ه دیه از م ا دری افت ک نید', 'تخفیف هاتون بخصوص شگفت انگیزها خیلی مسخره شده من خودم از طرفدارهای شما بودم ولی جدیدا هرچی میخرم حتی تو شگفت انگیز دو روز بعد میام میبینم ارزونتر شده U f d خه این چه مسخره بازی ای شده این که نشد شگفت انگیز یکسالی میشه که اینطوری شدین و هر روز هم دارین بدتر میکنید واقعا از فروشگاه های دیگه خرید میکنم اعصابم راحت تره', ' ', ' ', ' بیگ لایک ', ' atre safir', 'قیمتو اینجا بررسی کنین ', 'چطور ممبر تلگرامی خودمون رو افزایش بدیم بیا پیج جوابش رو بگم بهت', ' ', 'عالی ', 'عالی ', 'کد تخفیف دیجیکالا در کانال دیجی بن t.me digikalabom', 'پست خوبی بود', ' myfoad', ' mufoad.ir', ' itceee.ir', ' myfoad.ir', ' myfoad', ' arefeh majbouri', ' myfoad.job', 'کدهای تخفیف باحال دیجی کالا و دیجی استایل و سفارش غذا و.... در کانال تلگرام کدبن واقعی لینک در بیو', ' بیگ لایک ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'لایک پست خوبی بو', ' تنها کانالی که ما بهتون nتوصیه میکنیم. جهیزیه ارزان وسایل شیک اورجینال ارسال رایگان فروش اقساطی تخفیف مگه میشه n n digikalaco org', 'عالی ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'عالی', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Khobe', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'عالی بود لایک داره ', ' ', 'گروه فناوری رایان با ما همراه باشید', ' ', 'صفحه قشنگی دارید خوشحال میشم از هند ایرانی در صفحه ما دیدن فرمایید', ' ', ' ', 'عالی ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'چه جالب ', ' ', 'Khobe', ' ', ' ', 'طراحی پست های شما با فالومکس ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'با لباس ز رها ما ب ش از پ ش همچون ستاره نزد همسران خود بدرخش د ', 'الان د گه نم شه خر د ', 'گروه فناوری رایان با ما همراه باشید', ' ', ' ', 'پست های خوبی دارید', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'چه جالب ', ' ', 'چه جالب ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' sor ushghazi in page ro migoftam ke offer dare', 'پیشنهادات مثل همیشه قوی ', 'این کفپوش ماشین سه بعدی برای چه ماشینی مناسبه ', 'راکت بدمینتون چه مارکیه ', 'تو سایتش زده بوده شده ... اینجا زده بوده شده ... ', 'لایک ', 'این کفپوش برای چه ماشینی مناسبه ', ' mtjop.ir', ' ronakghazii merc nadideboodam tahala ', ' masoud abbasi ', 'عالی', 'برای چه ماشینی هستش این کف پوش ', 'نایس', 'ا نووو بزار ن دوباره لطفااا', ' payamsalimy cm haro bekhun taze sadaf ham gozashte', ' imanihasti alan ke zade', 'برس پا ساز الان موجود هس و هنوز تو تخف ف ', ' sabaghas', ' ', 'پست های خوبی دارید', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'سلام خسته نباشید درحال حاضر موجود دارید وقیمت لطفا ', ' بسیار عاااالی', ' ', ' ', 'لایک', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'پست های خوبی دارید', 'عالی', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'خیلی زیبا', ' چه قدر زیبا ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' روشی جدید برای جذب ممبر واقعی تلگرام بیا تا از رقبا عقب نموندی ', 'lidiiiiin ke', 'مت سفانه تو روزای پرترافیک همیشه همینجوره نه اپ باز میشه نه سایت', 'متاسفم سرورها ضعیفه جواب نمیده باز نمیشه', 'استوری من رو ببینید جنس های مازون رو گذاشتم که تخفیف خورده اونوقت با دیجیکالا مقایسه کنید', 'چه زیبا ', 'واردکننده مستقیم محصولات استوک دیجیتال dast kala', 'پیشنهادها اصلا حالب نبودن اخه دستمال و جا کلیدی تومنی چیه میزارید تو پیشنهاد وی ه ', ' ', 'از ا نجا بخر', 'لطفا گوشی sony xperia xa plus رو موجود کنید.', 'برین گمشید بابا من جمعه خرید کردم هنوز هیشکی جواب نمیده بهم', 'عالی ', ' ', 'لایک ', 'خیلی عالی بود لطفا پیج منم دیدن کنی', 'لایک ', 'Az page maham ddan konid ', ' ', 'پست های خوبی دارید', 'چه جالب ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'لایک ', 'یلدای شگفت انگیز ', 'جووون یلدا نزدیکه', 'دوباره چه کلکی دارین ', 'پارسال که یلدا افتضاح بود ببینیم امسال چبکار میکنید', ' goodchico.ali اخ یادته یلداااااا شگفت انگیزش شروع میشد با سرعت نور خرید میکردی میزد تمام شد', 'بلک فرایدی', ' amir.tbd اونش به کنار خداییش چه جنسای به درد نخوریو میزاشتن برای تخفیف و اصلا تخفیفشون هم واقعی نبود', 'اوخی', ' doroshkechicom', 'دوباره رنک سایتشون اومده پایین ', ' nacmsh peyvand nikjoonazanin samaneh raeyati', 'باسلام ارشناس لوازم خانگ د ج الا و هستم ق متامون ز ر ق مت بازار هست برا اطلاع ب شتر پ ج ما رو فالو ن د digikalaco org', ' ', 'فروش لاکچری ترین برندهای پوشاک و اکسسری از میلان ', ' mahanshah ', 'عالی ', 'پست های خوبی دارید', 'لایک پست خوبی بو', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ادکلن اورجینال فرانسوی قیمت مناسب ', ' ', ' ببین ادکلن اورجینال کی تخفیف میخوره ', ' ', 'خر د با د از چه طرق انجام بد ن', 'چجور با د سفارش داد', 'ببخشید میشه بگین سفارش از چه طریقی هست وهزینه ای بابت سفارش میگیرین', 'لایک ', ' navid rostamnezhad', ' melod اپلیکیشن و یا سایت دیجی کالا برای شهرستان هشت هزارتومن هزینه پست داره و بعد از دو روز کاری میرسه. تهران فکرمیکنم دوساعت بعدش', ' melod درسش رو برام م فرست ن لطفا', 'اگه دوست داشتید تزیینات و تم u cهای متفاوت جشن رو توی صفحه ما ببینید.', 'سالی خوش همراه با سلامتی و خردمندی برای تمام هموطنانم در جای جای این کره خاکی رزومندم ', 'استاد نیری بزرگوار ه پی نوروز ', 'به امید نیک اندیشی و نو اندیشی', ' قای نیری سال خوبی واستون رزو میکنم همراه با پیشرفت بیش از پیش', 'Happy nowrouz Ali jan ', ' اگر چه یادمان می رود nکه عشق تنها دلیل زندگی است nاما خدا را شکر nکه نوروز هر سال این nفکر را به یادمان می ورد n nپس نوروزتان مبارک nکه سالتان را سرشار از عشق کند ', 'این عید باستانی بر شما هم مبارک باشد استاد . امیدوارم روز نو همراه با افکار نو و باورهای نو برای همه ایرانیان باشد', 'نوروزتان خجسته باد ', 'پ روز وپا نده باش د', 'سال نو رو به شما تبریک می گم...امیدوارم سال خوبی پیشرو داشته باشید چه در عرصه علم و چه در عرصه زندگی روزمره....خیلی دوستتون دارم .. ....', 'سال نو شما هم مبارک دوست گرامی با رزوی سلامتی و شادی در کنارخانواده', 'بازهم خورشید به اعتدال مد nشروعی دوباره برای گونه ای شگفت انگیز بر مده از دل طبیعت غاز می گردد. n nسالی پر از دانش و گاهی زندگی در جامعه ای عاری از خرافات و تاریکی برای همه رزو می کنم.', 'سال نوتون مبارک استاد عزیزم', 'سال نو مبارک دکتر نیری عزیز ', 'نوروز مبارک استاد عزیز ما ', 'و نیز رزوی حقیقت بجای توهم', 'سال نوی شما مبارک استاد', 'بر چهره u cی گل نسیم نوروز خوش است nبر طرف چمن روی دل u cافروز خوش است nاز دی که گذشت هرچه گویی خوش نیست nخوش باش و ز دی مگو که امروز خوش است nخیام.......... دکتر جان نوروز بر شما مبارک', 'سال نو شما مبارک', 'باعرض درود و تبریک سال نو ...', ' cinemanostalgia ashkanash', ' ', ' ', 'درود بر شما و دکتر کامران وفا یاد دکتر هاوکینگ هم گرامی', ' ', 'نه نم شه.نم شه چون از روز من شن دم تا به امروز از فرط گر ه وغذانخوردن راه ب مارستان شدم تا ا ن ساعت ه برگشتم.', 'درود ب شما ...ویاد پرفسور هاوکینگ گرامی باد', 'خبرمرگش واقعا برام ناراحت کننده بود.یادش گرامی راهش پررهرو.', ' ', 'Yadesh gerami ', 'درودها به شما جناب دکتر نیری عزیز یاد بزرگ مرد فیزیک هم گرامی باد', 'صفحه ی مهبانگی که معرفی کردین به نظر غیر مرتبط میاد با مسا ل تیم مهبانگ', ' astronomie wien ashkanrad astronomie iran sara.merati m.khoda khabe.a', 'ای جان..چه حس خوبی داشت..یادش گرامی و جاوید', 'مرسی دکتر نیری عزیز ازاین پست خوب', 'قشنگ معلوم که از غذاهای ایرانی لذت برده بود ', ' shahla.izadi me ', 'یادش گرامی و در دلهایمان جاویدان خواهد ماند', 'حیف حیف هزاررران افسوووس که انسانهای مفید زود از بین ما میرن ...', ' shakarami.z ', ' pourhadi behrouz', 'دکتر نیری و کامران عزیز از پیشگامان کشورمون در زمینه ریسمان و فیزیک کوانتوم هستن بینهایت بزرگ و دوستداشتنی هستن رزوی گاهی و نگرش علمی برای عموم دارم', 'سپاس از زحماتتون دکترجان ', 'به امید ازادیه ایران و رنسانس و میلیتاریسم ایران زمین ... بازگشت شما دانشمندان ایران زمینمان را به میهن ارزومندم....نواده خسرو پرویز نتاج قباد دوم', ' ', ' ', 'برقرار باش د تر جان', 'به وقت اروپا میشه ساعت چند ', 'waheedazadd فکر کنم بوقت اروپای غربی و شمالی ساعت شب باشد', 'زنده باشید جناب دکتر نازنین ', 'بسیار عالی و موزنده می u cتونه باشه ', 'دکتر جان موفق و پیروز باشید البته پدر عزیزتان هم همین طور', 'همه شما افتخار ایران عزیز هستید.... به امید درخشش بیشتر شما', 'https www.instagram.com p BgZWcH hBf ', 'یه سر به این ادرس بزنید واقعا حالم گرفته شد دیدمش', ' ali.nayeri جناب نیری ممنون میشم درباره کانالتون درخواستی داشتم.دایرکت چک کنید ', 'درود بر جناب دکتر نیری و دکتر کامران وفای گل امیدواریم که با وجود شما عزیزان شاهد پیشرفت روزافزون علم و گاهی در کشور عزیزمان باشیم ', 'ای کاش میشد با گذاشتن وویس در کانال تلگرامیتون سوالهای علمیمون رو از این بزرگوار بپرسیم', 'درود بر دکتر نیری.... دکتر اگه زحمت بکشین تعریف خلا و خلا کوانتومی رو به من بگ د ممنون م شم. مرس ', ' davoud.shiravi تازه فهمیدم شقایق با گوزن...ربط دارد در بلاد مسلمین. من اطلاعات دقیقی از ستاره شناسی و مسایل تقویم ندارم که با شما در این مورد بحث کنم. اما نکته ی اصلی رو فراموش نکنیم گردش سال و خورشید چه ربطی به صحبت من داشت عرض کردم که چیزی به اسم سمان وجود نداره و این فقط یه برداشت سطحی هست که از اشتباهات گذشتگان به باور ما تزریق شده. زمین کروی هست نه تخت و چیزی بالای سر ما قرار نگرفته که پلکانی باشه فکر نکنم لازم باشه براتون توضیح بدم این مسایل بدیهی رو.از حوصله من خارجه که بخوام مفاهیم و مسایل بدیهی و ابتدایی رو بازگو کنم', 'استیون هاوکینگ یک بدن بود باحداقل توان ممکن و یک مغز باحداکثر توان ممکن بااندیشه ای بدون مرز.که انعکاس چیزی کمتر از کل جهان هستی راضیش نکرد.ونشان داد اندیشه برای بزرگ بودن محتاج هیچ چیز نیست.', ' a nayyeri ایشون به روح و این اراجیف اعتقادی نداشتن و یک تییست بودن خداناباور بودن ', ' samira fataliایشون به روح و این اراجیف اعتقادی نداشتن و یک تییست بودن خداناباور بودن ', ' arashfarzin بنده مسلمان نیستم', ' arashfarzin منم به اندازه شما وجدان دارم اصلا هم ادم مذهبی نیستم', 'افسوس', 'افسوس...', 'مثل اون فیلم که نقش اولش رباطی به اسم چ پی بود ', 'اینایی که میگن روحش شاد یا از این حرفا فازشون چیه ', 'He lived such an amazing life. Beyond my comprehension', ' ', ' درود بر شما دکتر نیری. لطفا دایرکت چک کنید. کامنتای بنده چشم انتظار پاسخ شما هستند ', ' ', 'نام و یادش گرامی.. ولی بهتره اینقدر جوگ ر نشیم دیگه فیزیکدان های برجسته تر از هاوکینگ هم اکنون وجود دارن بهتره چشمامونو بیشتر باز کنیم دلیل شهرت هاوکینگ بیشتر رسانه ای بودنش بود کاش اینقدر شوب در رسانه ها برپا نکرده بود.', ' ali.nayeri I like it ', 'او یک افسانه بود', 'یادشان ونامشان جاودانه وتاسف فروان برای همه بشریت و مخصوصا دنیای علم و دانش و فیزیک .', 'یادش گرامی باد', 'دانشمند همیشه زنده است.نابغه فیزیک زمان استیون هاوکینگ دوست داشتنی یک الگو برای همه مردم جهان است کسی که به همه نشان داد در سخت ترین شرایط هم میتوان خوب زندگی کرد و امیدوار بود اری میشود با سخت ترین شرایط جسمانی هم بزرگترین کارهای فکری را انجام داد.تبریک به جامعه فیزیک که یک چنین انسان ازادی را در دل خود پرورش داد.به گمان من هاوکینگ همیشه زنده است.', 'و البته بزرگی سر در کاریکاتور نیز به معنای پختگی ذهن و به کلامی دیگر دانشمند بودن فرد است که در این مورد حق کاملا با نقاش محترم بوده است', ' ', ' ', 'اقا من م تونم ه چ ز بگم من ه شمارو خ ل دوست دارم خودتونم م دون ن. اما هردفه م ام امنتا پستا شمارو م خونم حرص م خورم از ن همه تعر ف و تمج د ب ش از حد نرمال ن رسما م شه تملق ما ا ران ا عادت بد دار م ه خوبه رو در حد خدا م ن م و ه ازش خوشمون نم اد رو با مخ م وب م زم ن طرف خودشم احتمالا خ ل جاها معذب م شه ببخش د ام دوارم ناراحتتون ن رده باشم ', ' ', ' nice job ', ' U f U f U f U f U f U f ', ' tannaz.sch خب کامنتها رو نخونید ', ' tannaz.sch سو بداشت نشه ولی در کل دست پرورده ی فرهنگ دست بوسی و نوکرم و چاکرم هستیم ناخواسته به این سمت کشیده میشیم', ' ', ' ', ' majid yaghubi ا نم حرف ه ', ' neda.honarmandi دق قااااا', ' جناب دکتر نیری عزیز پیشاپیش نوروز مبارک', ' tannaz.sch ', 'جشن هن چهارشنبه سور رو به شما د تر ن ر عز ز و خانواده محترم خجسته باد عرض م نم و برا شما در سال ت پ روز و سلامت رو از درگاه طب عت خواستارم ارادت ali.nayeri', ' ', 'به به ', ' قای دکتر من خیلی از سمینار علم و شبه علم استفاده کردم خیلی متشکرم از زحمتای شما و دکتر هلاکویی و دیگر استادان ', 'دکتر تیش درست کنین از روش بپرین U f a ', ' ', 'این شعر از کیه علی جان ', ' ', 'بس ار عال . ', 'عالی بود دکتر', 'درودها ', 'درود بر شما استاد ', 'نماد زادی', 'نیری بزرگ', ' ', ' ', 'درود بر پروفسور عزیز', ' ', 'درود بر استاد عزیز دکتر نیری', ' ', 'عالی بود', 'د تر ن ر عز ز هم شه حرفهاتون رو گوش م دم و لذت م برم ', 'واای فوق u cالعاده بود ', ' ', 'زن بودن کار دشواری است.. و به قولی در ایران دشوار تر..اما همیشه قهرمان ها را از کار های دشوار می توان شناخت.. همیشه میگن باید زن باشی تا بفهمی.. فقط باید زن باشی', ' tarikh.iran official بسیار عالی ', ' skeptic logic مطالعه و موختن پایانی ندارد.. من کلا زود نتیجه گیری نمی کنم. هر روز سعی میکنم در حال موختن باشم تا زمانیکه زنده هستم. البته کاملا مشخصه که مطالب ادیان سنتی کاملا خرافات و بی معنی هست. مشخصه که برای من هم اون خرافات اهمیتی ندارد بنابراین دیگه وقتم رو صرف مسخره کردن و تو گرفتن از نها نمی کنم.. اینشتین هم تا پایان عمرش خدا و فلسفه خودش رو داشت خدا و دین اینشتین مخصوص خودش بود ن چیزیکه در قوانین طبیعت میدید و مبهوتش میکرد که اصلا قابل مقایسه با دید مردم عوام نبود. یا ریچارد فاینمن هم به بصیرت هایی فلسفی دست یافته بود.', 'پس لطفا دیگران را بی جهت منشن نکنید u c.سپاس', ' قای دکتر شما مطم نید که اینطوره و زایده دهن ماست من که فکر نمیکنم این طرز افکارتون فرق زیادی با خوندا داشته باشه شما لباس علم تنش کردین اونا لباس مذهب ولی نمیدونم کی میخوایم بفهممیم جذم اندیش نباشیم .این همه فیلسوف خدا باور و ... یعنی همشون دارن حرف مفت میزنن خودتون که تو برنامه گفتین چون من تا حالا شواهدی ندیدم از خدا بهش باور ندارم .اگه یه روز دیدم بهش باور پیدا میکنم . خوب با این تصویری که گذاشتین خودتون فکر میکنید اگه یه روز یک بانگ جرسی هم شنیدید افکارتون بهتون اجازه میده که بپذیرید خدا باوری رو', 'من نمیگم بیا خدا باور شو .نه .من طرز تفکرتون رو خیلی زیاد دوست دارم اقای دکتر', 'بخدا خیلی بهم کمک کرده تو نگاهم به دنیا .ولی وقتی میبینم یک ادم مثلا ساله رفتار سالگی رو میکنه ناراحت میشم', ' رزوی موفقیت دارم براتون', 'و از اون خدایی که بهش باور دارم طلب رحمت میکنم براتون .در ضمن خداناوری شما هم برای من قابل احترام هست و منو تکون داده .وو باعث پیشرفت من شده .ممنون استاد از این که روشن گری میکنین انشالله موفق باشین و برچم علم رو روز به روز بالا تر نگاه دارین', 'مرگ تعصب تولد اخلاق است. ایمانو ل کانت ', ' rezza مگه چیکار کردن که طلب بخشش براشون می کنید دوست عزیز ', ' s Rezazadehh نه عزیزم گفتم طلب رحمت نه بخشش', 'رحمت یعنی توفیق بیشتر', 'در مورد کانت درست گفتید واقعا قبلنا تعصب داشتم و تا حدودی زیادی رو اخلاق من تاثیر گذاشته بود .ولی الان بهتر شدم .از تعصبم دست کشیدم و فهمیدم خیلی چیزا اونی که فکر میکردم نبود یکی از کسایی هم که باعث شد به خودم بیام دکتر نیری بودند', 'حرف من این بود عزیزم ببین درقالب یک مثال براتون بگم یک کالسکه ای رو در نظر بگیرین که مخصوص حمل وسایل ساختنش بعد من برم جای که باید وسایل بزارن بشینم به ناحق و با تعصب .بعد یک ادم عاقل بیاد بگه برادر من اشتباه نشستی اونجا جای وسایله .من که منصفانه نگاش کردم میگم اره راست میگه بزار برم پایین وسایل رو بزارم رو کالسکه بعد یهو میبینم اون ادم عاقل رفت خودش جای من نشست', 'من ناراحت نشم قرار نبود خداباوری رو مسخره کنیم عزیزم', ' rezza بسیار خوب.. و خوشحالم که تعصب رو کنار گذاشتید... خوش باشید و از شگفتی های این جهان شگفت انگیز لذت ببرید ', 'بله عزیزم خیلی از علم لذت بردم و حیرت زده شدم حتی راستش . خیلییی زیاد بهم کمک کرده', 'ممنونم از شما همچنین که با متانت بهم پاسخ دادین ', 'ا ا م جی ', 'منم سوالایی درمورد اینکه خدا از کجا بوجود اومده اصن هست یانیست داشتم ولی هنوز مطم ن نیسم ک خدایی نباشه', ' عالیه', 'اقا د تر عز ز تو ا ران چطور م تون م دست پ دا ن م ', ' shirin.yghb برای دوستان در ایران برایگان در دست u cرس خواهد بود. چند هفته بعد از اتمام دوره', 'درود بر شما د تر ن ر و سپاس بابت زحمتها ه م ش د. ', 'سپاس بیکران دکتر عزیز', 'سپاس دکترجان تاج سرین ', 'تقاقطع لازمه برا انسان بودن...', 'You are fully right, the modern world is very complicated, therefore it needs new rules laws and requires changes in our attitude and life style.', ' ali.nayeri ', 'این جیره ی غم و مصیبت گویا تمومی نداره..', 'از هشتاد میلیون یک میلیون یا ده میلیون نباشن چی میشه مگه انسان در این سرزمین اهمیت و ارزشی داره ', 'متاسفانه.....', 'دکتر ببین ابرقدرتها چهل سال پیش چه بلایی سر این کشور وردن', 'مصیبت خوراک روزمرگی مان شده ', 'دولت مررررررررردان مردان فقط بلدن اظهار هم دردی کنن شرف ندارن واقعا ', 'در. سرزمین من غم پایانی ندارد U f a ', 'هرکجای وطنم که دست میگذارم درد میکند...', 'عل اقا ما ه د گه خسته شد م اخه دل ادم درد م گ ره عن ه چ امشب خرابم مثله هم شه دو سه ماه د گه برا هم شه از ا ران م رم ول با ه دن ا غم و غصه مگه م شه بر و چشماتو ببند هموطنت عذاب ب شه ما ه خانواده هست م به بزرگ ا ران دلم غم داره خ ل هم غم داره ول متاسفم برا خودم شرمنده ه سفره دلم رو برا شما باز ردم و سر شما رو درد اوردم', 'حیف از این همه نعمت در ایران از استعداد و منابع طبیعی و ثروت و این همه مصیبت ناشی از بی فکری و جهل .', ' U f a ', 'خدا به اسفندماه رحم کنه', 'درود مرد مرام و معرفت علم انسانی شما بزرگوار در قلب و فکر ما جای دارد', 'مکن چاه بهر کسی اول خودت بعد کسی... یاد بگیریم مرگ و ویرانی هیچ کس و هیچ ملتی را نخواهیم...انگار دارد تمام شعار مرگ برها به سوی خودمان بازتاب می کند و بر میگردد . منزوی شدن یک کشور و عقب افتادن از جهان و محدودیت گذاری های سیاست های جهانی چنین عواقبی راهم در پیش دارد ..', 'ه چ س به غ ر از خودما مارا به ب راهه نبرد.', 'ما واقعا بازماندگان هستیم البته اگر این ده روز اخر سال هم به خیر بگذره هنوز چهارشنبه سوری یا در واقع چهارشنبه سوزی مونده متاسفانه ', 'روزهای خوب دوباره برمی گردن', 'خانه از پایبست ویران است', 'شدت تش به حدی است که امکان امداد رسانی نیست پلاسکو nشدت انفجار به حدی است که امکان امداد رسانی نیست معدن یورت nدمای حرارت به حدی است که امکان امداد رسانی نیست سانچی nمنطقه ی سقوط هواپیما به حدی صعب العبور است که امکان امداد رسانی نیست هواپیمای یاسوج -هیچوقت نمیگن امکانات ضعیفه مدیریت نداریم... ', ' U f a ', ' ', 'اینقد بلا سرمون اومده ک دیگه نمیدونم برا کدومش تسلیت بگیم ', 'باید کوچ کردازاین سرزمین نفرین شده', 'باید خون گریست دکتر جانم', 'اقا د تر چرا اسلام لا با زندگ به طور ل مخالفه و انقدر عاشق مرگه ', ' ', ' ', 'دقیقا دیگه حتی توان تسلیت هم نداریم از بس که مصیبت و فاجعه پشت سر هم اتفاق میفته ', 'خ ل بد بود. از استادا دانشگاه مون تو اون هواپ ما بود متاسفانه شته شد. ادم نم دونه چ بگه د گه', 'تسلیت به شما هم واقعا باعث تاسف است', ' ', ' ', 'از ماست که بر ماست..... ', 'اگه یک ماه دیگه دوام بیاریم میشیم از بازمانده های سال ', ' ', 'هر روز به عناوین مختلف تکرار میشه تسلیت', 'تا این ر یم منحوس هست وا ه تسلیت همچنان وجود دارد به تمام عالم و دم مرگ بر گفتند و انر ی منفی برگشت به مردم بیچاره و هیچ وقت سایشی هم فراهم نشد غیر از خودشان و قازاده هاشان خیری به مردم نرسید', 'با همت دوستان به زودی تو تهران مهمون برنامه های دانش گستری شما دکتر نیری عزیز خواهیم بود . به امید اون روز', 'فایل صوتی رو در چنل قرار میدید لطفا در مورد تمدن نوع سوم صحبت کنید', ' aliieraneeee برنامه u cی تلویزیونی u cست', 'بسیار عالی دکتر نیری.', 'درود بر دکتر نیری عزیز سپاس از زحمات بی دریغتون در راه گسترش دانش که به زعم من تنها راه رهایی و نجات این مردم از بند خرافات و اوهام هست برقرار باشید استاد', 'دکتر چقد خوشحالم دوباره میتونم تو ماشینم بشینم و بازم مهبانگ گوش کنم', ' iliya ashrafi ', 'دکتر جان یادتون نره فایل صوتی رو بلافاصله تو کانال مهبانگ بذارید که لحظه شماری میکنیم براش', 'عشق منی علی نیری', ' چقدر عالی. این بار پس با دو شخصیت تاثیر گذار و روشنفکر همراه هستیم جناب دکتر نیری و داریوش عزیز', 'ارادت دارم دکتر در یوتیوب از نظرات شما استفاده میکنم', 'پروفسور دکتر نیری مساعی جنابعالی و سایر دانشمندان بنام ایرانی خارج از کشور نظیر اقای دکتر هلاکویی خانم دکتر فرنودی اقای دکتر حسام نوذری اقای دکتر نادری و ... جهت تنویر افکار عمومی و اشناسازی جامعه ایرانی با جستجوی واقعیت با اتکا به روشمندی علمی که تاثیر غیر قابل انکار در خرافه زدایی دارد بسیار ستودنی و قابل تقدیر است. همچنانکه میدانیم علم که محصول نگاه روشمند عقل به واقعیت است تنها ابزار کارامد و قابل اطمینان در دست بشر برای شناخت و تغییر دنیای پیرامون بوده و عملا بجز علم هیچیک از حوزه های فعالیت ذهن بشر قادر به چنین تاثیرگذاری مثبت و سازنده نبوده اند. ترویج پرسشگری و تردید در باره باورهای ذهنی قدیمی دستاورد مستقیم اموزه های علمی و روشنگرانه فرهیختگانی مانند شماست که اینده ای درخشان را برای ما قابل تصور کرده ولی اگر مجال فرا رسیدن ان توسط متحجران از بنیان به امر محال مبدل نشود.', 'بسیار عالی دکتر عزیز', 'موفق باشید', 'افتخار میکنم به وجودت ', 'عشق منید استادبزرگ ', 'سلام قا د تر . ممنون م شم در مورد خرافات از قب ل جن و ارواح سرگردان و ا ن ه ا ثر مردم ما به متوسل به دعا و خرافات شدن بر رها ز مش لات ا رس دن به خواسته هانشون صحبت داشته باش د ممنون ', 'من از تهران شنونده رادیو هستم ولی اینترنتم خیلی قطع و وصل میشه لطفن اگر امکانش هست در گروه بذارین. ', ' mahshid darvishpour در این رابطه دکتر فرهنگ هولاکویی هم صحبت کردن و خیلی جالب هست.', ' bahar rahgozar ممنون عز زم', ' ', ' abenddana ', 'خب معلوم احمدی ن اد ', 'ما با فرهنگمون کاندا را تسخیر کردیم و سفره نوروز را به تمام کاخهای دنیا بردیم....نه با مرگ گفتن و موشک', ' abbasimohsen motlag ', ' n n n بنام خدا مهربان فرارسیدن سال نو و نوروز باستان را به شما شادباش گفته و برا تان سال سرشار از شاد و موفق ت را رزومندم ام دوارم ا ن سال برا تان سال دوستی سال فراوانی و بی نیازی کوشش و رامش تو م با دلخوش بوده وحکمت خدا با خواسته دلتون یکی باشه.. پیروز باشید و سلامت nزندگیتون پر از نگاه خدا.. نوروز n n n n U f U f U f U f U f U f U f U f ', ' nedaalimohammadiiiiii سال نو رو به شما تبریک عرض میکنم و امیدوارم سالی سرشار از شادکامی و نیکبختی پیشرو داشته باشید', ' nedaalimohammadiiiiii ', 'VERY CUTE ', ' ', 'ای جان', ' pajouh z ', 'جاااان ', ' sbozorgi ', 'ولی تو ک میخندیدی دندونات پیدا بود', ' seyed reza moosavi سلام سید سال نو مبارک یادت هست من کوچیک بودم خوشکلتربودم', 'خخخخ سلام کاکو افشین سال نو شمام مبارک اره بچگیات بیتر بودی', 'سال نو مبارکت افشین خان', ' meysam r مخلصم حاجی به همچنین سال خوبی داشته باشید ', ' ', 'سال نو رو میتبریکم افشین خان', ' sadegh.kavian سال نو رو به شما تبریک عرض میکنم و امیدوارم سالی سرشار از شادکامی و نیکبختی پیشرو داشته باشید', ' ', 'ترا تورش ساله اش املا نو بود', ' ', ' jabbarymortez بله جناب دکتر تبلیغات بی داد می u cکنه ', 'به پای ایران خودرو نمیرسه', 'روحشون شاد ', 'روحش شاد ', 'حییییف شد حیف', ' ', 'به به', ' delaramousavi ', ' تا توربو شار ر مشتی', 'خدای تور بو هست', 'میش نصبش کرد رومینیبوس ', ' meysam r فرمون بده داش میثم', ' rsw اره داش رسول روی هیوندا ها هست', ' تا مشتی', ' afshingharib.official ارادت داریم', 'چراعاشق نشه روزگاربدستشون میچرخه', 'ا ناعاشق نشن اعاشق بشن', ' ', ' فرین ', ' ', 'Omg', 'Holy crap', 'Omg', ' ', ' shanayya', 'Yes awesome', 'Or there could just be a gay guy under my bed painting his nails and texting his bff', ' scrubble bob what the', 'Great ', ' scrubble bob what ', 'What monterrey under the bed ', ' enoch noble monster ', 'Hahahah tarunmasand.in', ' anushkasiingh the concept of staring tho', ' ew zunairah us at cameron', 'Noi ekat kolme kuvas mun el m eritt in t ydellisesti sandralehtt', ' isabellafranzeee OOF', 'Me natalie.amelia ', 'Me hahahahahahahahah ryan lion chan', ' suravi mishra ', ' torisherrera third one is you', ' baddbitcchh dats you stare at me until I kiss you', ' feliciapaladi me ', ' reuben roshan aaronanish luigi.b.a jackthatsit lmfao', ' kristenn.d me', 'Hahahanjiirrr', ' imzachherron', ' geo queen kuma ', miss. .mishra hahahaha, ain't that bad, bro , 'Wow', ' justynacwirko', ' itay rosenbaum ', ' dena ', ' mah tab b ', ' linette avv', 'TODAY', 'It happens all the time .', 'lmao wtf no', ' maya shah this is actually accurate heheh', ' nayeli maldonado ln ', 'The worst feeling', ' clxire. .lxm meganyeoo', ' u d ', ' marinaacama', ' wood.hailey', ' thatkidd coraliee', ' inaraabdullah I can relate so fucking much lmao', 'I look like a potato regardless', ' rymmx AHAHAHAHAHAHAHA LOLL ', ' joyceesc if this is me in JSB i will cry', ' ashlynn the potato', ' rhema kusuma that s not happening', ' kass dy ', ' prayer in c shoot me plzzz .. we need a break for like a year or something lahadhl ma ajbetnehalhayet', ' catchmenapping', ' janviraj so accurate I can t ', Yupp, i just feel like .. i'm doomed today , ' cheyennetereza omg ', 'oops mylagrey', 'Yup ', ' elephantonia wir', ' anniefeehley SPRING BREAK IS MY REWARD BlackOutNaps', 'Yep ', 'Relatable ', 'Yea', I currently have projects due in the same week. Next week. Haven't started yet. , 'now theres comments ', ' liv.bryner me every days', ' myah dierker same here.', 'Just school in general', ' myah dierker just gotta get through this lifetime..', 'Yup', 'Omg', ' learichmanyy', ' ladkani emma HAHAHAHA', 'Lol', ' nektariia ', ' karakkim', ' mikee ', 'Illuminatti stay right there', ' chetna acha ni tha ', 'Then that there', 'Life given', ' ale fazzini ODDEEEEO HAHAHAA', 'Ohmyfuvkinggodlol', ' stuartbeatrice non ci credooi HAHAHAHAHAHAHAH', 'Mind blown', ' k.tinks hahahahaha ', ' rozhan.safaei', 'Wooooooooooooooow', ' jakesmithhisler ', ' brandi.farley hwen hwat hwere. Hten htat hten.', ' jakesmithhisler please stop. ', ' brandi.farley finnneeee. Love you', ' canselistnehoe', 'Omg', 'Everybody should already know this', 'Then thAt there ', ' U f f', 'Oh', 'Then that there', ' therealangad fuck ', 'Deeeeeeeeeeeep', 'Noone has followed me in days ', 'Deep saramariaylitalo falckmea', ' mariahanna ', ' alexi.elmorr deep.', 'dangggg', ' nomuka ', ' indy.stork', 'woaaaahh duuuude so insightful this changed my entire life', 'Woahhh vesnigabriel arabellakyla', ' vanessalyy wow explains why I hate life', ' musiclife ', ' cassideehaylie', sapphirerose.mw it's from Jay Shetty's YouTube video , ' kaelynn.b omg shook', 'Lol', ' drahamneh', ' lara.zekovic ', ' tiffanyseol', ' alex lafleur ', That's freaking great , purba can't even have chits , ' mardiizzz i usually hate ig quotes but this is actually en pointe daaaamn', 'This is going on the fridge.', 'True', ' retardir.ana rajkovic ahaahahahahaha', ' sometoraay', 'That was said. By jayshetty', 'Inspirational', 'u okay buddy ', ' prin cess leala what do you think ', ' zhor hadjam photography so real i agree with you every person has his own question', 'I LOVE THIS SO MUCH', 'damn that s deep', ' manisha ', 'Deeeep', ' emmawubbolt', ' therealangad fuck ', ' ', ' suzennn ', ' ', ' colu ccio cameron.tuckerr where they get this photo of me wtf', ' emilytrepka well at the beach obvs', ' colu ccio grrrrr it was in the my eyes only folder', ' nazihamellal', ' jangybels ahahahhahah', 'Me', ' madaboerescu', ' tarzyytfer okay good I m not the only one who caught that', ' to tell the truth i dont care yes', That's a little cow , 'Eine seekuh', 'Honey MOOn', 'I love this ', ' cchapmanogc', ' emmastovern', ' highkey childish ', 'Why not ', 'it means ure stink af', ' yelinaosullivan', 'Noone has followed me in days ', 'Bahahahhaha finn delpaul', ' ', 'because that is the way of life...', ' ezrahvandaal', ' ruthie.jewel rightttt', ' viveca tang', ' kp ', The entire fucking sky bro Fr I just don't get it. U f U f U f , ' madaboerescu', ' t s l l then why is a fly called a FLY', 'Omg why', 'Lol', 'Hahahahha true', 'LEGITNESS', 'Watch someone go all scientific about this.', One time a moth flew into my mouth while I was on the swings and I didn't notice at first so I kept swinging and then it hit the back of my throat and I just panicked and spit it out. And then I fell off the swings , ' trader jojos omg ', 'Eessh ', ' joelzysbizzarreadventure', ' mrs.corder ', ' giddybrunette ', 'Jz', ' lisha j ', ' avacadoprivv', ' j daddybear hahaha so good ', 'Omgg for real', ' breanna.jane', ' merrylilunicorn HAHA rmr how you used to say my retainers were like dentures', ' loch nesi', ' deadlynev omg dad...', ' shreya.a.a.a technically tho', ' aprils jefferson oh my word.', ' yashvii.s shooty singh alkesha afshan ', ' reeva ', ' steph.ireland ded ded ded ', ' reeva ', ' courtneybarlow', ' zukthiii still at the bottom god damn it', ' pender ayni this is us we need a jobless', 'Job pender ayni', ' yugndhardeshkar ', ' h.gulzari LOLOL, and don t forget you owe me too ', ' anna bruck', ' steffedmonds ', ' kirilouiseshellsea ', ' caroline nelsonn', ' purple starry skies', ' maggie dommisse yep', ' matt wilkinson ', ' pablosilvabar ', 'Lol', ' kencar ', ' roxy.roman big mood ', ' bollamarie', ' anoushkamahadoo', ' astrid dm dig', ' mathilde bjerring det er h rdt', 'ded omg ranelle garcia', 'HAHAHA YOU TRICK ASS BITCH YOU THOUGHT WRONG', ' judithhomme ', ' rasmusskovgaard ', ' a x abbott', somer.r.s.m that's what they all say , 'Follow superhumanworkforlife', '....run', 'I post a pic of a waffle everyday and rate it ', ' YO I POST FUNNY INSTAGRAM VIDEOS YOU SHOULD CHECK THEM OUT ', 'Check dm', 'Check', 'Check dm', respect, we can help you upgrade if you'd like. custom , 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', ' teri.steelexx', ' ', 'Namaste y all I m an artist dancer who s just starting out and trying to get recognized I m from Germany and I love Indian culture It would mean a lot to me if you would check out my page and my videos there, just if you want Shukriya ', ' angelachen ', ' U f U f ', ' kevin ep ich bei jedem handy ', ' rana honeini ', ' lenawps ', ' im not.high', ' im.not high', ' sinjaxv', ' tegan scource this is definitely you U f ', ' lily yesss ', ' its g.r.a.c.e ayi tu ', ' jdykmp ja immerhin damals immer haha', ' emma bm SUREEEEEE ', ' emma bm stel je voor je telefoon kon pratenn dan heb ik medelijjdeeen', ' racheltigger', ' meera LMAO', ' kayleen rodgers y is dis me', ' ijuantekkillya official', kaitlin.shope. fr I'm not like that so please stop I'm better for the greater good. So if you wanna treat me like a monster for the rest of your life then fine. My days are over now , 'Lmfao', ' dukel ', ' maka. Literally ', ' travis so you ', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', ' blair.tatum ', ' bronaakc tei bhanya rupaiya ni chaina ', ' kaushikishrestha viber herr ta ...ikr', ' bronaakc kinaaa ', ' cecilieschneider Hahaha. Pr cis ', ' cerlloabishek emshurr literally. imma cry rn ', ' olek.jezierski ', ' nnata n ', ' jesondarulo that s me', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', ' trista.aaaa itsurgurltrista.spam WHY IS THIS IS US U f ', ' erin le. ', ' exma ', ' rajikhanna ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'Literally me', ' finn vdw ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'Awesomd', ' hugo .sz', ' jvirgona ', 'No one has followed me in ages Or ever ', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', 'me lol', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'Me', 'Thats so me and my dad when we play our ps ', ' j.o.s.e ', 'Me', ' schobereggerchristian', ' hollyduff omg so us', damooooo but who's carrying haha , ' farsy ', ' florian villinger - Julius', ' metinkapoli hahahahahha', ' dinozukic ', ' mattheww caglorini', 'I m the one in the casket', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', Trying to achieve my goal of FOLLOWERS please help me grow a little Don't post shoutouts , ' katie.nicola just no U f u d U f u d ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', ' kody rodriguez', dontreadmybio okay I won't , ' iman sajjad ', ' s.sarukumar', ' austin reed ', '.mmim', Don't read my bio , 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'Can someone check out my page I sing and it would mean the world to me ', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', ' alvagustafsson alltid', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'Thats me everyday', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', ' nizelabalos ', 'This is sooo ooooooo me', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'DONT READ MY USERNAME I BEG YOU ', 'MEEE', 'Ew', 'Dm', 'I don t see one emoji code sheet. I followed this account because I wanted to see the codes... All these accounts to see stuff are rip offs. They link you to another account and to another account until you get back to theirs. It s really shady', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', ' ', Hey, I'm a photographer. If you want to look at my pictures and or give me tips, you're welcome , 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', ' saskya.ramdas ', 'That s mr', ' abbee nolan', ' DONT READ MY USERNAME U f a U f a ', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', ' zwwyxzamos', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', 'Hahah me', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', ' ', ' guided by evil dickhead ', ' sam griffin ', 'So true hannah.volker', 'DON T YOU DARE TO READ MY NAME ', ' michelle manos ', Aren't the the same thing , ' brandonkerber me ', itsjoenguyen oh. that's unfortunate , ' changkatrinaa ', '.', ' sophiaaboudoumit loolll', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', ' court jackson you ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', ' jaimerbarton this is you', ' ayhleek valdez ', ' meg atron ', ' mathias asmussen haha mig', ' ki kic ahhahahahahah ', ' forza yep', ' lasharnd', ' isi.ib ich gestern ', ' madison wahl yesssssss stop rn', harold don't worry.... , ' emiliasointressantaa passar dig ', ' rebeccaadwan', ' mcfleurrryy I have nothing to worry abt', 'DON T READ MY NAME ', ' ellis jupjup', 'me', ' anthony pagnanelli loyalty at its finest', ' samantha.milller', ' annapannasuper', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'Me with cats', 'DON T READ MY NAME ', ' killaqueenmyah Look how cute he is I thought you were on about a guy ', 'Yesssd', Don't read my bio , ' hai its elizabeth', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'FRIENDS ', 'O....MY...... GOD ', 'Yesssssssssssswwwww', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'DON T READ MY NAME ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', ' ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'OMG I WAS JUST WATCHING THEM', ' ehero ', ' yadigg.fernaando someone has no life and watches tv shows all day', ' seth lester I have a partial life, but the shows I mentioned, come on at night', 'So true', 'LOVE', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', ' zevv ', ' my.crazy.sk wbald', ' masolovely', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', Don't read my bio , 'DONT READ MY PROFILE PICTURE ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', ' steph gunner tuna pasta', ' bronwyncurran when you get mugged out of nowhere', ' maddies.uhh', 'wow', ' kenna carpi sun ', ' jakobhandke', ' musicmasterlc', ' .amanee.r.razeq. ', ' jenan q u trust me I trust u too ', 'farttt', 'So me', ' sophia kjoest kathleenlikesturtles', ' lilli ', ' jw.weiss it s Jeff ', ' hanmartin I Better be on there ', ' xx abi xx ', ' c.h.r.i.s ', ' jessjaendrasingh', ' tyra ', ' ellice mcglinn lol', 'Lmao', ' sanjana juliacondel LMAOOO', ' candhika ', ' meliana lie ', 'pLeAsE dOnT rEaD mY uSeRnAmE i BeG yOu ', ' hale.olly', ' celina.bth', 'Fax', napierne list of people I don't hate , ' peta bierton', 'Yes o', 'Ptn', ' annay.ma', ' luke caballer', 'What list maria ', ' kay.m.dossantos wow', 'Ture violet torres ', 'LMFAO', ' marihaugenes n for tida', ' miller nickolasedwards', ' natluev ', ' priscillafav', ' granado.mia lol', ' elinhauge hehe, da h per jeg jeg er en av de p den store lista ass ', 'So me lol', ' aikioveeda', ' laviniac zwz ', ' josinawesley', ' allikat ', 'Homer ', ' marloeshalvemaanx', ' hannahxmeijer oh my god ', ' ivana.katavic', ' kristina duspaara hahahahahhahaha ajmeee slatkisi', ' hoffmanndustin ', ' leirelopeez ', 'Then look at the picture', 'Is that a kangaroo ', 'HAHA THE PIC FRAME', ' englaberntsson HAHAHAHHA', 'these arent emoji meanings so u should change ur name to shoutouts', ' daniellemostertt lalalalalalalol', ' avacortezcarter ', ' ka', ' karinamayen ', ' ben abelson', 'F', 'F', 'Rip', 'Hhujrujfhbfhfkhjfufbhbbbbbhnfhjjnfufnfjnfhnfjnfjxnfhnfhkfkf', 'Jkfhnfjfbjcnfjvbbbbncnnkgkjkh', 'Nmchf', 'Jf kg', 'J', 'Kg', 'J', 'L', ' gijs pieroen als je dr ooit nog krijgt', ' tijsvhorn wat ga je zeggen homotje als je berber ni had kreeg je ook nooit iemand', ' gijs pieroen dat was K niet', 'f', ' reece bell', 'Fffffffffffffff', 'F', 'F', 'F', 'Dope', ' moe rosado tattoo thanks man, much appreciated', 'love this ', 'amazing work that is beautiful art.', 'Nice', 'Nicely incorporated, Alex. The flow with the smoke is a nice effect.', 'I want-I want-I want,,,, lol,, very nice', 'Obsessed', ' cdbankes hey thanks', ' ', 'Nice', 'Looks sweet Dude', 'Looking good bro ', 'Love it ', 'I love this ', ' really d get something this big ', therealdealteneil nahhh I like the size I'm getting , ' grittyl thanks bud. Hope your doing good. I m supposed to come by your shop Thursday for painting. You should be there ', 'Gorgeous ', 'Well done.', ' nickmadmox well thank you', ' carinadaugherty thanks', 'I LOVE these I really need one someday.', 'Beautiful I ve been wanting a gemstone tattoo but wasn t sure who to go to. Now I m sure frew tattoo', 'Loove the heart in the middle ', 'Beautiful ', ' renee.innaz just gotta get on the schedule. It s out till August right now', ' frew tattoo I ll dm you ', 'Oooooh you d like this gem allie scherr', ' grandmalis omg I love it Do you know the artist ', ' allie scherr not personally but I have a few friends who have been tattood by him. His shop isn t too far from Lancaster Little over an hour and some change', 'Helt r tt ', 'Superfint ', ' ', ' photooftheday ', ' ', 'I love this post', ' .....', ' ', Wow, it's so amazing , 'Hahahaha, liiife ', 'I really like your stuff Keep it up ', 'Ya Thank you so much for being so brave and bold in empowering women to be heard We matter and TimesUp on silencing us. Go WomensMarch ', 'The best of the best ...', 'Jeg vil ha samme t-shorte Ddd r', ' rikkewhitebird den er fra Monki ', 'Hot mama', ' ', 'Cool ', 'Cool We are the best people that do this Info on my bio ', 'Nice Would love your thoughts on our last post ', ' ', ' ...', 'looks amazing ', ' ..', ' ', ' martine.boee this picture is very good', 'nice ', ' ', You're so gorgeous , please DM us , 'Cool picture. Have a beautiful day x ', ' ', ' foto', 'Nice Profile', 'Sweet', 'Cool', 'Totally dig this one ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Really good photo ', 'This is awesome ', ' ', 'One of the best photos ', ' ..', ' ...', 'awesome feed x', 'Relaxing', 'Awesome post ', ' ', ' ', 'Love this interior', 'Wow ', ' ', 'با همه شوق تو را می خواهم... مازستا ', ' I love this share .....', 'so adorable ', ' harleyalaniz', 'Damn She is strong ', ' mekenna paige us on abs day', 'She is insane wickaay', ' li p shan ', ' supadupafly ', ' faviolav ', ' secretking ', 'Awesome', ' brenda.spc lmfaooo mood all bro', ' beatrizdomingoerustes julycristinasilva NUESTRo OBJETIVO babys ', ' mobdi I feel like you d be able to', ' kanika xox mad mad', ' jpmarano', ' annie fitlifefitme goals ', ' kelsiemcgurrin your next workout', ' kristen kovalchik lol yeah I wish ', ' julia.inside siiii ', ' erladberg som at se os i g r', ' sofiefjerritslev hahahah s meget', ' summerxlouise that booty ', ' rabiainsta', 'Hello beauty ', ' alewitul try this ', 'Fit ', ' jas adkinsxo', ' jenford I meant to tag you in this earlier. I saved it already lol', ' jas adkinsxo ok cool', ' mickaellymercia', ' katherine abby', ' megbailes ', ' megb ', ' unbrelievable', ' lacipat', ' alyssasirii Monday sesh ', ' lauraluisa done ', ' ovobabes.sam u gotta try em', ' Check out the hottest artist in Ohio right now New single link in my bio ', ' renakapili', 'Wij stylishsilvia', ' teileen ', 'YEAH Great Workout', ' isamar ', ' cynthiamariee let s get it', ' michele medeiros ', ' ellie.witts', ' ellie.witts', ' jalz is this what u do How many times a week', ' rodrigosamuell pra reparar s nos movimentos', ' debo aaa ', ' missxstiorm', ' lynersq kallyane ramos', ' yamilethmezaa', ' caarlamont ', ' queen toot qtr U f u d طلعنا نسو التمار ن غللللط', ' nunzialopopolo stiff mariellalupone anna.marco. ', 'Watch...and read thilay', ' dsuchiang okay', ' dermatologychick Correct form', 'Ni yg bujur mutiah siti musthofa', ' keysiaya singkal jua itu tu mun dicoba ', ' mutiah siti musthofa lumayan efek kd nge gym', ' . . . . U f U f U f d U f U f c U f U f ', ' keysiaya akooo blm ada workout sama sekali nah', ' mutiah siti musthofa samaaaaaaaaa...', ' keysiaya malas melandaaaaaaa', ' jeh.steinar', 'Removing ribs helps too ', 'Excellent I just wrote a blog on my Facebook page covering this exact topic I would add to remember proper oblique training to this. Improper develop will lead to the love handle look and fitness is all about avoiding this ', ' elzforme', ' brittknee I just started following this account too, if you read it - it s interesting what can be done. And how we can do our reps ', ' calebjonessssss can u do this with me Wednesday at ur gym', ' chloecarr yeah x', ' manalmaktoub', ' amberstreeter', 'Mmmm', 'I love this You re awesome', ' kaylavella wanna try this', ' samashleylutz', 'Nice ', 'What s the Kg weight in this workout please , ', 'Holy shit this girls arms and back tho beewesthaver hippy nurse ', ' z.r.z.z', ' hanngregoire', ' stephany slb', ' ggsilvestri', 'DAMNNNN flex on them ', ' katemcnabbfitness greatforbiceps upperbody', ' serginhorufino olha a ', ' sahnos ', ' gnacioatria y si hago esto ', 'Great ', 'This looks cool, want to try ', ' jackieocgirl', ' missydl I saw it. I did it on Sat', ' leahdamiani tomorrow', ' emmavellenga yeah my arms are gonna look like that too', ' sarasandvold ', ' sebas ', 'Love love love these exercises....very creative and efficient...thanks...will be doing these...', ' veronica.lillesveen', ' taylorjaquizzle let s do it', ' didyrg ', ' kaelizzl', ' mozzelle I m getting my resistance band TOMORROW And I m joining a gym. Ya girl I m doing this fr fr', ' cass sal we need bands ', ' jamia reid yes lets go shopping U f d ', ' vivianapedrazzani', ' pernillepedersen ', ' kaja kofod Tr nede numse i g r', ' pernillepedersen Nice', 'Og ben, s de g r ondt. Det er herligt', ' pernillepedersen fremskridt', ' cindii ', 'Killer emma savory', ' mkats ', 'Great vid I invite you to watch my site. Enjoy ', ' juannasousa s o estes q te falei ', ' marciaraquelfreitas e morro a seguir ', ' aliciamarie ', ' isabellaimarques', ' ', ' iamesraamohsen lazm a mlhom kolhom isa .. e mlelo save ndk w nb a n mlo isa', 'Mara', ' j.hudding', 'Wonderful', ' didyrg ', ' lissyleonr a practicarlo ', ' zofiaestelita siiii desde ma ana', 'Need tighter pants', ' nele.gll', ' jungle wellness roma se po fa U f ', ' esse n se p vede ', ' jungle wellness roma ', ' jennier next time we can use the step for hip thrust ', ' mennahossam المره الجا ه ', ' lace.tm yes ', ' iamesraamohsen bokra isa n mlo ', 'Is this the same as using weight lifting ..looks the same but u use a machine..looks cool gotta try it this way but looks just the way I do my work out', ' spring tyme', ' itisajeng', ' keythe ', ' make up fanatic the video is sped up a bit for time s sake ', ' yaninmqz', That's a pretty gym to work out in , ' marquez ', 'Those shoes ', diva xo I'm such a shoe whore. I can't stop jocking her shoes. Lol sjmommy rahksanuh , ' juliakaplun that s wild I m ready for it.', ' youdontevenknowmethatwell ok got it. Thank you. I m watching doing and learning', 'Me gustan sus tenis lindos', 'Una guerrera con mucho coraje a lograr sus metas', ' lizz baem ', ' ', ' GetYourGoals', ' louis r.cake leg day ', ' evallinas oh my good Yeees Pero em morireee', ' maria piernas piernas', ' chloeclochette ', ' ', ' yaninmqz', ' ', ' alyssaa gallagher', ' lemsiie', ' mira martamatilla ', ' elle beadle follow dis page ', ' z.r.z.z', ' melissaxarends', ' leegofman', ' dei.r.dre', ' yyaannkkss OMG yes', ' zeemusiqq we need to try this', ' man onb', ' emmanoteboom', ' jasmyne ', ' megan lynam next time we go Hahahaha', ' je.suis.sophie', 'Lol ari zashae', ' oceanjadee may have to straddle the bench next time ', ' jessicaeckel that looks painful ', ' summer ', ' a alvz rms', ' didi alpe es un ejercicio buen simo Y tremendo pivon ', ' guiilleemgf vaya peligro estas hecho tu, suelto x el gimnasio xD', ' anna virgili these would kill the hamstrings', phillipas hair and makeup ness gets fit YEP we can confirm hahahah I'll get you on these on leg day Pip... aka tomorrow , ' didi alpe si soy s per manso ', ' didi alpe si soy s per manso ', ' blondandfabulouslyfit', ' msuileten ', ' daianuccia trebuie s facem si noi ', ' msuileten eu pic jos ', ' daianuccia nu pici ', ' crystal cochran kerlin fmserna', 'Look at that butt and thighs goals', ' ovobabes.sam', ' riza paramita', ' ', ' inaa have fun ', ' kvietelaitis ', 'I freakn love you ', F is great. Just find it funny how years ago they called out the two top Crossfitter claiming they'd beat them in some competition they host. other crossfit athletes went instead and destroyed F in their own game. Lol , 'This is awesome I have asthma as well and weight training was the answer for me It s hard to build endurance with breathing problems. You look like you are having so much fun ', 'Goals', 'Running is still so hard for me I ll take weights any day ', 'induced or endured ', 'Lol the silent centering woo woo is literally me. You described me very well. I loved the podcast.', 'Mmmmmmmmm', 'Where is the suit on your story from ', ' missmeganvk same here girly Especially long distance running U f u d ', ' nancy cardenas I m the same way ', ' staffordbrothers U f U f U f ', 'I love F I ve been living in Australia this year, which is where it started Such a cool idea and I love that it s only minutes out of your day', 'Hey Amanda I sent you a DM Hope it makes your day and mine also, loved reading this story Cardio is death ', I have exercise induced asthma do HIIT workouts x a week including my regular lifting throughout the week. I feel like it's not getting better at all. Any advice for someone who's stuck in a hole or what feels like a hole lol , ' ', 'Awesome ', 'You have motivated me to embrace my minutes of Tabata at the end of my workouts ', 'I just started kettlebell training this last. It s a great total body workout ', 'They need to open some up in Houstonnnnnn ', 'Hey nice work ', ' ', 'Yaaassss girl I go to F Newport Beach This gym is AMAZING ', ' madloveee for your breathing problems please read the above lol', 'Panthers is awesome ', 'Beautiful', ' ', 'Killing it ', 'Ah so happy for you girly ', 'Love your outfit ', ' ', 'You rock ', 'Feel the ', 'Yess girl it s all about what works for you ', 'How expensive is it This sounds perfect, but I ll probably need to budget it in ', 'exercise INDUCED asthma ...', ' ', ' kfitvx what are you referring to ', 'In a world where we are told we are perfect the way we are and that we should never change... this is refreshing. Asking hard questions growth. Thank you for this ', ' ', 'Gorgeous ', ' ', 'We re your parents beavers gurl Cuz DAAAAAAAMMM ', ' life.of.coco ', ' ferdillers very intelligent too. Not like the other ones. She has looks, brains, drive...', 'Pull that tit out', 'Beautiful ', ' noha.fattouh i noticed that Lots of wisdom behind her words. Love it ', 'Always on ', 'There ARE circumstances where, Amanda, that is totally false. Surely the child is not to blame for belligerent criticism from a drunken parent. Other forms of violence directed at us is not our own fault, etc.', 'Charme assim', ' daniharton why would you not care what other people think of you Sometimes they show you a side of yourself that you may not have uncovered seen before. It s not until you have these type of conflicts confrontations that you reflect and realise how you ve been being in the world. A different perspective is a chance for you to grow. Sometimes they re right, sometimes they re wrong. But you should at least ask yourself that question before brushing it off as it s got nothing to do with me .', 'Love your outfit. Where can we find it ', ' amandabucci thats so relevant issue ', 'nice', 'This is so true Blame gets no one anywhere... own your mistakes and better yourself... thanks for this amandabucci ', 'Goals ', 'Wifey', 'Beautiful', I'm impressed with your maturity , ' U f ', ' ', Love it. Thanks amandabucci you're really so inspiring , 'When we get hurt, it s all caused by the way we choose to react to the situation No one makes us feel certain feelings, we choose to interpret those feelings from certain words or actions. We change our mind and our whole mood changes love this post ', 'Your business and fitness journey is a big inspiration for me I love for what your standing for and the knowledge your sharing thank u ', ' kiyurius.words', 'Amazing', 'that caption is such a joke considering you never take anyones feedback into consideration. maybe you should take your own advice. d', 'So pretty ', 'Cute ', ' ', 'Preach U f ', 'You are the epiphany of CLASSY WITH SUCH FLIPPING BEAUTY ', 'Saw you and briandecosta this weekend and missed out on asking for a picture and some chat time Event was awesome', ' amandabucci hey girl Do you have any videos or tips on how you had paragraphs and spaces to your Instagram posts Can t figure it out lol', 'Yes girl ', 'I gotta put you onto their podcasts. Heard her on andyfrisella it s the only reason I follow her. nikirou ', ' charlesjbaxter I started following her ceej', 'Nice dress babe', ' ', 'Listening as I work in the studio - love andyfrisella s podcast but it s especially awesome Yu guys talking about the feminine perspective. Thank you ', 'You are such an inspiration Amanda ', 'You crushed the FBS social media panel , I know we all got something out of it ', 'You re adorable ', 'Thanks for the takeaways going to apply them as I continue to get more strategic. Heard you on andyfrisella s podcast loved having a smart, successful, articulate woman on the MFCEO project. ', ' words specific, intentional, unique, authentic, respectful, and appreciative. Your captions are gold, Amanda.', 'Gorgeous girl ', 'Always so pretty love ', 'Beautiful ', 'You were just in town Just found you from mfceo podcast. I ll be checking out your podcast too. Be yourself has been a little intimidating till this point but working on just showing that instead of what I think people want to see. Thanks for the great info', 'You CRUSHED this interview So genuine and speaking from ur heart ', ' ', ' amandabucci when you move to LA that mos will likely be forever ', 'I absolutely love this I ve already made some amazing friendships from having this fitness account the girls I ve connected with are so inspiring and motivate me on the toughest days', meryemh h this is how I'll get people, you'll like it , 'I love you re new podcast with Marshawn ', 'Seriously love the video question and answer That was great ', ' joselgomezjr salty gypsea shiftenergetics shaenastabler beccapeterson ', ' alexnovicov yes And you will be interesting to anyone you show interest in ', ' amandabucci Your content is killer Amanda, keep it up', not that i didn't listen to you but besides that i love driving with my leg like that. Guess it aint so weird lol , ' brittani.evans', ' lowlaw I was thinking about how that driving position brings me endless anxiety hahaha U f a', ' annieroseholmes an it brings me comfort lol', lowlaw deep down I'm everyone's over protective mom and stuff like that triggers me , ' annieroseholmes oh i see . But than again maybe i lack that instinct and just do it to be comfy n not safe.', 'Thank you for this advice. Was actually thinking about this specific subject all day', ' ajschechter', 'I love this post Thank you for sharing ', 'Its a strange and very human thing to over complicate a simple thing like communication. You hit it on the nose.', ' amandabucci great advice. Question What are the settings to upload a video HD on Instagram Every time I do it the video turns into a low quality video. Thanks for everything you post. ', 'So simple and so true. Love this ', ' jwhite well said ', 'You are radiating happiness in the first photo You have grown so much in the last year and a half. You continuously inspire me with your brilliant mindset. You are one of my favorite influencers Keep on keeping on, girl ', 'Holy craapppp i was following you way back when the bikini prep was happening in your apartment before moving in with Caryn. Hahah i have freaking LOVED watching you grow mamaaa ', 'Super progress love you', 'Cheers to healthy balanced living ', 'Love pescience I can only use the vegan kind now because of gut issues, but I have my cousin and younger brother on their protein as they are trying to gain weight and strength for sports ', 'Do you still eat the low carb wafles sometimes That stuff was legandary. I loved your prep series i think thats when i was about to follow you on social media ', changbinadamchoi she's vegan now , ' magdabanas jeez', 'nice profile ', 'You look great right now as well ', 'You look better now, Amanda ', 'Come. To. Daddy ', 'So freaking crazy it wasn t that long ago Love you Amanda you beautiful radiant lifestyle fitness-ing babe you U f u d ', 'You were beautiful then and you re beautiful now It s your heart, passion and joy that make you beautiful. When I think about self love, you re one of the first influencers that comes to mind - because I don t have a super lean physique, even when I am at my smallest. I have curves And your body to me is such a beautiful female body - and you got there by choosing health and happiness, but still maintaining dedication and hard work. THAT is inspiring and THAT is beautiful Keep doing you girl ', 'You look healthier and happier. Found you on andyfrisella podcast. Keep being you ', amandabucci loving your content and how genuine you seem I feel like we're already friends lol . Question for you - what was your reason to converting to a vegan diet u d , 'Wow ', ' camilocogua', 'Tried it loved the choc not so much the vanilla ', ' wasifkh', 'Great job done with this page. ', 'I love reading this just to hear your funny quirks like buttuh I love it Your hard work and dedication even though you ve dialed it back it still very motivational to me', 'That was your best look though amandabucci', 'Amazing shape u d ', 'Dam that s a big bruise on your right leg ouch hope it s not to sore ', ' amandabucci I hope this doesn t upset you, but you look amazing and beautiful now. And, in your earlier pics you look sickly. Just saying. ', 'Would you recommend doing a bikini comp if it s something you re interested in I m toying with the idea but I m honestly just afraid of losing my boobs and them not coming back after for some reason ', 'You are beautiful and glowing in the first picture Your posts are always so meaningful and inspiring ', 'Awesome, beautiful body', 'Looking absolutely amazing now and before ', ' ', I miss bikini Amanda lol. But I like how you have evolved and the things you are doing in the fitness community. The impact you're making is huge because now you are doing it for you and others. Stay cool . , ' ', 'Wow you have amazing body in that blue bikini you look really really good damn', It's been so amazing watching your growth such an inspiration always , 'I juuuust added that color leggings to my align collection U f Love love love the new colors ', 'Love how you have transitioned fitness into a lifestyle and while doing so showed the everyday women how she can too. Love your work Amanda. xx', 'Now that s a beautiful face', 'gorgeous', ' amandabucci all of the above because I don t even know what you mean by an email list ', ' vincepopovski', ' ksmith ', 'Nice talk at FBS amandabucci', Let's see ....yes and ...omg too Might as well add , to it too workin on it , 'You look gorgeous ', 'www.ninjasocial.org if you want to turn your insta into a goldmine ', 'I need to work on all of them. Thanks babe ', 'I need to work on all of them. Thanks babe ', 'Thinking , , and will all be key starting points Made the decision this week to re-commit to my personal training business, both getting more clients and hopefully at some point even branching out to online coaching and having my own website You are a big inspiration to me will all you have done in expanding your businesses - would love to get involved with FOCA at some point if possible ', 'you are right dear percent right dear', 'Danm she s fine U f ', 'Email list...like yesterday u d ', ' bossladiesreferral ', ' bossladiesreferral ', You're awesome , ' ', 'GOLD ', ' michelsantiago o o esquema do furo no pneu que te falei, a corda dura muito mais tempo', ' helderbiottulfe eu vi', ' renatogamboa renesoriano ', 'Whaaaayour in carlsbad ', 'I would love to meet u ', ' ', 'Clearly the video was edited she was pulling a truck behind her ', 'Just listened to the podcast. Loving Bucci Radio more and more each episode ', ' dadgoals', Started listening to your podcasts while I cook at work and I can't soak up enough, keep em coming , 'Mad respect ', 'Role not roll .... amandabucci ', ' ', 'we love sprint training that s an amazing sequence.', ' ', ' lourx fit', ' ', 'Was he dragging a ford festiva tire ', 'Great post ', 'Nice', 'Amazing job keep it up ', ' ptrickfit thissss is what she was talking about It s not about followers and likes ', 'Oh. And HOW are you writing these long-form posts Can someone tell a goon so EYE can emulate Thanks ', ' amandabucci thank you I listened to on if your business you turbe videos about going into the next bracket of income and that there s a break through at each level. How can I learn more about it. And who was the business coach who told you about it ', 'I love how real you are You should incorporate into your program no timeline deadline market it as more of a lifestyle revision workout. Showing people how to workout and incorporate the things they enjoy into their workouts', How to eat to fuel their body of the time, and enjoyment, rather than clean vs. bad eating mentality. You and briandecosta keep on rockin' the game , ' fitbycrystalmonique you are so right about that I need to do that more and live out loud. Step out of fear ', 'Endless', 'Love the openness and authenticity in your post Just found you from listening to your epic interview on the the mfceo project podcast. You killed it ', 'Great post and pic ', 'love this so much ', 'YAASSSS PREACH QUEEN ', 'Beautiful ', 'Love it Cheers to the REAL impact of making a difference in people s lives ', ' ', ' imogenbrazil', ' mainstreetproductions', ' ', Very fascinating insight amandabucci I heard you discuss that with andyfrisella and it's given me a new perspective on what I'm putting out there into the instasphere. To me it seems like a case of short term ego boost vs. longer term brand building unless you JUST wanna be a model . keep on doing you and I'm definitely listening to more of your podcasts after your interview on themfceoproject , 'Well said ', 'This is the photo shoot I wanna do brittenglandsnell we need a beach ', 'Love this post. Listened to your podcast with andyfrisella and it was Amazing Thank you. You are such an inspiration ', 'Made sure to save and read another time and I am glad I did. This is amazing loved this. Currently listening to the podcast with Andy when I can here and there busy gal but it s soooo good ', 'You actually read my mind I ve been trying to do this myself but struggle with everyone s craze of sharing their bodies There s obviously nothing wrong with that , but it s so great to know that someone as influential as you tells me that there s still a place for the people who like to focus on content rather than body photos. Your captions are so well spoken. I love your page and YouTube channel, thank you for all the booommmmb content ', 'Yes All about intention ', ' amandabucci I love this post, and I have been struggling with this so much as I am trying to grow my brand...I get more followers and more likes the more sports bra pictures I put up over the quality content I put up that is meaningful about my own personal journey. I needed this today, and appreciate your powerful words and your influence ', amandabucci how do you deal with people who don't know you saying you are inauthentic because you're growing as an individual Just watched your latest YouTube. I'd love to hear more about how you handle it and stay authentically you even while you're growing. Side note to everyone who watched and claimed inauthenticity- how could it be authentic if shes pretending to be the person she was years ago People don't want to see you change because that makes them question why they are still the same. Proud of you. Would love to hear some tips on how you stay so strong and positive. , ' fitbycrystalmonique this is so interesting.... Thanks for sharing this I don t post any pictures of me and it s been on my heart that I really need to. Seems that people like and connect w others more when there are actual pics of them ', ' jessplubell YES, I always feel awkward but I ve been letting go and just being MYSELF. I want quality connections and you cannot create those opportunities without putting yourself out there and being present ', ' alignwithalli thank you girl vid in weeks is about that actually I honestly just had a massive realization of the fact that that s bound to happen and it s completely okay. It can t let you stray from your truth even if it stings.', ' stewartstrength U f f ', ' essentially haley aye thank you ', ' lozanostrong not a right or wrong answer. Do it if it fits your brand, but don t just do it for ego. If it s intentional and purposeful go for it ', ' xokaitlynjoan I m not deleting it or anything but just going to put everything on the main channel from now on ', ' karinagabriel we will be opening up to all kinds of entrepreneurs in the next round of influencer academy my low price monthly program just launched and it includes all entrepreneurs ', ' amandabucci can t wait for this video. I m feeling like I m almost to the point where I ve accepted that people may call me names, but only I can be the judge of my authenticity truth. Glad to hear that it s ok if it still stings though we are still humans . Thank you for sharing your story and commenting back I m a big fan of Amanda . Growth is beautiful ', 'Listen to the podcast with andyfrisella so awesome thanks', ' U f ', ' tulum is the best', 'This is exactly what I needed to hear You are so inspirational ', 'Wonderful ', 'I think this is so awesome because as we are all individuals and unique, we all share common thought patterns and questions about life and how things are ', 'One of your best photos ever congrats', 'Love this so much AND the , person to love this ', 'Thank you for this Amanda It s taken me years to wake up and realize that I am what I am, that s all that I am and there is NOTHING wrong with me. Always great to have a reminder of the same from someone striving for the same XOXO', ' ', 'Love this ', 'Seriously this caption is everything ', 'You have been one of my top favorite fitness business ladies that I continue to go back to for motivation inspiration because of your rawness growth in each phase of your life that you share You rock Amanda Thanks for being one strong introvert willing to put yourself out in the world making it a better place ', 'Gorgeous girl This caption is ', 'How are you a CEO Aren t you just self-employed Not saying its still bot something to be proud of just confused by use of the term CEO.', ' follow us', ' maria.nunezvasquez', 'Yassss - once I became unapologetic about who I am, my world changed', 'nice page, check us out ', 'Your swimsuit ', 'Awesome style Keep it up ', 'Love it', 'Always looking great Amanda', 'Wow', 'You re so radiant ', 'Thank you for the encouragement. It definitely takes courage to be vulnerable and authentic.', 'Bucci, you just keep getting prettier u d and one more ', 'Babetownn ', 'www.sprstarmerch.com Major Fashion ', 'Love this message you look amazing', 'Beautiful', 'Just finished listening to your episode of MFCEO.. one of the best guests he has had so far. And I listen to them all... Thank you ', ' ', 'Haha damn so I saw you while I was there and thought man, that chick looks just like Amanda Bucci. Then I ordered another margarita.', 'Such a cute bikini ', ' ', 'Beautiful ', 'Yes girl ', 'Where is this suit from amandabucci so cute ', I looove these photos you've been posting from Tulum U f , 'Love this ', 'Love it', 'Amazing photo', 'Hello', ' faithmiletello I believe next week ', 'Love this place ', 'Hahahaha I love this ', 'Beautiful U f a ', 'Beautiful', 'Love this shot Amanda ', 'Lol the classic hand holding pic nailedit', ' annaleighkoch', 'Is that a cabana boy or brian ', 'Cool pic love it amandabucci ', 'Bootylicious ', 'Hahha ', 'Girl the booty gains are real ', ' amandabucci what made you take this pic ', ' shibibmamaludin a shot like this ', ' cescalouise noted ', ' cescalouise problema lang mas malaki pwet mo kesa dito babe ', 'Incredible amandabucci ', 'what a picture ', 'Hi u d not sure what the best form of contact for you is but i sent you a DM ', 'Girlllllll ', 'Such an amazing shot ', 'Caption made me LOL', 'Lol over in the gondola ', 'Check your DM, we would love to collab ', 'Oink oink', 'nice page, check us out ', 'So perfect', 'Amazing love the pic ', ' ', 'enjoy xx', ' ', ' hummingbird ', 'Saw on your YouTube you interviewed Steve weatherford for your podcast. When is it being posted Thanks', ' sharonsstowe ', 'So cool babe I love the song YOU ROCK GIRL ', ' ', ' sofia.panayides yayyy ', ' jmr ', ' sofia.panayides add to ur Spotify if u use ', 'Makes me shocked Great choice of pictures...', 'Ure a stunner', ' miklosmalek', ' amberdashli ', ' leagueoflyons ', 'Una canci n muy bonita con un videoclip hermoso', ' ', ' gonzalezalbelojorgericardo muchas grac as ', ' michellecohen ', ' lolomayhew Love it ', 'Kick ', 'Love it Lauren - great job ', You're literally incredible , 'Beautiful voice, beautiful music - ', 'Awesome post ', 'Always good to help.', ' gaaba thanks ', ' perozmichael ', ' sharonsstowe learned from the best, Mommy ', ' lolomayhew You welcome ', ' ', ' afm. ', 'Trully stunning work What s the inspiration behind these Amazing.. fhidayani . Thanks', 'Nice team', 'Cool team there ', 'Great team', 'Squad goals', 'Great lolo glad you enjoyed it', ' danhealemusic for realz', ' koni music yay ', ' prettypinkmusic thx ', ' fhidayani charity for the Veronicas House these are all the celeb athlete volunteers from dinnerwiththepros ', ' imlukemusic ', ' k bien', 'Great ', ' techno.germany ', ' pedro.elizalde. ', 'Wish a girl would call me a stud, lucky dudes lolomayhew', 'Selalu jadi berlian di tengah-tengah siapapun dan dimanapun...', 'SDFH ', ' ', 'Moment captured..... You are absolutely incredible love. ', 'Great picture ', ' ', 'You my dear are PicturePerfect ', 'nice I like that too but I seem to be more into nature stuff. Its amazing what comes to me when I am just sitting in a park just watching. I could tell u some stories lol. have a great weekend cheers ', 'Miss you photo princessa', 'Very Nice', ' ', ' ', 'Perfect girl', 'kuota murah meriah kak. cek ig kita ya kak ', ' lolomayhew great ', 'So pretty I love ', ' ', 'What a beautiful eyes Great feed ', 'Mi piace molto', 'You are so beautiful,Lauren I love your beautiful hair I love your beautiful eyes You are a breathtakingly gorgeous princess I love you', 'Love this', 'Simplicity Cuteness in Abundance', ' ', 'Lovely picture ', 'Que imagen d una mujer hermosa de la ma ana ......', 'Perfect look.', 'I love the pure natrualness of this photo. naturalbeauty whoneedsmakeup', ' fun size thankssss', ' koni music ', 'Wooooooooooow', 'Wppoooooooow', 'Terrific', 'Very very beautiful beautiful ', 'Attractive', 'Soo pretty charming', 'Stunning', 'Nice pic , pretty lady ', 'Wonderful ', 'Good morning ', 'Que hermosa eres', ' U f f Lovely', ' ', ' alioriod awww thx ', ' lolomayhew tnx im iranian', ' ', 'Great work ', ' foboolking ayush thank u ', ' alioriod ', ' ', 'Great Track ', ' keepinitheale official ', ' afm. ', 'Amazing track ', ' lolomayhew for sure ', 'added U f ', 'Nice track', 'This beat is awesome ', That's unreal , 'Wow that is amazing Lolo', ' ', 'Love the lyrics ', 'Me puedes seguir en Instagram siiiiio', 'Arttt ', 'Dopppeee', ' U f a U f a U f a ', 'Awesome pic', 'Amazing', 'Love it', 'Lovely picture', 'Very nice', 'Love this art', 'Nice ', 'Universeeeee', ' karstensollors yupppp', ' prettypinkmusic me too divyamchaudhary', 'Mmmmmmm ', ' lolomayhew thank you', 'The universe inside of women', 'Amazing art', ' ', 'I like your Pictures ', '.... life it to dream.... Nice Pic', 'Thank you ', 'Beautiful ', ' ', 'Beauty ', ' suedesocialmedia ', ' divyamchaudhary alwayysss', ' tjradwayrockermusician thank u ', ' mat ne U f f ', ' steveleung ', ' lolomayhew ', ' pedroeer ', 'This is wonderful ', 'That looks class ', ' danhealemusic ', ' joeystux ', 'In love , good edit', ' ivandelacruz ', 'This is dope as fuck ', 'Awesome pic ', 'Ese es mi estilo que se vean lindas pero rockeras.....', 'Very nice', 'Artistic pic', 'You are so beautiful and gorgeous,Lauren Stunning beauty You are so talented and awesome and so hot I love you', 'Action shot ', 'I like your Pictures ', 'Very nice ', 'You are simply amazing', ' futerisfemale and the future is NOW ', 'Beautiful ', 'Changing the world Lolo ', 'Prefect ', 'Oosum pic', ' ', ' ', ' U f U f U f ', 'Dope', ' ', 'Thank you ', ' ', 'Love the music ', 'Rocking pic', 'Great picture ', 'Mmmmmmm ', 'عالی', 'Great picture', 'Wooooooooooooow', 'Great picture ', 'Excellent', 'Terrific', 'Adorable', 'Attractive stylish gorgeous wonderful', 'Stunning', 'Fun shot ', 'Nice art', 'Art indeed ', 'Wow babe You are amazing ', 'Nice shot ', 'It was cool ', ' drodrinkofficial U f f ', ' ivandelacruz ', ' nikita fidel ', 'Pretty cool ', 'Dope video', 'Bellissima musica e non solo', 'Amazing video with great beats', ' ', 'You suck', ' ', 'Can you play an African song at any of your parties', 'Nice song .', 'Vocals are verry Nice ', ' ', ' nice meeting blake and you Seriously talented ', 'YAAAAAS ', 'Nice', ' SuperCool', 'That synth ', ' tacolicioussf ', 'Cute AF', ' wiceshye ', 'Beautiful ladies ', 'Thats wats up Woot woot', ' ', ' ', 'Nise girls and Nise pick', 'Cute Pic Dear', 'Looking ', 'happy people lolomayhew', 'I hope you had a great time in SF, my city by the bay too ', ' pope models nice ', 'I Love you bayb', 'Nice ', 'Cute pic', 'Fabulous Fun', 'Loving your Stretch WestCoastLeather Biker Jacket ', ' westcoastleather always ', ' ', 'Hotties ', ' both of you U f ', ' bobbrownnnn ', ' w.o.s.h.s u d u d ', ' tjradwayrockermusician U f f ', ' mat ne u d ', ' ', ' ', 'lovely bookends lol...have a great one cheers ', ' dmarkprice ', ' blakejamieson ', ' ylmaz ', ' ', ' zachtreister ', ' ', 'Very Nice', ' capadana ', ' ', ' ', ' matthfawcett dude, it was so dope Wish you were there Thank you AGAIN for introing me to taffy b He s a ', ' ', 'Queen Lauren You are so beautiful and gorgeous Stunning breathtaking beauty I love your beautiful voice I love you', 'In her home ', ' ', ' eres genial', 'Action shot ', 'Sweet girl ', 'You are fantastic Gorgeous and really cool I enjoy following your journey ', ' iamsammyporter looking good babe ', 'Thank u so much ', 'Complimenti per tutto', ' wifeygoals', ' ', ' U f a ', ' glow head lol', 'Classy Sexy Elegance', 'i just love your music', 'Complimenti', 'Awesome ', ' supernatural spn thevampirediaries tvd vampirediaries theoriginals to originals iansomerhalder damonsalvatore jensenackles deanwinchester spnfamily tvdfamily tofamily thecw cw tvshows edits filters fandom winchester salvatore mikaelson multifandom omgpage gainpost instagood gaintrick gaintrain', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Gorgeous Love it ', ' supernatural spn thevampirediaries tvd vampirediaries theoriginals to originals iansomerhalder damonsalvatore jensenackles deanwinchester spnfamily tvdfamily tofamily thecw cw tvshows edits filters fandom winchester salvatore mikaelson multifandom omgpage gainpost instagood gaintrick gaintrain', 'yaas she s so underrated', 'yes', 'love her', 'Yess', I'm sure my edits will never be this clean and nice Bravo, you're winning at this screencapping... Best on insta, imo... , ' supernatural.fan account thank u and if u ever need any help with editing just dm me ', huntersfangs You're welcome And yeah, you're always my Go-to when I'm having editing problems... lol , 'uauu ', ' timo ', 'yes', 'Not really', 'Fff xx', ' supernatural spn thevampirediaries tvd vampirediaries theoriginals to originals iansomerhalder damonsalvatore jensenackles deanwinchester spnfamily tvdfamily tofamily thecw cw tvshows edits filters fandom winchester salvatore mikaelson multifandom omgpage gainpost instagood gaintrick gaintrain', 'Just followed it ', ' supernatural spn thevampirediaries tvd vampirediaries theoriginals to originals iansomerhalder damonsalvatore jensenackles deanwinchester spnfamily tvdfamily tofamily thecw cw tvshows edits filters fandom winchester salvatore mikaelson multifandom omgpage gainpost instagood gaintrick gaintrain', 'i love it', 'I LOVE IT', 'Yess', 'Yes', 'I like when he look to her', 'I love her so much ', 'this edit is just ', ' captainwinchesterswan thank you ', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', 'What show ', ' mobinajs supernatural', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', ' kathrynnewton', 'TALENT', ' stelenasdagger thank you ', 'I LOVE THIS ', 'Howww do edit so good ', 'Damnnn', 'This good ', 'SAVED AW TYSM', ' forbesmiles ur welcome ', 'CHILSS EVERYWHERE SAVED OFC', 'Fff', ' supernatural spn thevampirediaries tvd vampirediaries theoriginals to originals iansomerhalder damonsalvatore jensenackles deanwinchester spnfamily tvdfamily tofamily thecw cw tvshows edits filters fandom winchester salvatore mikaelson multifandom omgpage tagsforlikes gainpost likes likes likes followme instagood gaintrick gaintrain likesforlikes follow likeall', 'snickers', 'Snickers', 'twix ', ' supernatural spn thevampirediaries tvd vampirediaries theoriginals to originals iansomerhalder damonsalvatore jensenackles deanwinchester spnfamily tvdfamily tofamily thecw cw tvshows edits filters fandom winchester salvatore mikaelson multifandom omgpage tagsforlikes gainpost likes likes likes followme instagood gaintrick gaintrain likesforlikes follow likeall', 'Love ', 'Like', 'Hate ', 'Love with all my heart', 'Hate', Love her so much, she's my face forever , ' theoriginalsnews omg i m freaking out i cant believe u liked and commented dhhddghdvej', ' huntersfangs hahaha I really love this edit, you know Camille is my fave ', ' theoriginalsnews thx means a lot that u like this edit ', 'I love Cami ', ' supernatural spn thevampirediaries tvd vampirediaries theoriginals to originals iansomerhalder damonsalvatore jensenackles deanwinchester spnfamily tvdfamily tofamily thecw cw tvshows edits filters fandom winchester salvatore mikaelson multifandom omgpage tagsforlikes gainpost likes likes likes followme instagood gaintrick gaintrain likesforlikes follow likeall', 'love', 'Lovee', 'Love', 'samee', 'Love', 'Love, she s my fav ', 'like', 'Love', 'Still waiting on the day when I log in scream my lungs out seeing ur profile saying Follows you ', 'My favorite person on Siesta Key ', 'So pretty ', 'My sister ', 'My boyfriend just said you are so beautiful and should be doing bigger and better things. That should say something We think you are a perfect I also watch your show. Love it. Good job girl keep it up ', ' ', ' sarah lehnen why are you tagging me in this lol', 'Your eyes are just gorgeous', 'This is beautiful ', ' ', 'God has made a lot of mistakes in this world At least he got it right when he put on earth the worlds greatest creation Kelsey Owens ', 'You are such an awesome model Beautiful lady ', 'I like strong women and what they bring', 'Gorgeous ', 'Love it thekelseyowens', She's so beautiful like why can't she be mine abbyhydee , ' ben webb maybe one day ben ', ' abbyhydee ', 'OMG ', 'OMG YESSS KELSEY You are absolutely beautiful and I m so happy that you achieved your goals of modeling ', ' sydney.daniel ', ' arw ', ' anamcalderon who the heck is this guy ', ' bennyb ', ' thekelseyowens awwww i liked you and gbaby together so much', ' mgannon Oh dangggg okkkkk', ' mgannon Oh dangggg okkkkk', ' kc pp', ' shaunakelly oh me oh my ', ' stephaniereidy', 'Finally ', 'Good Because the fact that gbaby thought it was anywhere near ok to get involved with that piece of trash Juliette disgusted me. Two wrongs don t make a right he clearly learned that in the end. Sb you re new man is HOT ', 'I love you guys together ', ' meeshrose what the fuck', 'Shame garrettmiller', ' ccosenzo ', ' le moneyyy', ' kayleegloss what happened to Garrett ', ' ambershopp plot twist', ' emilyohrn hahaha I saw this ', ' csharpe omg Hahaha U f u d U f u d U f u d ', ' csharpe we also missed a Bachelor couple. The crap TV side of myself would have been THRILLED.', ' kelseyrules hahaha, you re kidding.. U f f', 'Still waiting on the day when I log in scream my lungs out seeing ur profile saying Follows you ', 'You need to come seeing Holland the netherlands ', 'Best place I ve ever been to Catch a game at the campnou if you have time. Best sports atmosphere there is ', 'HOWD I MISS THIS', 'I HAVE MY POST NOTIFICATIONS ON FOR A REASON', ' ', ' ', 'Just got back from a cruise to the Bahamas. First time out of the country and I enjoyed it. There will be more traveling in my future. Just not sure when. ', ' thekelseyowens When Is there another siesta keys i love you and am a big fan of you', 'You are stunning ', ' my annacondaaa dont location', thekelseyowens next on your list should be Paris I'm moving there this summer and it's beautiful , 'Nice Spain baby', ' kristyjay lol', ' alyssa.keeler This is def our favorite rooftop on Passieg de Gracia', ' rach johnson Ugh totally is. Let s go back ', ' alyssa.keeler Neeeeed to', 'So pretty ', ' ', ' thekelseyowens Follow me ', ' hillaryhedrick this chick reminds me of you ', ' squiiidneyy Awh thank you ', ' alexandralanasa', 'Ha LINDA e BELAS', 'Legs for days ', ' taygalster definitely not commercial', What's ur snap wanna add u thekelseyowens , 'Slayyy b ', ' cgreenblatt haha thanks Mama G ', 'embracing the tan lines ', 'Stunning ', 'Woahhhh', 'Okurrr Kelsey I see you girl Slay ', 'No cute Kels give me a follow ', 'So pretty ', 'Hi I m such a big fan of yours And I am in siesta this week Could you tell me where you bartended at in the show at that tiki bar so I could it out It would make me so happy ', 'You found your niche and why not ', ' ksenske', 'Beautiful', ' U f b U f b', ' noelle.cain ', 'Beautiful as always thekelseyowens ', ' hallegusho', 'Beautiful picture Congrats on your modeling career. Enjoy CA - pulling for you Garrett to make your love for each other last forever ', ' michaelboltonpics', ' jennacambridge ', ' thekelseyowens you are so beautiful I just freaking love u', ' allisonnuara megebrenn lol hey guys', annette at least she doesn't go straight for the drama and just simply delete it, it's her page she can do what the fuck she wants. You must be jealous or something to be able to creep in her page and notice that shit, get a life of you don't like her don't follow her, problem solved. , 'So beautiful and sweet sexy pictures', ' sdod ', 'Omg thekelseyowens that outfit is everything ', 'Woahhhhh ', ' U f a U f a U f a U f a', ' ', 'Yeassss Loving this boo ', ' ggstoll omg the fucking woat', ' ', ' courtneyjohayes', ' kwilli love', 'come to miami ', ' thekelseyowens did you end up moving to LA Just watched the finale', ' jillayan kwilli Jenna you should get this', 'Why are you sooo beautiful ', ' nicholegearhart ', ' mrsdixon it s a dress from flynnskye', 'Love the dress', 'Nice ', ' ', ' ', 'Too cute ', 'MY LOVES', ' ', ' ', ' suckafree bday idea and those sexy pants', ' abbnels I can attest to the quality of the lip kit', ' annefowler', 'Love this show ', thekelseyowens you are so gorgeous I loved watching you this season...oh to be in my 's again , 'i deadass wish it was warm in NY wtfff', 'Us taylor.j.martin', 'I was at this beach that day You have such a beautiful soul you re my fave on the show thekelseyowens', ' linds.sarah', 'Where are ppl getting the q a from theure live insta stroies right now..', 'Stories', 'Fraudulent Ass Tarik ', 'Love ya lady you re the best', 'Stooooooop. You two are perfect ', ' ', 'MO girls do it best', 'Are y all dating ', 'Cuties', 'What brand of swimwear do you wear like I like there bikinis you wear I want ', 'Are you still with Garrett ', 'Your so beautiful thekelseyowens', 'Love you and the great MTV show love y all big fan for sure ', 'Chloe is messy asfc she needs to mind her own damn business', 'You and xxjudyslow look amazing Be proud of those bodies ', thekelseyowens You're absolutely right about that You're welcome, girl I'll always take up for a girl before I would ever think of tearing them down I love your show and I love how Juliette and Brandon both said you're a very nice person on the after show It's very obvious just by following you on Instagram that you're a very nice person Keep it up The world needs more people like you in it , ' teenslife asquote ', gisparkl I said she dont look like anorexic but I hope she doesn't let the comments of the owners in the model field get to her I just hope she wouldn't harm her body to stay as a model just hope she wouldn't do that to her body then eventually it will get anorexic that's what I'm saying , ' walker erica love you ', 'kelsey u are very pretty can we be friends ', ' sweet celine ', ' its.megssss I know right like I want to die ', ' ', ' thekelseyowens so did I Class of ', ' tatummezosi dare michelle mezosimomma', ' kylemallon I m laughing so hard', 'Envy bodies ', ' thekelseyowens yassss they can jam it grlpower ', 'Righty ', ' ', 'You are seriously one of my faves on siesta girl You and madisson ', Y'all are friendship goals Y'all r so pretty n my favs of the show , ' kwilli yes girl ', ' kaylagortz', ' mtv siestakey mtv umm when is siesta key coming back ', 'Your so pretty oh my god ', I'm so proud of you You never gave up of your dreams and know you signed for wilhelminamodels. You are an example for me. Love from , 'Love this congrats ', 'Gorgeous You are my favorite on the show Not sure how scripted the show it, but love your personality. You go girl ', 'Congrats You deserve it, you are beautiful ', ' thekelseyowens what is the name of the book in your story ', 'Right on girl Your gonna rock this ', 'thats a great quote thekelseyowens', 'Congratulations Kelz you totally deserve it. Are you still going to be on Siesta Keys I hope so thekelseyowens', 'Wait, so are you moving to L.A. ', 'woahhhhh', 'Gorg ', 'So proud of you', 'Gorgeous pic ', ' surfstudga idk how I just saw this. Lol but good for her lol', 'Very vogue ', ' katielucas tina nelli lolololol. Okay.', ' jared.goodwin dreams really do happen ', ' kwilli glamourb', ' kmomot WHAT happened I need a recap', ' iz abella', ' sydneyaklein team garret', 'FIRST OF ALL A PAPER GOT MORE CURVES THAN HER ', ' terinaram Hahahah oh u know I will fill you in next time I see you', 'I hope more of togetherzone ', 'Wow girly look at all the comments you get now I followed you after the the nd episode siestakeyOG ', ' hbishop how do you figure LOL ', ' a upson I have insider knowledge that they don t work out', hbishop that's disappointing , 'I was sooo happy seeing yous back together I love you giys together its true love', 'You look like an animal ... literally', 'You two thekelseyowens', 'Cute thekelseyowens', 'Voc eo gbaby tem chances....sou f do casal ', 'how did it end', ' reneenayy ', 'Hey why wasnt the finale on I have this shit set to record and the newest episode was not the finale ', 'Date again. Thanks.', 'I think you are. But. Yeah. Date ', ' laura line ', ' mariribeiro ', ' asier.garayar U f U f yo todas las noches', 'So true', romanemrsd j'en peux plus , 'Exactly my situation but with my partner, fuck U f dlol', 'Thank you Celeste ', ' carrieranae m e g a n truth ', ' johannahelmerssons ', ' silskywalker', ' amandayoclock it gets funnier the more times I watch it ', ' lottevdb Hahahahahah ze blijft grappig', ' hopew literally me every morning ', ' stacyjina so true', ' ileniabubici muoio ahahahah', ' ', ' paulienvdh love her so much', ' natasanicic', ' ', ' gerdi nwtlx koekoek ', ' irenefiorentini vogliamo parlare di questa ', ' lidiaconlad AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAH oddddddddio lo sguardo ', ' pjjoan melissavicenzo', ' ', ' sharstar. Hahahah U f ', ' ninarichterr ', ' ', 'I prefer yours, Celeste ', ' U f ', 'Hahaha', ' meganlyons oh good. Next time you feel like avoiding your taxes, going back through all her old ones is a GREAT way to waste a couple hours... When I m not available to MP, obvi. ', 'Mig n ste gang jeg laver en krans majlauuth', ' ', ' jess ', 'This chick is hilarious and makes me laugh more then any other account on here monika.s monimiklos evergreencoaching violetmiklos shmichaelkenny', ' haleyogaa she has bulk followers ', I can't deal with these pics.... I'm dying , ' rahilouu Vogue c tait pas terrible mais la c est parfait ', ' ', ' I write quotes, poems, articles, short stories Can you do me a favor Visit my profile and check out my writings BUT MOST IMPORTANTLY, HAVE A WONDERFUL DAY ', 'Brilliant', 'Hilarious', ' colleenmurray the captions though ', ' raphaelzumsteg Justin subi eso a su face ', ' kellyvelaskez ich glaube schon', ' raphaelzumsteg mk que le pasa a la gente hoy en d a ', ' kellyvelaskez das fragt mich meine Grossmutter manchmal auch ', ' raphaelzumsteg ', ' mamaandisaacjae x ', ' ms kortez wtf', ' ingrid ', ' chezham nope', ' lucianoanteq', 'This must be an old picture because he has his stomach covered up in a pile of trash tattoos now lmfao.', 'I fucking love you lol ', 'The struggle is real', ' U f U f U f i so friking LOVE you, woman for always making my tummy hurt for lmao every single time i see your posts xoxo', ' linschy ', I write quotes, poems, articles, short stories Some people say they're good Some people say they're not Can you do me a favor Visit my profile and check out my writings BUT MOST IMPORTANTLY, HAVE A WONDERFUL DAY , ' julieehz DES BARRES DE RIRES ', ' q.slmn love this woman', ' laraiby I shall check out her Instagram', ' q.slmn yesss', ' mommaboochies follow her she s amazing', 'OMG. How do you do this without laughing ', ' illeke.nl ', ' sarahadelyn ', 'Funny girls X', ' lottasuni oh heeelll noooo', 'Sweetie ', ' jennykavo ', ' haleeetter', ' ', ' suicidegirlshopeful', ' ', ' lisa.martin. ', 'You are just so beautiful both of you', ' lauren shaw I d touch ya boobs ', ' I write quotes, poems, articles, short stories Visit my profile and check out my writings BUT MOST IMPORTANTLY, HAVE A WONDERFUL DAY ', ' mallisongary omg we would be laughing so hard ', 'LMFAO', ' rxqweeen you and I ', ' diana ne lmfaooo', ' louwalking love it U f ', ' ilenejessop ', 'Gigi looks like she has a major eating disorder, how sad', ' jno Sissy ', 'The absolute best ', ' saraelggs should we do this U f ', ' U f U f ', ' deadmermaid You d defs have to hold my boobs up, because they don t do that by themselves any more u d Children', ' jennelyn tiu lmao isn t she so funny ', ' littlewingedmonkey next visit', ' shannontayloor', ' ajipa ', 'Nice Photos', ' bibibos ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Congratulations Love it ', ' ', ' chelseaterese', ' roxana.casco jajajjajajjaja', ' chrissyr ', ' lisadickoharrison', ' b.elizabeth.g ', ' ', ' yanismarshall she s famous now Because you shared her xx', ' erika.schweizer', ' samcave she s made it', ' charlottemarycook', ' mccleank ', ' nadasunjka hahah i just saw this', ' todos losdiasdemivida me meo jjjjjj', ' lou ', hon alanperkinson she's true blue love it , ' ashelizadavis so my life ', joooaaannnaaa you're welcome it was hard to find, the song Is perfect , 'It sounded so good and I wanted to hear it so bad so I m really happy you responded to it ', ' jsslay ', ' kayrich.beauty', ' allisonsherburne', ' darceygilbert', ' jd omg U f a U f a U f a U f a U f a U f a U f a U f a how did I miss this ', 'great if you wanna see more instagram vs reality check out my gallery ', There's some tomfoolery afoot here. , ' jessy.nsdk rebecca stu leakesel', 'Fantastic ', ' ', 'Ahaha mintaka ', 'The most honest s ever Love t', ' loulwa music', ' lisamansouri', ' xanderholyfield ', ' ', ' ', 'What is the name of this song ', ' deyf.x me', ' koorslight ', 'mood jordynne madis', ' deelovelylife', ' saracigula qua mi ricordi tu sdraiata nel tuo giardino', ' alessandratin crepo', ' ', ' jilliancharbonneau hahhahaa', ' annarmoritz this', ' annarmoritz this', ' ', you're gorgeous Celeste , ' obiwandanovi', Honestly. You're a bloody genius. I love your posts So Much. , ' andrea holth', ' soullover U f ', ' ilikepens ', 'Tu JAJAJAJ lauragar ', 'HAHAHHAHA DINE FUCKING B JE BEN juliej ', ' andreamdicks thank you for this', ' mulishaville', ' emmadebona', 'Lol dying ', ' ltoatw ja ken haar. Robert heeft haar ook wel eens laten zien Echt hilarisch.', ' robs roberta kkkkk', ' psico mia vissotto hahahahahahahahahahahahhahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha', ' shak mcc', ' munaansari ', ' dyalayounis ', carmendroulez c'est ce qu'on te disait avec la poucave , ' megandaviess ', ' rachelcleo ', station zero official she's f'n hilarious Follow her , 'I am so fucking impressed that you could get into this position. You are awesome ', ' lmbrowne yes quite jealous not yet there despite years of yoga', ' lilly ', 'I celebrate you so hard ', 'Hotter than the original ', ' tunia ', 'Ja', ' sundonnasun ', ' oneheart kids', ' rastallion hmmmm which one is me Hahaha ', ' ainhoaainho no llegabamos ni a hacer eso', 'Haha so kohl', 'Dajeeeeee che ce la faiiiii stupenda U f U f U f ', ' shellstubbs', ' jakupovic selma', ' batgirl. man....my pic on the left is viral again Hate that lol', ' shellstubbs you didn t choose the famous life, it chose you coolAF', ' landc esta es la q te dec a, te partes....', ' beautiful laughing memories never die guckt euch BITTE alle ihre Bilder und Beitr ge an ', ' carlymilianif', ' dolcevita ', 'Du bist spitze ', 'Nailed it.', ' maijatiina ', ' nanigarciamartin ', 'Ja vs. lenamajorm ', ' geecan I may look more like this', ' ambirches ILL TAKE IT.', ' lisavdbor Remember', 'You are very funny ', ' angeledeba', ' tainasusannal T t kannattaa seurata, h nen huumorinsa osuu ja uppoaa ', ' marie.chagnon ', ' gab factor do you follow this chick Hilarious ', ' ibesara', 'Moi la plage .m.m.a ', ' vitoriabfd U f U f U f U f U f ', ' franmcn U f ', ' monicavinlegizbuassalli kkkkkkkkkkkk', ' stacey mad ', ' ', ' mahssucato sereia da pose do lado direito... hahaha... fa o quest o P', ' ammayloo ', ' katiekatiekay sure do The best ', ' s m nth o muse ', ' nhk ', ' liloum ', ' claudiadambeckwolf Guck dir mal den Account von der Tante an. Ich lach mich schlapp.', ' dylan jellis', I'm dying , ' stallgeschichten muss erstmal Augen bekommen und meinen Kaffee. Danach geht s los.', ' karo Zu deinem FB Post Das ist aber auch geil ', ' ', ' U f U f ', morning after party with friends...What I'm at sea I woke up at sea , ' silvia depaoli', ' vivianaclemente oddio muoiiioooooo', 'Celest, your my idol ', 'Hahahahahahahahaha this is amazing ', ' mollymajane lmaooo follow this page', ' indielabrooy', ' ', ' crazypink me on every holiday hahaha xxx', 'Zaza Zaza,', ' heller xo follow her, she is hilarious', ' ', 'You are celestial celestebarber', ' ktsuzannah she is amazing', ' bestcommercialever sherocks fnamazing carsales', ' scoobylu ', ' tonee did u see this U f U f U f ', 'Omg hahhahhahaj. I love you.', ' ceire d omg no. This is a geg ', ' makenziemcanulty', ' christina ', ' nicole ', ' martina.ess gloria cavicchi oddio raga ma l avete visto Io sto morendo.', ' alyshastanford so good ', ' livigatti', ' s jay', 'Best commercial ever ', ' majlauuth ', ' jordynrenae I fucking love her ', ' sarahthuraiya ', ' filou je l aime tellement', 'Mirad esta cuenta Me parto Me encanta la cr tica adem s windfalldew paulablag mariabazankenny albita cloerman gloriaangorrilla', ' marinala hab a o do hablar de ella en Aruscity ', 'These are fucking amazing koorslight', 'me astro bassethound', ' martianglitter ', 'But you are sooo much hotter ', ' saracigula qua io fuori con argo', ' alessandratin ugualiiii', ' marinala esta hecha polvo ', ' windfalldew mucho ', ' jessicaribeiro olha esse ig que maravilhoso', ' ', 'He guy in the backs face ', ' e r empire', 'Nobody can stop us being hot ', ' trishahortin cameepearl', 'JAJAJAJAJAJAJAJ que no que no puedo con esta mujer jajajajajajjaa maria garciag', ' mamaandisaacjae x ', ' dark daisy ', ' sebastos ahahahah cette femme est un g nie', 'Uber for sure', ' lookin good yinz', ' ', 'BeBo s shirt ', 'That shirt ', Happy Belated St.Patrick's Day to you , ' princebebo looks like he just ate a warhead', ' ', ' ', 'Hope you took your mustard', 'My beautiful friend ', 'Clever caption', 'Gotta see that helmet vid', 'Cutie girl ', ' newberrymuffins ', You're incredible And so talented , 'Weird I thought you were in Pittsburgh', 'Caption ', 'Thanks for taking your job to new heights with us, Lynden ', 'Your ADORABLE ', ' ', 'Hi Dm us ', 'Awe I love this photo ', 'Color coordination Love it and both of you ', 'Love this', ' ', 'YES yinz are ', 'Wow', 'Yessssss ', 'Great pic ', ' ', 'AGREE ', 'Caption ', ' ', 'cutie pirate ', 'Y all look so happy Love it', 'Caption game is ', 'thee cutest cuties on this side of the Mississippi ', 'LETS GO BUCS This is bucn awesome ', 'So cute Miss you already ', 'Hottie xo', 'ADORABLE ', 'It also looks like you two had too much Sarsaparilla ', ' lyndenblake and princebebo are the coolest couple in Sarasota FL ', ' scott hardy dude I m so proud of her', 'Love me some Lyn Lyn Cutest couple ever ', 'my favorite people', 'Omg pretty', 'Sheeesh ', 'Love', 'You two make the best couple ', 'Mixed with captain Morgan', 'The face lol lol', 'Yesss Great quote LB ', 'Hair', Christmas service isn't the same without ya Work it girl , ' dpallof ', 'Yazzzzzz', 'Addicted to the grind', 'You literal babe', 'Christmas mama', 'OMG you are GORGEOUS ', 'Happy New Year to you and your family too ', 'Gorgeous ', 'Rad U f ', ' ', 'Aww nice ', 'Goat ', 'Cutie', 'LB You look so nice ', ' jaredbailey that s y all ', 'Beauty queen ', 'Totally Gorgeous and very Sexy Woman with a Knockout Body too ', 'Follow me your a very beautiful woman. You have very pretty eyes you look great. Check out my page its hilarious', 'STOP OMG', ' ', 'Two of my FAVS You both are beautiful ', 'Santa is coming ', 'Adorable ', 'OMG NO WAY ', ' ', 'So beauties ', ' ', 'Time for basketball season . See ya at Ram Way Wednesday', 'You might have one on location next week ', 'Do it LB ', 'B E N R U S S E L L', You're here , 'So pretty ', ' realcoreylong but on Saturday ', 'At POWELL Davis Field lol', 'Always killin it', 'Beautiful ', ' ', 'HOT HOT HOT', 'Is your hand in your pocket Do you even have pockets with those pants Wow. Amazing.', ' jasonraven I messed up my hand in pocket pose again Suppose to leave the thumb out for special effects but UGH', 'SMOKESHOW', 'Go Rams ', 'Looking AMAZING, as always ', 'Killin it', 'Ok fam', 'Heyyyyyyyy', ' ', 'Oh ok ', 'Beautiful as always', 'Great post', 'dope asf.', 'Beautiful emcee ', 'I love you ', 'Looking amazing ', ' ', 'How lovely ', 'Whattttt I did not recognise her She looks so different ', amysdodgen whatt That's her , ' rosario.br yep.', ' amysdodgen she is beautiful, of course, but looks like a totally different person', 'And now season ', So HAPPY there's going to be more of Will and Grace , 'Lucky girl monisha cf', 'Is Debra preggers ', ' they call me ma ', 'Oh,my, wish i.d been there... love from Holland Europe ', 'The best ', ' seanhayes I watched Who Do You Think You Are a couple of nights ago. Just wow You are amazing and inspiring ', 'Looks like Will has a crown in this pic. Appropriate, LOL ', ' ', 'I have nothing but love, for this group You have brought so much, that is good, into my life and I m so grateful you re all back together, doing it again ', seanhayes therealdebramessing eric mccormack meganomullally you're great U f d , ' ', 'Gosh I swear I just love you seanhayes I am beyond thrilled that Will Grace Jack Karen that s really what it should be called because I adore you all equally are back because it s like I m reliving my childhood. I ve watched every episode like a broken record and you guys haven t lost it The day I get to sit in on a live taping would be U f f please never stop... I humbly request another episodes before you guys can retire... is that too much to ask sorry for all these parentheses Love a TRUE fan like seriously...they don t love you like I love you Beyonc voice ... signed Ajae or better yet JUST JAE ...Bisous Btw ur my spirit animal lol ', 'I love it i love it.... Im actually watching both series at the same time. ', 'Yeaaaaaaaaa ', 'Yesssss I luv those guys ', 'Wohooooooooooo thank goodness', 'YES It s like you guys never left. Thank you for making me laugh out loud every week. ', 'I was wrong. God is real and she is merciful ', 'Im gonna need a guarantee through Nov ...', 'YES I love your show ', 'Fantabulous', ' cthompskru Seriously, SO much better', 'Yessss Sweeeet ', 'Yeayiiiii congrats to us all U f ', 'Woot Woot ', 'I m readdicted Congratulations ', ' ', 'Yah ', 'Fabulous Congrats to all ', 'Yaasss ', ' mbriglio ', ' ', 'Yeeeess,congrats so happy', 'You all were a blast on Saturday at Payley Fest ', 'They look the same but mature is crazy how good they all look like ', 'Thanks for all the laughs I too have a high forhead', 'Love it', 'Theg are still all beautiful. Love them ', 'as gorgeous and wonderful as ever', 'What are you guys, vampires ', 'Better with age Still beautiful people', 'And all still babes ', 'U all look grrrreat', ' mauramonroe How can you not love them ', ' keepupwith.ap I still wanna beat your ass scary bitch', 'Still look fabulous eric mccormack therealdebramessing meganomullally seanhayes', 'Yippee ', 'Still amazing and hilarious', 'Gosh. Amazing ...', ' finewine', 'Looking gorgeous still and damn funny ', 'You Megan are so funny, beautiful, awesome amazingly talented', ' ', ' warren diane is the most badass woman in Hollywood ', ' ', 'Beautiful U f ', ' ', Wowser That's some heavy hitters there , 'Damn you got great friends', 'Oh wow i currently watch hard mom and will and grace ', 'Wild have loved to have joined you Fun group ', 'Would have loved to have joined that group ', ' ', 'This looks like a fun table', 'You were so, so amazing in the latest W G Best ep yet in the new season imo...Right on ', 'Now that looks like a fun table wish it could crash it ', 'Photo credit to Matt Gorging Gorbus Schneider', 'GreAt table ', 'my favs in one pic omg', 'Allison Janney omggg ', 'Omg Sean Allison in same photo Love all, BiG fan of you guys ', 'Liked by Melissa Apodaca', 'Omg, Diane Warren...awe', ' toujoursenvoyage they re so great, I love that show', ' meaggiesue', 'YOU FUCKING KILL ME OMG', ' toula ', 'Love to watch out takes ', ' amdmc ', 'I would watch a show with just these outtakes every week over and over', 'Thank you for this thebest', ' ratherbeinmaui U f same Literal tears. They re so funny. True comedy. They remind me of the Carol Burnett Show', 'I can t... ', 'One of the funniest episodes EVA My heart is happy ur back ', 'You guys are life Love each and everyone ', ' lucastreadwell I am crying the one that starts with Grace lmao', 'Give me more ', 'MORE PLEASE ', 'Ha ha ha..i want to go to a taping', ' basaliciousje inaaaaatje', 'Hilarious episode. Truly one of my favorite comedies. ', ' ', 'Thats too funny ', 'Love you', ' seanhayes this is all kinds of awesome I just told my year old son - who is a huge fan - and he flipped out. You The Nutcracker and It comes out the day before my birthday ', 'So creative ', 'Hope there is a book tour ', ' ', 'I hope we can get it in Australia ', 'My name is Maria You are a best actor will and grace is cool programming and good luck with you husband x', 'Y all are so cute super clever creating this Congratulations.', 'Yay on my birthday', Please, Help Be Apart Of Tatum's xa Journey. He Needs Bigger Voices Read DONATE Share n ReasonsNotToGiveUp Disabilities KindnessMatters GodBless n , ' ', 'SEAN THESE NEW WILL AND GRACE U ARE SOOOOOOOO FUCKING FUNNY DUDE LOVE FROM CLEVELAND ', 'Yassss More dance routine scenes with meganomullally and yourself ploise, thanks... ItsAHardKnockLife', I've been watching Will and Grace and may I just say that not only do you look exactly the same as you did in the original but you seriously are incredibly talented. Thank you for sharing your talent with the rest of us. You bring much joy , 'Hey my name is brandon and I m , I don t know if you read these, but it s worth a try... I hope we can talk further about a possible arrangement where maybe you could help mentor me or possibly help my grandpa, mom, and me financially, given I m I have a lot to learn and am open to any opportunity you could provide I also am going to high school in Colorado and have a small job as a busser in a cafe once a week Hope you can help me and my family, anything helps even just advice Thanks, have a great day ', 'Don t start shit with Ellen. You will get the horns ', ' ', 'Hmmm...This Plum is excited ', 'CONGRATULATIONS ', ' U f ', Wow sound exciting I stay tune for that Is awesome I'm happy for you and your boyfriend Scott icenogle you guys must be really excited , 'Mr Hayes do you and Scott icenogle work together', 'Ahhhhh I can t wait theseanhayesfandom', ' carrieanna they are married. ', ' carrieanna they are married. ', 'Can t wait to read it with my granddaughters ', Can't wait , 'Last nights episode, SO funny ', ' ', ' ', Yes sirs. I mean yes ma'ams Lol. Love all you actors politically speaking . Now I won't go there with the other foot in my mouth. Disgusting P.O.S. , 'I just watched your live with Eric. It was amazing love you guys', 'Dang. Missed this. ', ' ', 'Can I just say how much joy and laughter u bring to us Such a release, such a gift You are to us ', ' seanhayes WillAndGrace is sooooooo good ', 'I LOVE yoU so DAMN MUCH seanhayes ', 'Love you guys Just finished watching the entire original Will Grace on Hulu. SO many good times, fun, and laughs Nothing like that program anywhere out there these days. Thanks for all of your creativity and gifts you brought to all of us', 'Love you two ', I didn't so anything. I been right here and haven't moved. Ask all my Stalkers, like this Dude and his buddies. Prove it, remember yaw got Me. They didn't tell yaw because they didn't know. I kind of lied, too them and then completely ignored everyone and well, I had fun. By the Sean, I'm still prettier even beat-up. Tell Red, it's a real long name that ends in Clinical Medical Labortory and have you met, Bourlaug, my.pudgy Mont. Farmer, any Drs or the E.P.A. their all freaking out, avoiding me and running like Hell. ALL, I said, is I AM Ecotoxicologist and all that other stuff. Lisa has heard of JHACO, OSHA, yrs, undercover. Fuck Sean, I am a Monster just look at all the Doctors and Priest's faces. Priceless , 'I missed it', 'What s with that weirdo parkereivjames ', ' jason corri', ' ', 'Watching u now on Ellen ', 'Omg You and theellenshow had me in stitches today. U f U f U f ', 'Can we be friends', 'I watched ', 'Wait until you watch last night s episode sami ann valtri', 'Saw it - it was hilarious The only thing I don 't like about the reboot is the jazzed up version of the theme song. I prefer the stripped down piano only version....', 'Hilarious', 'Lol it was so funny ', 'It was soooooo hilarious Seriously the best show U f ', 'You are most funny I love you Respect. seanhayes', 'My cheeks and abs are sore for laughing so much. Absolutely hilarious episode U f ', 'wait... the olympics started ', 'Thank god for iTunes. German Girl, sat in Tokio, watching her favorite show W G. It s so good watching you guys again Made my day, and made working tomorrow much easier. Yaaaas ', Thursday's episode was hilarious Loved it , It feels like it's been eleven years , 'You are hilarious Your performance slays ', 'This one was HIL-FRIGGIN-LARIOUS Loved it ', 'Love u guys ', 'Love from Puerto Rico ', 'My favorite episode so far. This is the only show that I literally laugh out loud too, they grew up watching this with my mom as a teenager I hope I can watch it with my daughter when she s older. nbc don t you EVER cancel dis again mmmmm k thanks bye', 'I missed it, but will tune in next week tho, sorry guys and girls U f a U f a U f ', 'Yessss ', I love you I'm soooooooooo happy this is back on better then ever , ' saramazz ', 'More outtakes I could watch these all day ', 'I m so happy this is back on ', 'Three Wise Men was priceless RESPECT, Grace ', 'Miss you guys ', ' groupfitness snapgero', 'I love u guys shhhhh...I secretly only watch for you and Eric should be called Will Jack ', 'Hahahahahaaaa i love them ', ' maritislief ', 'Best laugh ', 'Rewatching Grandpa Jack episode and damn you need the Emmy for it ', ' tracylangley', 'Lolololol p griff ', 'These are fantastic ', ' smxo ', ' tipuhknee love them', ' ', ' katquintal', ' .nth ', 'How do you not laught', 'Dying on the vine over here. Hurry ', 'God I love them all justjack', 'Please help me with my campaign to collect money to bring my mother with me, sorry for invading your space, but I am really desperate, my mother needs me uregent,', ' ', ' ', 'Love you All So Happy you re Back ', ' ley sharon', 'I love it So excited ', ' ', Loving the new season seanhayes I must say this season has been the funniest and most enjoyable. You're a great comedian actor. My favourite on W G , 'YOU RE FIIIIIIRRRREEED marisollcortez', 'Hi seanhayes, it s the piano finger girl from work I brag all the time about what a lovely person you are.', I can't wait to see the New will and grace I'm very excited they have returned for a new season , 'The first sentence ', ' ', ' ', 'Para sempre Amo ', 'You guys are the best Love the show.', ' ', ' ', 'Oh my god yes. Yes ', 'My partner and I fell off the couch. SO GOOD', ' U f U f U f U f U f U f U f U f U f ', 'Lol', 'SPOT ON U f ', 'omg I love this ', ' amandakhiri', ' amandavannos the goddamn besssssssss', 'Dude, you are crushing it ', 'Oh she is good that is it ', 'OMG', 'Leslie you did an awesome job', 'Yo lesdogggg you re my hero Hysterical ', ' lesdogggg wait This is so good ', 'Holy moly ', Spot On You're amazing , 'So good ', ' dextien catherine.krafft', 'Puuuuuurfect ', That's good , 'Awesome ', ' rfpantano hannahjott TWIZZLES', 'Love. Twizzles', 'i love a good twizzle sequence brousecb', 'THISSSSSSSS', 'Love those kids ', 'Shiiibbbbsss ', 'Twizzle triplets ', 'Just love her ', ' soco ', ' instashannnn nice ', 'Yes ', 'Impressive coordination ', ' alysho yaaasssss ', 'This makes me happy', 'Love. This. ', 'I think you could be the first three person skate team Winter Olympics ', ' brianjltaylor', ' ruthesamuel I love them so much ', ' ', 'Points deducted for an incomplete rotation lesdogggg ', 'GOE ', 'YES LESLIE AND THE SHIBS ', ' kayleefennell ahhh this is so good ', 'This is the best ', 'No way This is so awesome I hope they thanked you for all the cheering on you gave them Go Team Shibs ', 'Oh how I love thee Leslie ', ' alexmcdermott they got that TWIZZLE', ' ', 'N', 'Why was there no Herb Welch ', 'You guys are the best ', 'This is so cute ', 'Leslie, you stay having your best life U f U f U f ', ' ', 'side by side twizzles ', ' lesdogggg I know you have responsibilities but I need you to get in on this marchmadness', ' ', 'Shibs ', 'Yes to your whole fun silly totally like my sisters and I my whole life song you crack me up Woman U f ', 'A remake and you are Tinkerbelle Yassss ', 'Lol', ' cat svendson kjsvendson', ' queensparkle Leslie needs her own talk show.', ' aprildoggies Oh YES I am sooo with you on that one Maybe she ll let us be guests U f U f U f numberoneLeslieJonesfans', ' aprildoggies Ohmygoodness And I just looked at your page I m a rescue dog Mama too ', ' zeina.yaghi Look at me floating on my board, next to Collin. Floating on my board, next to Collin, on my board ', 'Plis look into playing ninasimone ', 'KraZzzzy lesdogggg', 'The chemistry between you two ', 'Tell me you re bringing the Lucy Gichuhi senatorlucygichuhi s next question, see ya... to life this weekend. You would nail it She rocks', 'Wow, keep it up, love ', 'Aye You make so much U f U f U f U f ', 'She so crazy ', 'You inspire me I was told as a kid that I would never be able to make it in Hollywood because of my complexion and then when I became an adult it was my weight and color.. I ve lost lbs since July and will be moving to LA next year because my faith is strong ppl say I m funny as hell and my personality is outstanding....I can do anything ..I ve embalmed, welded Aircraft, I m an artist , but my passion has always been acting and rappin... I m not going to quit Because I know my worth and my Melanin stay poppin ', ' ', ' lesdogggg when do we see a sketch with you as tink and aidybryant as tonk ', 'Omg colinjost leaves me breathless ', 'lol is that colinjost singing Lmaoo', 'This was so funny ', 'Statuesque ', 'He was the best host ', 'Dang I missed it this past week. I m gonna find it though... ', ' megofjersey I couldn t love her more.', 'You are so bomb ', ' ', ' ', 'Get it, girl ', 'Beautiful', 'Great sketch ', 'Swim', 'Abfab ', 'This was so funny watching you both trying not to laugh ', ' ', 'Yasssssss ', 'Beautiful Go Les looking like the queen that you are', 'Gold looks good on you lesdogggg', ' ', ' sarahvanlandingham jussehoff ', 'I lovvvvvvve youuu lesdogggg', 'You and Sterling almost lost it in that skit when Keenan said something ridiculous. It was too funny ', 'SNL needs new writers.', 'LesDogggg.... Looking good...', 'Best skit ever. You are everything, Leslie ', 'Love this ', ' ', 'Gorgeous', 'Beautiful omg', 'Those costumes were Gorgeous MeowMeow D', 'My favorite skit from last week ', 'My Nigerian sis from another mother ', ' meagangood Very Regal ', 'Power Couple ', 'You look stunning', ' ', 'You ARE the funniest person in this show myfavfemalecomdeian', ' ', ' u d ', 'Great show I laughed until I cried ', lesdogggg ... I've always thought you were hilarious Your special on Netflix has me crying Everytime , 'Love you all . . . the best part of Saturday night ', 'So funny', 'Love', 'I finally got to watch SNL and as soon as I saw you with your phone at the end credits, I hopped on IG to look for the pic and here it is Lol Love you, Leslie ', ' ', 'So good ', 'Loved this episode', 'https www.gofundme.com mreftr-all-for-her', 'Got to be one of my favorites. Looked like everybody was having fun Sterling AND cast ', 'I can t you the best girlll', 'Leslie needs to be in more skits. Can t get enough', Why can't I quit you , 'Pete petedavidson', ' lesdogggg IM ONE OF YOUR BIGGEST FANS But, not in person. you got like ft on me girl...', ' rainarupneja so youuu ', 'he was great ', 'I love you lesdogggg ', ' tom ralphio how d you get in the background lol', We can't stop now , 'Awesome episode', ' chrisreddis what a face', 'The skits were hysterical last night and I could tell you all were having fun ', 'leave it to Davidson to class up the place', ' lesdogggg you give me life keep up the great work and positive influence .. watch episode today via hulu', 'It was a great show ', 'Seriously, the best show of the season ', 'I love your post lesdogggg you are always smiling ', ' ', 'The Black Panther sketch had me in tears ', 'How do I reach out to movie producers to have you play Nina Simone in a movie ', 'Every skit was on point ', 'You really are the funniest So good ', You're so hilarious, god bless you. lesdogggg , 'You re the best ', 'The coolest selfie At the end od the show.', 'Just finished watching,best show of the season congrats to everyone ', 'Great show ', 'I never heard of him until last night lol', 'Good show last night. He was great ', 'Go listen to jamesbaymusic Let It Go off his album It s SO GOOD Actually, that whole album was really good ', 'Please keep talking to us ', I didn't like it, rather listen to Ashley Simpson her music track, ha , ' mariabudney', 'Sounds good', 'Loved his performance Awesome ', 'I had a chance to go to his concert yrs ago.. fantastic voice ', 'Love jamesbaymusic you Les ', He's so gorgeous , 'He reminded me of Bowie', 'I became a fan that night.', 'Check out his Grammy performance with Tori Kelly in . It was great ', ' lesdogggg just saw you on Kevin Saves the World Awesome ', 'I would much rather hear you sing or talk or just stand there.', ' mschermel That goes down as one my all time fave live performances...so incredibly good ', ' kmstkc I ll find it online and watch it like two or three times ', ' lesdogggg Whose idea was that last skit and why Nickelback ', 'He 's already had a Top song in the US back in called Let It Go , a beautiful break up song. One of my favorites. He 's gonna be big.', ' U f U f ', 'Girl yes jamesbaymusic caught me aaaaall the way off guard tonight A great sound, stage presence, and sparkling tops I mean... ', 'Yeah you guys get great performers.', ' ', 'Thank you for all the great videos. ', 'Love jamesbaymusic He s been around for a few years listen to If You Ever Want to Be in Love and he s just going to be bigger lesdogggg You need him in your life, girl ', 'I ve never heard of him but I think I just witnessed the making of a Star. He s got it ', ' ', 'Les is really a real one and so cool and down to earth', 'Watching now in CA ', ' kristenkiasaleh tinafern I m sobbing', 'Ok I m gonna look him up. Thanx gurl', 'Saw him in Boston a year ago. He is goooood', ' lesdogggg you should definitely check out one of his concerts He s amazing jamesbaymusic ', ' lesdogggg I am so in love with you. You make me smile and laugh all the time. Please don t ever change. ', 'I love James ', ' kristenhagan', 'Lol ily', 'Have an awesome day and keep going ', 'At the first sight, I thought it was you in the Black Panther... I was super excited and told my friend Look Leslie Jones She is my favourite cast in SNL But after I said this words ,i realized that I made a mistake This is soooooo...awkward ', 'Leslie why did you only do coverage of the olympics what about the Paralympics ', 'I M THE FUNNIEST COMEDIAN ON HERE. FOLLOW ME CHECK ME OUT', ' lesdogggg Why you so DAMN FUNNY ', 'I m dying omg lol lesdogggg', 'This is the BEST ', ' you need to have your own show commentary the Academy Awards I m dying over here ', ' lesdogggg U f f ', 'Lmfaooooooooo', 'I LOVE HEEEEEER alessandradenoir alextarackova', ' ', 'Can you voiceover everything in life please ', ' U f U f U f ', ' ', ' ', ' britt.gould', ' sarahmorgan oh no not again ', 'Those yo feet ', ' bn vance', 'What s up Leslie', ' lesdogggg you are so funny with your commentary. I think you should live tweet and or voice over comment on daily White House briefing. There are so many comedy opportunities there.', 'Can you please do this commentary when watching the bachelor. Omg. I think my head would explode. U f ', ' mrandmrsdompe yessss ', 'Killed it on Kevin probably saved the works. Hope u are a recurring character. Make me want to put my McDonald s down n work out', ' thesem I might die. I would actually die from laughing', 'why you gotta be cursing like this', ' lilsmurf ', ' stefilo Bahahaha ', ' briliveslove ', ' a curated glow crying', ' l.aurenallan debbielui lucydimascio FJDKDKF HOW FUNNY IR THESE', ' jessicaleigh I love her U f U f U f U f U f ', 'I hope you have a recurring role on Kevin Probably Saves The World ', ' akelsky', Happy International Women's Day. , Yeah it's just like that. I didn't know the soul brother dieid who played in all the 's movies , ' instashannnn leslie does Oscars', ' nacho navarrete cl mi sue o es ver los oscar o cualquier cosa en la tele y vida con los comentarios de Leslie', ' rushekm', 'Is that RayJ U f U f U f U f U f U f U f U f ', ' gilliankmmrr it would be my favorite project', 'HE is Hes a vampire Yes ', 'Honestly, Ray J and Tyrese both always somewhere they not supposed to me so I wouldn t have been THAT surprised.', ' allison moreno bahahaha', real you ain't never lying , ' lesdogggg God I love you You are so funny and I loved your comments on the Oscars', 'He was dope af in The Professional But woman, you re hilarious ', ' jazthelegend lmfao', 'Jeeeeeeeezzz alessandradenoir alextarackova ', ' lolo roberts', 'Did u say ray-j Lordy. Im telling Brandy', 'You were talking about Gary Oldman and I was trying to think of roles where he didn 't have an accent and yeah, EVERYONE, was the first thing that came to mind U f U f U f ', lesdogggg I wanted Daniel Kaluuya to win too. If you haven't seen his episode in Black Mirror, you should. Such a great actor , 'Lol', 'Someone take her tv away ASAP can t be trusted', ' lesdogggg Gary Oldman is an absolute genius ', ' ', ' it true', Can you please host the oscars They'd be entertaining as hell , 'Too funny ', 'LOL u a mess', ' jcaul ', 'Lesdogg yo are my hero and on my who d you hang out with if you could have lunch with anybody you, Tiffany had dish, Oprah, Ellen, the Dali lama, and Elon musk... we got this, let s get it going U f e U f e U f e U f e ', ' jonesme damn the spell check U f u d ', ' jo dayumm yung hexapod', When ready to get married holla back I'm in DC lesdogggg , 'I swear fo God. lOL ', ' staytundfilms ', 'And they always leave people out People have careers and then are left out of the memorial', ' nicolehickox the last one is so funny, you look good you look prosperous X', ' Look how high his pants are... ', ' gbirchie Ben Who ', 'He s the only Native American to ever present at the Oscars ', 'Wes Studi.. indigenous ', Leslie he's a native American actor , 'She does carry herself with dignity ', 'Divorce looks good on her ', 'Ben who ', 'Is it me or does he look like the Jeff Dunham old man puppet ', 'Sweet Jesus. Ben who mademyday', 'Jennifer looking good alright', ' ', 'Girl ', 'Go see Hostiles ASAP homegirl and see the man Wes in action ', 'I love you Leslie', 'Hilarious', 'Hahahaha Ben who . She truly does look good though ', 'He was brilliant in Last of the Mohicans with Daniel Day Lewis and Madeline Stowe. Great movie ', 'Yoooo.... lesdogggg Why I thought that was FredArmisen dress in a mask, doin some sketch U f U f til I started reading the comments Omgeee that was so funny if it was Fred ', 'You need to be the commentator for EVERYTHING ', ' lesueurcourtney', 'I u ', 'I just want to watch her commentary on everything', ' op mist', 'Why the heck don t they have a little table there Dah..', ' firstbornsoul U f U f U f ', ' U f U f U f ', 'That s awesome his movie was amazing ', 'Ha ha Love it.', 'Hahahaha', 'Love you Les When u in Pittsburgh lets kick it lesdogggg', ' shinymegagardevoir checa los videos de sus comentarios de los Oscars Jajajaja', 'LOL', 'Same as age as my Momma, . You go, Mr. Ivory.', ' l.aurenallan that second vid is u hehe x', 'Go Jordan it s your bday, get your oscar it s your bday', 'Hahahaha', ' U f ', 'Frances McDormand put hers on the floor too, but she was FIERCE ', 'Lmao brittany d woodley', 'Girl I was losing my damn mind watching... in the middle of a writers meeting So many amazing women, brown black folks, queers, transpeople etc being honored. So empowered and inspired.', Couldn't be happier omg And yes David is fine, lord , 'Love ya ', ' byudochukwu', 'Lmao', ' bria.woodley ', ' ...... ', ' ', ' ', 'Les you crazy love you girl ', 'Lmaooo dammn girl wtf ', 'Love Peele', 'But his movie..at least the Trailer is terrifying', 'Still have yet to see this amazing movie ', 'Looking forward to black panther having this next year ', 'Most of them did that tho...lol', 'Can you do a live feed next year covering the Oscars They would be so much more interesting with your commentary.', 'She s so beautiful ', 'Can I please be ur nanny', Could she be more adorable I don't think so , 'Awww', 'Oh my adorableness', 'Ugh so much cute ', ' ', ' ', 'Nothing like coming home to our babies one of my fav songs too', ' ', 'Oh my god she is gorgeous Good job daddy', 'Your mini me The sweetest...', 'Sweet ', ' ', 'She s so cuteeeeee', 'Welcome home, dad', 'She is precious ', 'Bom dia N o sei como vcs vierem parar aqui mais eu amo esses beb s', 'What a handsome dad, gorgeous baby shegetsitfromdad', 'So cute', 'It was fantastic. Thank you so much for the awesome performance ', 'So cute omg ', 'Incredible ', 'Damn boo', 'So. Much. Damn. TALENT In awe mrcheyennejackson ', ' melting swoon', ' david michon', 'Yesssss', 'Wonderful ', 'So beautiful ', 'Ahhh. It s been too long since I ve heard you sing Time to put Xanadu on again... and look up your live show schedule.... ', 'Wow ', ' musicaltheatremama', Oh my god I love you so freaking much. I'm so thankful to be able to follow you here. , ' alex rozier ', ' ', ' hannah.cooper ill take it', ' ', 'CHIIIIIIIIIIIILLSSSSSSSSS ', 'Youre the cutest dad ', 'Sort of. Not really', 'Bahahahaha I needed that.', ' ', 'In a weird, kinda, not really way ', ' U f U f U f ', ' honeysuklehustla', 'I wouldn t know Goldcard', 'Hahahahaha', 'Lmfao me with your eyes the cobeysmith', 'Hell if I know...', ' ', ' U f U f U f U f ', ' U f e', 'Hahahahaha Made my night U f ', ' ', ' johnscotbarrowman me either. I imagine they are like tarantula mouths, but not as venomous. The whole concept is unnerving', ' vajazzles', 'Vulva.', 'I couldn t tell', 'Lolll', 'Indianapolis any time soon mrcheyennejackson', 'Just got tickets I m so excited to see you ', 'Don t suppose you re coming to Florida anytime soon mrcheyennejackson ', 'Come to Boston mrcheyennejackson ', 'Need a new CD Will you ever do another with Michael Feinstein One or the other Please', ' ', ' mrcheyennejackson so excited', 'Ahhh let s grab a drink ', 'Both soft Chs', 'I saw you a couple years ago New Years Eve in Orlando. It was lovely If people in Chicago can go, GO ', ' ', 'Emote Boo', ' ', 'Such a great actor ', ' Totally wish I could come see you Any chance you could swing by Edgewater to say hi Haha', 'This drag queen is a HUGE FAN I ve always wanted to see you LIVE Come to NASHVILLE ', 'Love you on Will n Grace ', 'So handsome ', 'Loved the show Especially the Corner of the Sky reference as I was sitting next to my -year-old who I had just picked up from a day-long rehearsal of Pippin. Cracked him up and he s taken it off his list of audition songs.', 'Stunning', 'The same to you and your lovely family ', 'Beautiful ', ' mrcheyennejackson Are you Irish', 'Welcome to our city', ' alexchigas he was n ch cago ', ' marykoos ', 'I can t believe ur at Chicago ', 'I can t believe ur at Chicago ', 'Happy St. Patrick s Day ', ' anacarolinavls simply beautiful. ', 'Have a great show Maybe I ll see you at Navy Pier.', 'I thought kinda green, isn t it .. oh ya ', 'I was down there today ', 'Looks like toxic waste ', 'I was in Chicago many years ago on a business trip from NYU and it was amazing to see the river with dyed green for St. Patrick s Day it was freezing cold that day', 'If You Want To Relax After All Of That Fun, Head Over To The Suburbs To Stay.', 'can t believe you re in chicago enjoy ', 'So beautiful Enjoy it ', 'Wish I saw you here in Chicago ', 'The Wit, right ', 'Tu es mon me mari ', 'Great photo ', 'Come to the UK please mrcheyennejackson The West End is calling out for you ', 'Cuuuuute', 'ORLANDO again soon Bring the bubs to Disney ', 'Ur so pretty', 'Oh, I thought you were going to be IN the show CHICAGO. Actually you would be an AWESOME Billy Flynn, now that I think of it ', 'Congrats', 'Would so love to. Sure it will be awesome', ' analauradellaglio pode estar sendo o meu rs', ' - - - - ', We'll be there. Sorry to miss Laura, but thrilled to see you , ' alexchigas wanna go ', ' alexchigas wanna go ', 'Great', 'I wish I was going to see my crush in person ', 'I try so hard not to judge myself against others. But look at you Very hard not to judge myself so so negatively against you x', 'Good man ', 'Can t wait ', 'Whyyy do I not live in Chicagoooo ', 'Yesssss Can t wait ', 'You look extremely happy here. Like that smile came from your soul. mrcheyennejackson', ' ', ' ', 'Very cool ', That's awesome mrcheyennejackson how did you get into acting You rock , So exciting Congratulations. Can't wait to see the episode. , ' pequelord pero siguen haciendo nuevos cap tulos ', ' adrianarubial si amor Jejeje... toda una novena temporada creo y es igual de c mica o m s que las anteriores ', 'Have always loved this show Loved you in it last night ', 'Saw the show last night LOVED you on it I really hope your character sticks around mrcheyennejackson', 'Always great seeing your work. Best wishes.', 'Congratulatulations You deserve this, not only for being sooooo handsome, but for being a Very good actor with a great carisma...you are a star. Bless you and your family ', 'Dreams do come true ', Where's the original Michael , 'I enjoyed seeing you in Finians Rainbow and at Town Hall so I was looking forward to seeing you on Will and Grace ,but for me the episode fell flat too much heavy handed political humor and not enough Cheyenne.just saying.', 'My heart is beaming for you mrcheyennejackson I love when good things happen to genuinely good people Congrats ', 'So thrilled for you Cheyenne Loved seeing you on Will Grace Miss your smiling face ', 'Wow Fun to see you on tv and say I know that guy ', 'You played Michael omg', mrcheyennejackson it's tomorrow night Can't wait , ' ', 'Can t wait bro ... sureal that I actually watched it live .you did an amazing job man ... ', 'Can t wait to see it Congrats ', 'So much better than the original Michael mrcheyennejackson ', 'Even Debra Messing looks at you with that adoring, awestruck-by-your-gorgeousness gaze.', 'So excited ', Can't wait It's going to be amazing , ' ', 'Seriously cannot wait to see the episode ', 'Yaaaaassss So here for it ', ' ', ' ', 'IVE BEEN WAITING SO LONG FINALLY', 'Weeeeeeee ', That's not Michael , 'Ha, werq dude', 'I think someone s heart will break ', ' Love ', 'Yessssssss', 'Aweeee', 'Cutest actors', 'What a great cast Glad you enjoyed the show, sounds wonderful.', ' mrcheyennejackson I lost my dad years ago, I empathize and feel your pain. Sending you love. ', 'I love you ', 'Your both incredibly talented human beings Great pic mrcheyennejackson', 'So good to see you ', ' joe mantello is the best. I miss being able to go to Broadway shows. There is a lack here in Kauai.', 'sweet pic,,,,hugs both', 'correction,,hugs to you all and so sorry for loss of your dad,,,,', 'Great acting, beautiful production ', ' this pic.', ' belugima mili.gima AHSSS SEASON ', 'Vamos por la temporada Locooo la mejor serie del ', 'mis babyssss ', ' msalisonpill On my first trip ever working as a flight attendant you were on my flight and soooooooo sweet ', ' msalisonpill MINI CLAUDE REPRESENT ', 'awww. and i know that song, evita ', 'Q linda foto ', '.....so you, so beautiful, mrcheyennejackson', ' dyingprayingmantis I just did. Don t tell others what to say. Lol', ' getbouncer you re an absolute idiot. Lol.', '...What happens now, where do I go from here ', 'THIS IS SO CUTE ', 'Song is stuck in my head now. Hehe', 'This picture this caption ', ' ', 'BRILLIANT', 'So young. The instant queen.', ' ', 'VAI DERRUBAR A CRIAN A CARALHO', 'Wow', 'Omg this photo is everything ', 'Evita ', ' SuperDad DefyingGravity Wicked', 'I Evita ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Lol that doesn t look safe.', 'So cute', 'come to brazil', 'follow me please', ' getbouncer lol don t tell people what s safe their own children.', 'OMG cutest', 'What a magical photo ', 'Fearless ', 'Epic photo ', 'I love your family ', 'Good luck You deserve to win asherpaul justinpaulmusic', ' U f e', 'She s lovely ', 'Congrats Justin ', 'Winner Don t stop creating ', 'Looking good, Pauls ', 'Love you guys. Have FUN, come home and have that baby.', 'I still can t believe you re straight', ' asherpaul y all got this one ', 'On right now lets go ', 'Bahhhhh you had our vote yfcfamily soproud', 'Epic performance by kealasettle and crew You re the winners in my book.', 'Congrats, have fun ', 'You guys should win for Best Looking Couple Beauty ', 'Amazing', 'Congrats best of luck', 'Thank you for your music It has changed my life ', Gorge Kudos for creating a powerful anthem that inspires and celebrates the beauty that is within all of us Last night's performance was electrifying , I opened page, consist of my proffesional photo. When you're follow me and like my photos, I feel so happy , 'dope ', 'Aww Sc', 'This is adorable Happy birthday to the woman who gave the world the man who changed my life ', ' hotmom', 'HAPPY BIRTHDAY ', 'Happy birthday Rhonda ', 'WOWWWWWWW ', 'What a beautiful pic ', 'This is beyond beautiful Hope it was happy pandasoorp ', 'HBD pandasoorp ', 'Your momma is YOU that face is YOU justinpaulmusic', ' ', ' I write quotes, poems, articles, short stories Visit my profile and check out my writings BUT MOST IMPORTANTLY, HAVE A WONDERFUL DAY ', ' ', 'Fab', 'Hbd ', 'Love Love Love this music It s all I ve listened to since I saw the movie, the first time, last month. Of course, I ve seen it two more times and taken people with me and tell everyone who will listen, how great it is ', One word. Amazing. Fine, there's more. Talent, Gifted, Inspirational, and much, much more. , 'My favorite album for . ', 'Thank you benjpasek justinpaulmusic for the beautiful songs, love every single one. You deserved an Oscar, Grammy, and all trophies for movie soundtrack. Big Love from Indonesia ', 'Ye olde CD has been on repeat in our car since January th, when my husband picked it up on backorder from the shoppe right before we headed off for our hour drive to our family holiday destination The kids love it, we love it we re a very musical family and hats off to you, sir, and your partner in creation Thankyou so much.', 'You two are so incredible benjpasek justinpaulmusic pasekandpaul You guys never fail to amaze me ', 'Parab ns parab ns', ' jenn baiiii ', 'please go watch my cover of a million dreams It would mean EVERYTHING ', 'BEST MOVIE SOUNDTRACK TO DATE ', 'I ve been playing it in REPEAT since it premiered ', 'Good ', 'This soundtrack means the absolute world to me. Every song speaks differently to me every day', ' justinpaulmusic I ve pretty much followed yours and Benj s careers since you were babies . Just wanted to say how happy I am for your successes and to THANK YOU for all the fantastic music Looking forward to more of it.', 'Fantastic work Guys, You are really cool ', ' ', 'Congrats, bro ', 'My kids and I have spent countless hours listening to this soundtrack- its amazing So thank you for doing what you do ', 'Love it so much ', 'We are absolutely in love with every song on this album... from my year old to my year old... we know all the words and can t stop playing the album Each song is amazingly written and incredibly orchestrated and preformed... and what I am beyond thrilled about is that every single song has just as beautiful of a message Wow. This is what America needs. To be brought back to core morals and values like family, hard work, kindness and love, not judging others, and I could go on and on. THANK YOU I m so grateful for the messages and music that make us all aspire to be better... to reach out and help each other. You deserve all the accolades and Oscars I wish you all the best and hope more songs movies will be written with such wonderfully written music and messages to inspire. ', 'Ditto ', 'They are the best Love them.', 'happy birthday justinpaulmusic you inspire me to become the best composer i can be and i can never thank you enough for that.', 'Happy Birthday Thank you for all the fantastic music that makes my life worth living ', 'Happy birthday You are the inspiration of our generation and we can t thank you enough for your music.', happy birthday thank you so much for all the amazing music pieces you've created. i truly don't know what i'd do without your music-- especially bc listening to dear evan hansen and the greatest showman U f , 'Happy Birthday Hope you ve had an awesome day.', 'Happy birthday Thanks for making such amazing music DEH and greatest showman are constantly on repeat ', 'Happy birthday Thank you for your amazing work on dear Evan Hansen and the greatest showman. I hope you have a great day ', 'HAPPY BIRTHDAY', 'Happy birthday', 'Happy birthday ', 'Congrats on your award tonight You two continue to amaze me with every project you create ', 'congratulations ', 'Happy birthday ', 'Happy Birthday Thank you so much for the amazing music you ve created and the light it s brought to my life ', 'I m so proud of you.', 'you re doing it right', 'No shame in this game ', 'My favourite Christmas movie since I was a child', 'Love this, Love y all Merry Christmas ', ' Merry Christmas, Paul fam ', 'This is PERFECT.', ' ', 'Proper parenting, right there. Merry Christmas snowsnowsnowsnowsnooow', 'And it will stay with them all through their lives ', 'GlAd you got your priorities straight ', Best movie ever, we've watched it twice this year , 'My favorite movie', 'This is a music training tool You got this one right parents Merry Christmas ', 'White Christmas was the first musical I ever acted in. It literally changed my life by pulling me into the theatre world. Without White Christmas, I wouldn t have discovered theatre - and that would be a sad world indeed.', 'Looks like a pretty great choice.', 'Great working with ya ', 'White Christmas is a must for the littles at Christmas Our mo just watched it for the first time ', 'My grandmothers Rosemary Clooney in white Christmas ', 'It was awesome to meet you yesterday ', 'Wonderful news Justin ', 'Ahhh congratulations ', 'Congrats', 'Congratulations ', 'Congrats ', 'yayyyy congrats ', 'Awesome. Congrats ', 'Congrats Congrats Congrats ', 'Congrats ', 'Yay Congrats ', 'CONGRATULATIONS ', 'IN.CREDIBLE Incredible incredible incredible. I ll never get over this music. Bravo ', 'Congrats on the baby Also congrats on thegreatestshowman I loved the music It 's my dream to be a vocalist as part of a musical ensemble like that Never Enough is taking over my life. Thank you thank you ', Your work was incredible. I'd love to be your apprentice ... lyrics and melodies were just flawless justinpaulmusic , Happy Birthday Can't wait to watch the greatest showman in my country too , 'Congrats ', 'Congratulations All the Best wishes for your family ', I'm a great babysitter Congratulations , 'Congratulations So happy for you both ', 'How soon ', 'Break legs, Justin We are so excited for you guys Xox', ' ', ' ', 'Justin, arranged my whole weekend around this moment. Wouldn t miss it for the world Sooo excited. Am almost you-know-what -ing in my pants. And what a cast ', 'Ahhhh a few minutes left, can t wait You guys are truly incredible.', 'That s really cool. Congrats, my friend. So happy for you guys. ', 'What a terrific show ', Wouldn't miss It Fond memories of when you guys were here in St Albert Canada Xo , 'Brava ', 'Congrats It was the best live show yet ', 'Congrats dude ', 'I loved it It was absolutely magical ', 'Really, truly, enjoyed it Wonderful job ', 'I was watching ', 'My wife and I really enjoyed the show. Such a wonderful production with a incredible cast. Thank You ', ' What an awesome, and amazing show It was so much fun to watch ', 'It was awesome We all tuned in here in Seattle Xo', 'Justin We loved it Merry Christmas Beth Thompson.', ' ', We are all watching here And DVR'g simultaneously Break legs , 'My boss is doing the edit Break legs ', 'Congrats Break legs ', 'Congrats brother ', 'Congratulations Honey ', 'Oh my dear friend.... our hearts HAVE found love for you and this shimmering event tonight ', 'Rock Sending love.', 'I can t wait to watch it with my best friend and family Break a leg ', 'Congrats once again justinpaulmusic benjpasek and best of luck I will be watching.', 'Can t wait Justin ', 'The Bowmans will be watching tonight justinpaulmusic So proud. So much joy and love. Break legs one and all. ', 'I wouldn t miss it Much luck and love to you all ', 'having a viewing party ', 'Amen Merry Christmas ', 'The single best Broadway musical and performance that I have ever seen. Thank you for an unforgettable experience.', ' justinpaulmusic bensplatt any news of Ben going to play Evan on the Dear Evan Hansen tour ', 'So grateful to have witnessed that entire special theatrical experience...historic indeed ', ' ', I was holding myself together until I read this because you said everything that I couldn't put into words. , I'm not crying ur crying , 'i feel honored to have seen this man tell this story. thank you for everything ben.', 'Here here ', 'Couldn t have said any of it any better- still in awe at when a surreal experience today was im so glad I was there for it', 'i couldn t agree more. a legend in himself', 'OMG ILY ALL', 'It must feel so gratifying to have taken an idea and translated it in a way that has touched so many people. Congratulations to you for making so many good choices in the material and the team you brought together for this. Am looking forward to seeing where it goes.', 'crying ', 'Thank you Ben Platt, for your amazing gift to the thousands upon thousands of people you have moved and inspired in this incredible role. And thank YOU Justin and Benj for creating the powerful and awesome score, not only for DEH, but all that came before. May you continue from strength to strength as the world awaits what is yet to come from the creative genius of Pasek and Paul. ...a fan For Forever ', ' aryn.lee ', ' nate.arnstein so sad ', 'Here here Amen my bensplatt', 'every time i think i m done crying i see another post from one of you. it will never end, will it bensplatt is a truly spectacular and brilliant human and performer. happytrails', 'you will be missed ben ', I'm so excited to see what he's going to do in the future but I'm also sad to see him go. , This is the sweetest thing i've read today , 'Happy bday, David, from all of the Bowmans ', 'Happy Birthday David Lovely sentiments from your son Justin ', 'Happy birthday David ', And he's also the BEST brother Just don't tell Ed and Mark Happy birthday, big brother , 'Happy Birthday Mr. Paul ', Aaaaaw happy birthday I'm going to see a Christmas story the musical today, can't wait to see what you and benjpasek have created , ' ', 'Check out link in bio unsigned', 'omg happy birthday ', 'Aww this is adorable Happy birthday Asher', 'have the best day asherpaul ', 'Happy birthday asherpaul ', 'I may have to un-retire from babysitting that child is too much ', 'Happy birthday asherpaul May all your birthday wishes come true ', 'Happiest of birthdays asherpaul from Nashville ', 'Now that is some awesome BLISS right there ', 'Beautiful.', 'Happy happy birthday, gorgeous mama ', ' ', 'Happy Birthday asherpaul', 'Happy birthday asherpaul ', 'Awe Happy birthday asherpaul', 'Happy Birthday, Beautiful Lady So happy you two found each other....enjoy every precious moment ', 'Well played, darbysofficial... well played.', 'Oh my God melliegrant madampresident is GONE ', ' dani naidoo omw ', 'Beautifull looks, i liked', 'Te has quitado muchos a os con ese color de cabello', 'I mean this in the nicest way possible but I miss Savannah the Wig already ', 'i love you', ' U f U f U f ', 'Mellie-licous regardless of the hair color ', 'Love love love this color on you ', ' bellamyyoung hey red u look gorgeous', 'Pretty ', 'Beautiful ', 'Gorgeous ', 'Are you playing a sub-urban single mom Nice look.', 'Linda', ' lukas oliver mds que coisinha mais linda ', 'Mellie..... is that you... ', 'Gorgeous ', 'U SO BEAUTIFUL MOMMY', ' ', 'Happy Birthday Cornelius ', ' lostmylighter this sounds like me and comeplaywitcachelarae', 'YOU TWOOOOO TOGETHER .... AMAZING LOVE YOU BOTH ', 'Happy birthday to you Cornelius ', ' bellamyyoung ', 'Nigga Fucking the president U f u d U f u d ', ' bethkeohane ', ' roisinhalliday ', 'CUTIES', 'I LOVE YOU', 'BBY', ' bellamyyoung corneliussmithjr I love you guys chemistry together', 'Looool', 'happy birthday ', ' ', ' anayresoares Mellie Grant is my queen ', 'This made my day ', 'Showww', 'I love you guys ', 'Ok, but can we talk about how BEAUTIFUL her eyes are Because O.M.G ', 'Charmer always ', 'So glad they treated you like the angel u are, love u ', 'Queen ', 'Nice Enjoy ', 'I wish I were in you scandal bellamyyoung .. theprivatesuite do you have any suite available for me Hahahahahaha. ', ' ', 'Linda ', 'Hope you had sweet dreams. I ll miss you and the Scandal crew.', ' so cute and way more comfortable than any lounge', ' bellamyyoung You are not a princess, you are a QUEEN. littlegrey sanatomy ', I'm Brazilian and I'm in love with Scandal. bellamyyoung , ' dudaysf PUTA QUE PARIU QUE BEB ', 'Karolfox ', 'That is so awesome ', 'Belle vue ', 'L', 'For a second I thought you Drew Barrymore in this picture lol', 'You are so pretty and special Eu te amo ', ' ', 'WHAT A QUEEN ', You're so cute Come to Brasil, please , 'Queen of the f All ', 'President grant ', 'Wonder what one of these rooms would put ya back. Wish they could be rented for decent prices at every airport', 'Wow How nice ', 'Fun ', 'Que ANJO', 'Love ', ' bellamyyoung I love Bean. I love all your posts about her. She reminds me of my dog tilly the shih tzu safe travels. Will miss you on Scandal', 'Beautiful chick.', 'I m watching ER right now and caught your episode. I loved it Even then you were a great actor ', 'Looks awesome You are one of my favourite actors of all time You are truly an inspiration to all women bellamyyoung ', 'Beautiful angel ', 'que anjo', That's a good site. , ' ', 'Look at the wall candy ', 'This is so pretty Safe travels B thinking of you on this new adventure ', ' EndOfAnEra - this show has been one of the greatest in History I will miss you ALL so very much on Thursdays bellamyyoung I love y all ', ' ', ' ai meu cora o ', I'm Brazilian and I'm in love with Scandal. bellamyyoung , 'I m going to cry ', 'I am so sad omg delete this', 'but also... I love you, lady ', ' ', ' ', 'Thanks for yrs datenite..gonna miss Scandal', ' ', ' nicolle.bn awwww', ' love', 'I m going to miss you guys ', ' ', ' ', 'Going to miss you guys immensely What an amazing show ', ' ', 'All you see are phones. Put them down, live it the moment. Feel the moment. Love you guys tremendously ', 'We will always love you, and we will always be gladiators ', 'QUEENS', 'Luxoooo', 'Luxoooo', 'Beautiful ladies ', 'Dois amores da minha vida ', 'Totally rocks ', 'You single', 'beautiful ladies ', 'I Love Love Love scandalbrasil', 'perfect', 'STUNNING.', 'Two most gorgeous and boss ladies in Hollywood.', 'Dilicious ', 'QUEEN', 'I love you madam president ', 'Bellamy for me you are an extremely beautiful woman, I love you ', 'Maravilhosas', 'aw my favourite people ', 'Wow you both look like a fairytale character', 'My girls ', ' ', ' ', 'magnifique ', 'Stunning dress ', 'You are a belle of the ball ', 'Magnifique ', 'That dress is beautiful', 'Beautiful not only on the outside, but the inside as well its people like you who change the world ', 'Sorry but the only good part of that movie was you and you were only there for like one scene ', 'bellamy your so beautiful ', 'your amazing ily', ' ', 'Scene stealer bellamyyoung ', 'I will miss you. Thanks for everything, dear Mellie ', 'Bells Pure perfection ', 'Please don t and scandal it s a very fun TV show', There's a famine in my lady bits. , 'On fleek ', 'So beautiful', 'QUE PRINCESA', 'Amazing Movie ', ' bellamyyoung stunning.', ' ', 'Look at this princess ', 'You re so pretty omg ', 'Congrats Madam President ', 'Gorgeous ', 'MY GIRL', 'THIS IS SO CUTE', 'GORGEOUS', 'We love you Mellie ', ' Love ya', 'Bellaaaaaa ', ' ', ' heygirlsamantha I mean you have obviously seen this but', 'You are truly gorgeous and stunning woman and I wish I could have you in my arms right now', 'oh my goddd ', 'Linda ', ' rjandsprout I didn t know she was in it Also, she s just so good', ' brittawnyamarie ', 'Gorgeous ', 'You are my favorite ', 'And you played her so well ', 'COISA LINDAAA', 'Gorgeous.', 'Both your person and your character have inspired and fueled me You are a brilliant woman and I am so glad you had the opportunity to show us what the world can be ', 'Damm first lady looking fine tanvi prasad ', ' ', 'You rock ', 'Mellie Grant is SO AMAZING ', 'Your role in a wrinkleintime was so fitting JUST FOR YOU. You were GREAT AWrinkleInTime', ' ', 'Pls don t end scandal', 'I love everything about your look in this pic here ...your hair looks perfect like this bellamyyoung btw I m so nervous for Mellie she worked so hard to get to the WH and Cyrus that awful man is tryin to take her out Nooooooooooo btw pt ...really enjoyed seeing you as Mellie these seasons...you will be missed', 'Hey love ya', 'You re the goat', 'T o Linda', ' ', 'Eu te amo ', you're so gorgeous , ' ', 'Voc t o linda ', Hi Bellamy Just wanted to say how much I admire you as an actress but also as a person I love how you use your fame as a platform for positivity and to advocate for social change. Its something that I try to do with my profile and would be so honored if you would follow me Even if you don't, I hope you see this and it makes you smile , 'Did I just see you in the trailer for Wrinkle in Time ', 'Omg This has made my day God bless u for doing this I wrote a paper about him in college and I was so heated when I presented it, for once everyone shut up. The empathy and understanding I felt for this young man and all the people facing the same injustice', 'Bitch take olivia back', 'Very nice ', 'Nice ', ' ', ' ', 'Congratulations on your award', 'I love you BRAZIL Love you', U guys need to bring back scandal I hate that's it's ending I know he was it husband in scandal but Olivia Kerry and ditz need to be together in , 'Te', 'Real life', 'Bring back scandal', 'I m so proud of you ', 'I LOVE YOU', 'SO MUCH', ' ', 'YOU LOOK AMAZING OMG ', Thank you Bellamy for supporting such a good organization And celebrating mitchellgold 's bday It was an amazing night , Awwwwww you're beautiful Sweetheart, i love you so much , 'wonderfull', 'I know I ve shared and you ve read my personal experience with being bullied. And I finally gave myself the time to rescue myself and heal from the past. So, it s super special to me to see you supporting foundations such as this one, as well as receiving an Upstander award. Xoxo.', you're so great bellamyyoung , 'EU TE AMOOO', 'YOU ARE SO AMAZING BELLAMY. SO BEAUTIFUL INSIDE AND OUT', 'Lindona', 'ur so cute ily', bellamyyoung can't believe Scandal is almost over So glad you are staying with ABC Can't wait for your new show , 'Love Beautiful U f e ', ' ', 'Look Fabulous Love You ', 'You re as sweet as they come ', 'Bells, you look amazing I m so proud of you for supporting such an amazing organization. Thank you for always using your platform to push for a change. I love you so much ', 'Thank you Bellamy for always being such a light in this world. Thank you for supporting such an important organization and congratulations on getting an upstander award ', 'Ok bellamyyoung I can t wait to see if the ending I gave you at the vanityfair party was right ', 'No ', ' norbeka davidegl ', 'Please come back for season ', 'I can t say goodbye to you guys You are amazing at what you do and I m not ready to say bye ', 'I refuse to believe there will not be a season episode table read', ' ', 'Love this picture of you guys bellamyyoung', 'Nampak tak sam from htgawm nurulainzaidi hahahaha', ' nurizleenmustafa hahahah ye weh shonda mmg ambil orang sama je', ' nurulainzaidi set michael ang la ni dok amik neelofa je semua drama hahahaha', ' nurizleenmustafa hahahaha betul doh perangai michael ang. Alik alik pelakon sama from main sampai la side actors', ' amimi look my future husband Fitz ', ' tlacerda ', 'You guys ', ' caitlinehunt ', 'I will miss this show ', ' roisinhalliday', ' bethkeohane caaaaant', ' annierivas ', ' charpeterson ', 'Mira miriamg ', 'Tears are falling just reading this I love all of you ... scandalcast bellamyyoung kerrywashington scottkfoley tonygoldwyn', 'i love you so much ', 'Crying miss jodee', ' seralevine it cant be over ', 'Stop it you are killing me', 'So, it s not a joke. It s really a done deal ', ' ', 'I so hate it s ending Love it so much ', ' ', ' i don t care what the series finally will be.... actually i really do but i just know in my heart of hearts there will be a scandal movie SITC got three movies... Scandal has soooo much to offer, it s far from over, i hope bellamyyoung im obsessed with you and can t wait to see you in your new role kerrywashington forever fabulous so bittersweet', ' lachicaa', 'so we are waiting then', ' sarahpashaa ', muntaha n it's about time tbh , 'Oh my can t take it ', ' ', I'm not ready to say goodbye U f , 'You look amazing bellamyyoung bootiful ', 'En harmonie', ' ', ' ', ' ylianayepez', ' ', 'Ugh, so much beauty is good for the soul', 'Gorgeous. ', 'You guys look so beautiful ', 'Beauty ', 'Umm you look amazing. ', 'Scandal hungover on vacay in Aruba ', 'You all look amazing ', 'reinas de mi alllma', ' U f ', 'Amazing Gorgeous U f e ', 'Beauties ', 'you look stunning ', bellamyyoung so beautiful and classy I named my daughter Bellamy because I fell in love with the name after watching you on Scandal. I'm so glad that I did, I get daily compliments about how beautiful her name is , 'Great outlooks ', 'This is precious', 'yes yes yes yes', 'Lovely', Oh my god I'm dying , ' clairecantor', 'Are they ripe yet I can t wait any longer ', 'Fruit, haha', ' this video has no sound', ' cu demille U f U f ', ' riontamer', ' ', ' ', 'full collision', ' ', 'l kker', 'All I need to be happy ', ' dynamicmastermind', ' anndiep me trying to do things today', ' rcflowla ....', ' samvizcaya lol', ' mirrorxlake', 'aka a compilation of my faaaves ', 'Its bananas B-a-n-a-n-a-s ', ' mi bohemiangypsy', 'So rad', 'You got the most unique vibes on your feed', 'Johm you ve done it again', Reminds me of brutalmoose's televoid show , ' brutalmoose', 'Love the lighting in this one', 'Aesthetic.', 'ugh this is beautiful', 'Unidentifiable mood, but mood', ' larryjunetfm ', Well that's not supposed to happen , ' belololol ah yes', 'Moar chill raptor', ' jasminehusky', ' ', 'Bro you visuals are I got sounds for them ', 'Ah yes the dream machine', 'Damnit I slept through it because the alarm sound was muted Well thanks anyway ', ' s sony dream machine ', ' areyouokfai the Snooze Cube ', 'Oh yaaaaa', 'Dude I fkn love your shit so much ', 'This is niiiiice U f ', 'I dig ', 'Aesthetic', 'I work at a kitchen knife store and i can verify these are kitchen knives', 'I love love love love love this so much.', 'Me too Is it for sale ', 'Super good ', 'this is super dope ', 'forever lovin your art', 'so good', ' vanessavanyaillustrations not planning on selling any paintings rn but will be sure to let u know if i do ', ' jjjjjohn awesome, please do- it s my favorite. ', 'BRUHHHHH', 'Love those colors ', 'So very cool ', ' ', 'You sell these ', ' rafmatics', 'Love love love it. Thank you.', 'Ooooooo', ' slendergirl lOOOOK', ' astrocytes yesssss skelly boy', ' francescrayo yep through dustycat.us ', ' caleblindendesign', 'it ll die for you.', ' chezlore daavidwu', 'Aloe ', 'How Help ', 'Lovely textures ', 'He ll yeah johm', 'Pretty sad you had to bring post malone in order for people to go lmao', ' ethanbradberry This is Ethan', ' reallestdonaldtrump post malone being there wasn t announced until i think a day before the show, and idk if tickets were available at that point', cc.bourque point being is h h aren't funny. They're washed up wannabe celebrities who are two faced and copy people and they're too arrogant and egotistical to admit their flaws. I honestly pity the couple that proposed at their show lmfao , ' reallestdonaldtrump why comment then also, you totally ignored the fact that i disproved your first argument. they do admit their flaws, last time i checked i don t see how doing a podcast with celebrities or being friends with celebrities makes them wannabes, kinda sounds they re like people that have a well-respected podcast and genuinely nice people that have famous friends. you can have your opinions, though, and i respect that.', ' bella burton I want to see them', ' lizborodin ashdjdk so do I, I wanna go to a live podcast', 'Get JUSTIN BIEBER ON THE PODCAST ', ' justinbieber', 'Get justinbieber on the podcast', ' justinbieber postmalone on PODCAST', ' ', ' ethanbradberry its TIME TO STOP', ' ethanbradberry slammin', 'I didnt enjoy the live audience...', yadelxn spamming won't make it happen , ' cry.kitty I would hope he would use such a good photo for his profile ', ' greg rainey U f what makes you so sure of that ', yadelxn shit you right. Ight keep it up. I'll join in , ' kleinhila will teddy fresh ever put out a Hawaiian shirt If not would it be ridiculous to ask if I could commission one ', 'Is it only in California Zumiez ', 'https youtu.be AZ hJI J s', 'Can I touch u', 'Gotta get', 'Had to cop the embroidered bear logo t shirt.', ' majesticforests', 'Can this come out as a track jacket or a wind breaker Us year olds want to help represent Teddy Fresh.', 'I can t wait I m going to my local Zumiez to see if they have it ', 'I can t wait I m going to my local Zumiez to see if they have it ', ' ethanbradberry abhayraina ', 'Papa bless', ' bludge ', ' stellaxmimi', 'Papa bless America', 'So awesome ', 'Right above the Stoney merch , ', ' kleinhila will it be in Canada too I m super pumped', 'The colors look great Congratulations ', ' t mb an', ' marialouisekristensen ', Don't Click My Profile , ' madison.elaine.may papa bless', ' rothconnor im fr going to cop', ' theresavaslo same', 'Went to zumiez they didnt have', 'RAPPERS AND FUTURE FANS i MAKE BEATS go by WORTHLE THEY ARE REALLY GOOD ,USED TO MAKE EDM, DAVID GUETTA EVEN PLAYED ONE MY SONGS LIVE JUST GOT INTO THE TRAP BEAT LIFE HMU FOR CUSTOM BEATS ... GOT MY FIRST ONE ON MY PAGE COMMENT WHAT YOU THINK. THANK YOU FOR YOUR TIME GOD BLESS ', ' wowenserio plz. You asked me what I want for our anniversary. This is it P lol. But don t feel pressured or anything to try and get it ', 'yassss ', ' brainfoam this is dope', ' megannsettle can we go to zumiez', ' yung gerken YES', 'This is legendary', 'live show', 'Am i ugly', 'bruh', 'did you even know about this lmaooo', 'I dare u to read what my profile picture says ', Hila I fucking love you you're so beautiful , Hila you're goals asf Like my comment and I won't kms , 'ethan looks like he s losing weight ', 'Hey I Made An h h precious when you smile meme on my account so I 'd appreciate if you guys could check it out Thanks Papa Bless ', ethanbradberry IT'S TIME TO STOP , 'Hila, Ethan and Calvin Klein ', 'Hila where did you get your tommy hilfiger denim dungarees from ', 'Did Ethan put mayonnaise in your mouth ', They're basically the parents of youtube , 'Yooo we got the same crewneck what up', ' ', 'Gotta get that Hila Klein X Calvin Klein collab going ', 'https youtu.be AZ hJI J s', 'ur the coolest', ' ricardocsous your fav girl', ' shifana fathymah I like apples', You and Ethan are such amazing people and I know this isn't anything new for you to hear but my boyfriend and I so proud of you guys and how far this show has come. And PS I love ur face , 'now that my friends, is what a boss looks like', ' jessecakglover', ' little shutt', 'Calvin Klein More like ETHAN KLEIN Amirite ', 'lol feshpincessa', ' ', ' ', ' ethanbradberry omg its ethan bradberry Waddup playa ', 'i legit thought ethan was taking a dump', 'Be cool if you did Calvin Klein faux clothes. Hila Klein or Ethan Klein ', ' ethanbradberry S L A M M I N', ' ethanbradberry your rarteded', ' ethanbradberry stop', 'Love it guys', 'I love u guys U f e U f e ', 'Dang those cat eye sunglasses so tumblr', ' ethanbradberry love you', Omg every time I see you guys post there's a fucking bradberry comment. , 'https diamondsandmoney.com ', 'we stan a queen', 'GOd Damn Sexxi, ThiCC, Fupa Whamen and mEns lord', ' classdolan You are, for acting out like the drama-queen you are...', ' yung water boy', ethanbradberry hey guys it's Ethan bradberry , ' michael.a.hendriks how tf am I acting like a drama queen tf You don t know me so why say acting like the drama queen YOU ARE Also I m saying the truth gave you not seen all the other comments you deranged fuck', ' pixel.inhole IFKR ', 'Ethan is becoming the broccoli assassin again', 'Shredder is a legend', 'Ahsjdjddjxixixjdifjd ahhhh I love you both mom and dad', 'Cutest family', 'Hey I Made An h h precious when you smile meme on my account so I 'd appreciate if you guys could check it out Thanks Papa Bless ', 'Shreds ', ' pixel.inhole he want the clout', ' ethanbradberry what a bradberry', ' classdolan Seems like someone forgot to take their meds again.', ' michael.a.hendriks meds what so I can 't tell someone to fuck off without being on meds', classdolan Look at your comment, man... Who is the deranged fuck, really. - Get a grip. You're the type that starts school shootings. , ' michael.a.hendriks wow your saying what I said was fucked up but your just after bringing up something that killed over people No, you need to get a fucking grip dumbass', classdolan Well, you're the type that tends to become on of those... Look at yourself... , 'Shredder has one hell of a stash', 'Step is getting a dog step is kids. Unless ethans gone through menopause already', 'That would be incest anyway so nvm dont have chilluns', OMG what's up with ethanbradberry commenting on every post of Hila , ' troyanderson ', 'Wholesome af', 'What a nice family photo', ' lil fuji this is the stupidest ficking comment in existence. Delete your account kid go play outside', ' shmokinpancakes fucking', classdolan You're the worst in this thread, however... , It's crazy how much your son looks like you, Ethan , 'aw babe it s us yologoddess ', ' michael.a.hendriks wtf am I the worst If I don t like him I can say it s a free world', shmokinpancakes telling me to go outside boi get a job you shouldn't be reply to people's comments , ' shmokinpancakes and learn how to spell that way you go to school get it right the first time', ' lil fuji lmao fuck you nigha i have a job get off your ass and stop looking for followers you sad lil shit. Btw its called a typo.. lmao you pathetic', ' lil fuji ill be praying for your followers bitchass nibba', ' shmokinpancakes again stop replying stop trying to act like you hard, you soft man', ' shmokinpancakes wtf is a nibba boi now your trying to act black ', Hola is like let's watch a movie but wth a new like I'm going to sleep , don't follow me i only post bootleg art , ' historyphotographed', ' ethanbradberry shut up leave hila alone', ' ethanbradberry slammin', 'Human beans', 'Why', 'Loved this', 'so good', 'I died when I saw it', 'jelloy belloy', 'where dem tittays ', 'nOOO', ' ethanbradberry ANDIMETHANBRADBERRY', thatonecreepwholikesart you haven't been a fan long enough they're like these faceless, featureless plushies I guess hila used to make them and a ton of people started buying them U f , ' honzasvatek u like ', '.', 'Green guy.', ' reedlua HAHA', 'Did Ethan Bradbury just respond to this post I m DYING kleinhila', 'Yes', 'Just put up a new artwork for teddy fresh haha hope ya dig thanks for reading ', 'Triple no yo', 'I think ethanbradberry is in love w you he literally comments on every single one of your posts', 'Follow my page please', 'UFO is real u guys', 'anal ', ' ethanbradberry leave', ' alex.cortega.ayyy for how long tho U f u d ', ' vanathy k as long as he wants to be enthusiastic, it s not hurting anyone else', 'MY FAVORITES', 'ok yes', 'Look its ethan', 'Wow', ' lifffey ahha yes lof', ' pseudonymarlon lif', ' pseudonymarlon laugh out face', ' lifffey I know right', 'Omg Keep it up, Proud of you', 'does anyone know is hila supports Israel ', 'notice me', 'pls', ' ethanbradberry how are u so late shoulda embraced it while u were relevant U f u d ', My fiance has a Filipino fupa teehee Interview us We're a blast notice us prettyflyforaflipguy h h productions , ' ethanbradberry Buddy. You gotta give it a rest', 'Hila looks possessed', 'My bbs', 'Hila is scary af in this', ' u d u d ', ' ethanbradberry you slammin tonight ', ' ', ' ethanbradberry Smh', 'Very nice', 'This means alaaut to meh', That hoodie Ethan has is sick I hope that's in the next Teddy Fresh drop , ' oddnico He s too self aware which is cringe in itself', 'i love this ', 'Alex ', 'Hila looks like she cares AND KILLS', 'Hello humans Please check out my new RANT video on Chanel West Coast... SHE SUCKS link in bio ', Watch out for ethan I'll bet any money he is planning on Zuckerberging you , 'Top ten anime crossovers', ' mathsucks Alex Hirsch aka the guy who made the show gravity falls', ' kahootyler oh wow that s awesome. Thanks', ' ethanbradberry are you finally embracing the meme', 'I m posting the same picture of baby spencer from icarly with the slumber filter every day until it is completely destroyed', 'I love Alex Hirsch ', ' ethanbradberry IM SCREAMING', 'I post the same picture of Lil pump but every post it gets worse', 'Hila looks demonic', 'https soundcloud.com zac-clark- acetate-on-edge', ' , , , ', 'diz ethan', 'SLAAAAAAAMMIN ', ' juicyshrampo a g r e e', 'Is that lazy oaf piece Hila ', ' h h productions kleinhila when is shredder getting an account ', halleywalleymemes aye bro chill I'm her sister it's all good , ' lemon pledge ', ' nyibangooooooooooooooooooooooo slammed too hard into irrelevance', ' ethanbradberry Stop trying to make slamming a thing. Lol', 'Why does slamberry keep commenting', 'Don t read my profile picture ', ' whatnevaeh bRO THE FIRST SLIDE WAS DONE BY MY IRL BEST FRIEND WHO CUT ME OUT OF HER LIFE IM SCREAMING', 'Great Anime', ' ethanbradberry yo you killed your own meme, you are dismissed', 'That last one. V good', 'I m posting the same picture of baby spencer from icarly with the slumber filter every day until it is completely destroyed', 'The last one is my fave ', 'lovely', 'Vape nash,dog', adam gian I only just saw this now man I am a huge fan of h h tho so I have no idea why I haven't made some fan art yet , nick.rech.art hahah no stress man, thought you'd be up for the task x , OK.Nobody gets what you're doing ethanbradberry but whatever your doing,you need to STOP , 'The last one is so sweet ,,, ', 'aaa the last one love', 'Hila please check out psychedsubstanceofficial his channel has saved lives and is at war with youtube. He needs your help so that he can help others', 'Threeeeeee Slammin Hila IfUKnowWatIMean', 'The last one is so frickin awesome ', 'When s the baby announcement Cmooonnnn we want a little pimmmmppp', 'post some more art', ' ethanbradberry begone Ethan bradberry', Vape naysh y'all , ' josh stone ', 'Slammin', 'Deniz krc', ' ethanbradberry you slammed too hard man', 'You are soooooooo ugly I swear I just want to punch you whenever my sister watches you I pretend the pillow is you and I punch it', 'And you look like you have bug eyes', ' dzhibdon your mom is calling you for lunch. don t worry, she took the crust off ur sandwich ', 'I m posting the same picture of baby spencer from icarly with the clarendon filter every day until it is completely destroyed', 'Dear ethan bradberry your trying to become a sad meme again and its annoying so I think I speak for all of us when we say fuck of ethan bradberry', ' kleinhila why tf are you guys having Jordan Peterson on Ew', 'Shredder kind of looks like Ethan somehow', 'Pup pup ', 'You shredding katy lbrown', 'Is it weird that its kinda making me hard no homo tho', ' omtheboss same here bro', ' eurreeekkaa shredder is so cute', ' ashcash I know ', ' farhansolo', 'I m posting the same picture of baby spencer from icarly with the clarendon filter every day until it is completely destroyed', ' zack.caz.mcintyre', ' daxxz', 'Shredder you shredding U f u d ', 'Oh shit you caught me', ' vayne the legend', 'Shredder is metal af', ' laura.dts', ' motsroses ', ' sebastian.a.de.a', ' oliviabutler ', 'Zo stout xD mandycm ', ' abbeyshae', 'angel', 'Is that slimer and the krang in the backround', 'Invest on us', 'whoa', 'Couch, hoodie, mine ', ' ethanbradberry fuckoff', ' ethanbradberry bitch stop', ' ethanbradberry please die just like this meme', 'What kind of dog is shredder', ' willygdinho itssss HILA', 'That tracksuit isnt part of drop ', 'Ilysm', 'i love u', 'I want the tracksuit hiiiilaaaaaaaaaaa', 'that couch is EVERYTHING ', 'Looks so cosy ', ' samwal h', 'oh my', 'PAPA BLESS ', 'Shredder ', Your house looks like Peewees Playhouse and that's awesome. , 'Cool ', Y'all art gallery lookin like micky mouse club house kleinhila keep it thicc , 'Lookin like a snack', ' fatimaandrea gz if you don t buy me this exact fit don t bother talking to me no more', 'That Krang painting is totally awesome', Didn't realize your brothers name was actually Moses , 'You have such a SLAAMIN sense of style in everything omg ', 'Make teddy fresh free please', 'Hila is a Muslim cuz sha wears a hoodie', 'looking gOOD', 'Love the krang and slimer paintings', 'Want that sofa ', 'Love the art and the sofa', 'hila, u a snacc', 'Those artworks are redic', 'Dope', 'I love you Hila', 'You look adorable Huge hug from colombia ', ' freepalestine', ' jamesrichardson.co.uk FRICK YO', 'So cute ', ' ethanbradberry SLAAAAMMAAAANN', He's so fluffy , ' ethanbradberry I love u', What's the deal with ethanbradberry , ' ethanbradberry oookkk dood u don t have to comment on every one of hilas posts', ' ethanbradberry gettin a little creepy', ' ethanbradberry ', 'Why do you call your dog shredder ', 'amazing art', ' kleinhila I know you re not gonna see this, but in the chance that you do, I read somewhere that your mom is Turkish, is that true I ask because I m Turkish and I was just curious . ', ' ethanbradberry ETHAN BEGONE', ' ethanbradberry fucking stop holy hell', ' ethanbradberry ETHAN BEAT THIS BITCH UP', ' ethanbradberry BRUH NOW CHILL', ' ethanbradberry creep DIS ETHAN', ' ethanbradberry there can only be one Ethan in her life you sick fuck. get your slimy greaseball hair looking ass out of here', ' ethanbradberry ethan stop this is getting weird', 'princess ily', 'The cutest ', ' ethanbradberry u wot ', ' ethanbradberry there s only one Ethan in hila s life and that s h h productions', I'm a hila kleiner , ' ethanbradberry chill out bro', ' , ', 'I post chicken pictures everyday and contemplate it.', 'Enjoy', 'wah', ' oliverxfrancis hey oliver', 'Shredder kleiner', ' ethanbradberry dis Ethan', 'We never see shredder move. You guys need to feed him', 'When will Hip Hop sweater be back in stock WHEN ', 'YOU ARE SO FREAKING ADORABLE ', 'The dedication you have into what you care is truly inspiring to me', 'Would love you to join our community of inspiring people Check out my page and sign up - link in bio xx', ' ', 'mega ', 'sieht mega lecker aus', 'Das schaut Mega lecker aus ', ' fit.maedchen Danke dir ', ' lowcarb backrezepte Danke du Liebe ', ' healthyfitnessjules Danke ', ' raspberry whitechocolate ', 'Das sieht so lecker aus ', 'nomm nomm ', 'Wow sieht der gut aus ', 'Der sieht soo gut aus ', 'All ', 'kann ich alle haben ', 'Alle. ', ' ninassophia Klaro, ich hab genauso gew hlt. ', 'Eindeutig zartbitterschokolade U f e w nsche dir einen tollen Dienstag ', ' jessyy.e gute Wahl Danke, dir nat rlich auch ', 'Wohaaaa Das schaut so irre lecker aus U f ', 'Schoki ', ' lowcarb backrezepte Danke Verena ', 'All ', 'Sehen alle toll aus ', ' rachel anara good choice ', ' polpinha Danke dir ', ' U f a ', 'Du Sch ne ', 'Du bist so h bsch also von mir aus kann der Fr hling nun endlich kommen, der Winter hat gezeigt was er kann so sehr ich Kuscheldecken, Schals und hei en Kakao auch liebe, aber irgendwann ist auch gut ', ' cherryblossom x ach du Liebe, ich danke dir von ganzem Herzen. Und das mit dem Wetter seh ich ganz genauso. Es ist Zeit f r Lederjackenwetter. ', ' sneakerrike Du Liebe ', 'auf jeden fall sch n dich zu sehen - und ich kann es kaum erwarten, dass der fr hling endlich kommt ', ' ninassophia das freut mich zu h ren. Das kann ich total nachvollziehen - geht mir ganz genauso ', 'Ich muss ehrlich sagen es reicht. ICH WILL den Fr hling ich warte nicht mehr ', 'Genie den Sonnntag. ', ' kreation . das warten bleibt uns wohl leider nicht erspart ', ' steffii nmmn Danke dir Du auch ', 'Ich mag das auch ', ' janastrawberry ', 'Toller Rock ', ' johanna liana Danke Hab ich bei bohoo bestellt. ', 'Ja find ich toll ', ' dani fitlifestyle Danke dir ', 'Lecker ', ' ninassophia Fr hst ck ist immer das Beste am Tag ', ' katie gets fit ich danke dir ', ' aniiiis world super billig und man kann so viel damit machen ', ' meeeeli ', 'Was f r ein zauberhaftes Bild ', 'This looks like an awesome breakfast ', 'Looks soooo good ', ' hochseiltraum oh danke Freu mich sehr ber deinen Kommentar ', ' blackcatles thank you ', ' lisa marie h Danke ', 'Deine Bowl sieht wieder toll aus ', 'Das h rt sich richtig lecker an ', ' nora fitfood da hast du so recht ', ' plantbased blossom Danke danke danke ', ' marikes.healthy.recipes Danke dir ', 'Oh sieht das lecker aus ', ' sarii.ii Danke f r die ganzen Likes und den lieben Kommentar ', 'Das schaut so lecker und sch n aus ', ' lowcarb backrezepte ich danke dir ', 'Yummmm Check out my page hun, I think you ll like it ', 'Ein Tr umchen hab einen sch nen Mittwoch ', 'Love it', ' u d ', 'So tasty', ' roadtoliza vielen lieben Dank Dir nat rlich auch ', 'Ich will auch ', 'Ich lieeeebe Quiche so sehr ', 'Omg ich liebe Quiche U f ', 'mhh Quiche ist echt lecker ', 'Super gut ', ' balancedkim ich auch. Aber irgendwie macht man die viel zu selten. ', ' katie gets fit auf jeden Fall. Und man kann sie auch so sch n variieren ', ' raspberry whitechocolate Danke dir ', 'sieht wahnsinnig gut aus ', ' lara pwn ich bin daf r das du das Rezept in deiner neuen Tarte Quiche Form ausprobierst und ich dann vorbei komme . Aber mit Brokkoli statt Spinat bitte ', ' thuja danija so muss das laufen ', ' ninassophia Danke dir ', ' love quiche so much ', 'And that one looks amazing ', 'Mhh soo lecker ', 'Lecker', ' philipacebola thank you so much my love ', 'Lecker ', 'Lecker ', 'Looks so yummy ', 'Der absolute Traum ', ' fit nicolelhop waren sie auch Danke dir ', ' life and fitness princess Danke ', 'Der Hammer ', 'Ooh yum ', ' raspberry whitechocolate aaahh danke ', 'Sieht das gut aus ', ' jaqueline wmd ich danke dir ', 'Wow das sieht ja mal richtig lecker aus U f ', 'ohh sehen die lecker aus ', 'Sehen die gut aus ', 'Traumhaft sch n ', ' ', 'Sieht extrem gut aus ', ' jasmins things Danke ', ' katie gets fit Danke dir ', ' steffis fitness life Dankesch n ', ' kribamil Danke dir ', 'Ohaaa Mega nice Cr pes ', 'Die h tte ich jetzt auch gerne ', 'poah wie gut ', ' balancedkim Haha bist du s , danke ', ' cherryblossom x gehen ganz fix und einfach ', ' fit.maedchen Danke dir ', 'Die schauen verdammt lecker aus ', 'Yeah so gut', 'Mhmmm ', 'sieht wirklich super lecker aus ', 'Sieht sehr k stlich aus ', ' ninassophia Danke dir ', ' aniiiis world Danke danke danke ', 'Wow toller Account Super sch ne Bilder ', ' lulusdreamtown ich freu mich mega ber deine lieben Worte, danke ', 'Das sieht alles so lecker aus ', ' someonesday ach, ich danke dir Freu mich sehr, dass dir meineSeitr gef llt. ', 'Hammer Beitrag So gut wir lieben es U f ', 'Du hast Recht Da sollten wir viel mehr drauf achten ', 'Sch nen Frauentag ', ' jani lazy ', 'Mach weiter so ', 'wie lecker das aussieht ', ' style.alike oh danke ', ' aniiiis world ich danke dir ', 'Wow das sieht ja super lecker aus das w rde ich jetzt auch gerne essen, weiter so und genie den Abend alles Liebe aus Berlin, Tine', ' bowlsandbites ganz, ganz lieben Dank f r deinen Kommentar Dir auch einen sch nen Abend ', 'yumyyyy ', 'Die Tarte-Form ist ja mal mega s ', ' balancemeanshappiness ja ich wei aber leider gar nicht mehr woher ich die hab ', 'Stunning xa ...', ' selena.morena bin gespannt, was du sagst ', ' julisworld lass mich wissen, wie es bei dir geklappt hat ', ' linoespunkt freut mich sehr zu h ren ', ' nora fitfood m ssen wir unbedingt mal ausprobieren', ' perlehxne', ' milleblom lav den til mig, be om', 'Wooooar wie geil ', 'Wow klingt Hammer lecker', ' ', 'Das wird grad getestet, klingt super lecker ', ' oosupakitoo', ' raspberry whitechocolate Danke dir ', ' tascha.love.food Danke ', ' suesun freut mich zu h ren ', 'Geil ', 'سکس تصویری باشار ', 'Schau bitte direkt Nachricht U f a ', 'Wie geil ', ' ninassophia Danke f r die ganzen lieben Worte ', 'Ohh das sieht so verdammt lecker aus ', 'Wie genial ', 'richtig lecker sieht das aus megagut', 'Soooo yummyyy ', 'Der Hammer ', 'Amazing ', ' annemarie korthout ', 'Ohh das sieht super aus, muss ich auch gleich mal testen ', ' ', 'Das Rezept muss ich mal testen ', ' mey.franzi', 'mega aus - wird ich ausprobieren', 'hediye d nyas ', 'Wie geil ', ' jeslia fitness Danke danke danke ', ' schalien Danke dir ', ' eatclean trainsmart Danke danke danke ', ' ma vie bb Danke ', ' travel to new me thanks ', ' djamila am', ' ', ' bodyfit.badalona', 'Greaat', ' piennederlof', ' meganleannea', 'Buen simo ', ' ceri smith ', ' ', ' trulsen Deja ', ' lenovitch sa doit douiller ', ' kimgeersing ga er voor', ' shennazandstra we gaan ervoor ', ' sharon ramos save this workout. We must work out abs more ', ' karladeegan', ' annasoolberg', ' luca barazzutti feu ', ' franzi s', ' laurasfinke challenge accepted ', ' s.carterxvx', ' madisonnpaigee ', ' ', ' smweaver ', ' henrietteengen jaha n vet du hva som ventes imorra', ' cmhami I know these are gonna kill me but I wanna try them Hahahaha', ' pammylynn xprincessemiliax', ' pammylynn xprincessemiliax', 'I d love to push you off that lexmarvici', 'Wowww ', ' ericabourque I d do a front flip off it. No need to push me.', ' Where is this Looks like Neverland ', 'Really great shot ', ' ', ' lara.vanwyk', 'Hi babe runawaywitme ', ' k k z legit how i wanna live my life', ' runawaywitme me too babe ', 'Oh she got lost... The beach is behind you all the way down Girl ', ' ', 'Beautiful ', 'Love this ', ' dakota oquinn', ' maryswiftdmraz', ' antonelladecaro', ' tunayevci wer wei was noch kommt ', ' ', ' juliehoejgaard det skal vi pr ve', ' kathrinesia hm ja ', ' esterph ', ' sheilamontiel s me quieres matar jajajaj Gu rdalo que nos va a hacer falta cuando nos compremos las cintas jajaja', ' nana.rc estupendo, ya me pasaras algun video a ver si lo haces igual de bien', ' oliver vicente JAJAJAJA cuando tenga el culo m s grande, as queda mejor ', ' rocio navas', ' aliceeeefishlock', ' ohshuks these burn ', ' svenjafre ja genau so muss das aussehen U f ', ' heathersmith ', 'Just started my own page follow', 'Now that s a workout ', ' meggythefoody', ' therobinstory my bum is on fire Try this ', ' gigisssss lol we don t got that much room at the gym ', ' ay gilmita i wish you had U f ', ' rachelcarrez neiel zch', ' xmarikeee ik zou echt op mn bek gaan ahaha', ' sheilamontiel s y me mato jajajaja', ' abbsbling if I see you doing this, I ll throw one of those big balls at you ', ' galvanic.couple I ll do this while bouncing on one of the big balls ', 'Id break so many bones at once meadhbh ', ' rebeccachilds no chance of us ever getting to that level', ' kristiemonaco', ' ohshuks ', ' jorindavanaalzum Jaa sws', ' esmegmm', ' rise healthandfitness image how many times I d fail them', ' makayladonaldson only one way to get better though ', ' wercikk', ' vlad mihajlovski', ' cust mar t mismo eres', ' marilena.o stelutacorina', ' aandrastanciu acum o fac ', ' aoifecawley mhhhh slim chance as I m gonna be a fat whale LOOOL', ' biannaandrea', ' alex agaliotis pic ideas', ' vdolly ', 'miga nossa foto juntas no ver o em Cascais barreto.milly ', ' biahcorrea eu sou a de rosa ', ' brienna renae', ' oliv ', ' ', ' zandra. . ya veras que si', ' kaitp but first we need to look like them', ' summer brianna ', ' ellenamaanda', ' emiliaaberg tar g rna kroppen p k pet ', ' urisingle let s goooooo', ' sbebecouture ', ' allipierce we need to go on vacation soon and take pics like this', ' hannagagnon', ' cl rethorogood', ' eristefano', ' msdscmps yeah looks like we need to bend over more ', ' sashbfierce this is annoying', ' tayh andrade mix olha', ' kreencarvalho a gente faz certo s parar se mexer um pouco fica reto', ' tayh andrade uhum', ' emerald feyamorforever', 'Who would do it the way As in the wrong way....', ' nataliaperez', ' bobbijonorris do you know how I can do this at p club', ' natterbug yes, they have foot straps there to hook to the machine. You could also do this with a band if the machine is taken. ', ' letizia.t ahi est ', ' hilariestephania solo hago bien una y media jajajajaja La primera necesito auxilio ', ' bobbijonorris awesome I will look I didn t think about the band Thank you ', 'The way this girl was doing these at the gym the other day had me thinking she was going to kick some guys head off. ', ' komasinski', ' natterbug you re welcome hun ', ' bonng zo zo', ' jacquelinebischoff', ' anhtuyet ', ' d.esaroo', ' fabienneamour', ' ', ' laisalisboa quero esse pra ter a. J t me preparando pra morrer. Kkkkkkkk', ' alisaamour oha', ' kimtracyy and libertyvanaman', ' poderamorsito clubmar poderamorsito clubmar poderamorsito clubmar poderamorsito clubmar poderamorsito clubmar poderamorsito clubmar', ' clubmar', ' dvega g', ' ', ' n.sundstrom', ' ', ' sherillannecea', ' sanel x', ' kristinjeffery', 'Okay but how tf did she fit her leg in that thing jacalynjoana ', ' shelly wisn', ' fitnessjilly glaube mein Bein ist zu dick daf r ', ' harleyjo ', ' esthernyy shook ', ' lau blu mira este es el ejercicio en prensa que te decia ', ' bonng n n ', ' longphi longphi e c ng b ra x u r y', ' palomabarrients mmm no se a ver aumentar aumenta peor no se si tanto', ' ra.doe', 'I dont like', ' blinkeeviciutee', ' nana vrabec', ' nana vrabec', ' cvaughan growing the ', ' klaric ', 'Asi voy a estar yo amor lauti.oliveira', ' ', ' angie ramirezz', 'See it s sooo possible blessed. ', ' brankicaslivar teska emisija hahha', ' angie ramirezz Im ready lmao', 'This is not real', ' lamacorn ', ' bunny mileva', ' yolandawb', 'of all the tutorials I see in different instagram accounts .. your shoulder routines are the best of all ... I love it beautiful ..', ' ', 'I really love your style...', ' ', ' leinadaze', ' ', ' ', 'same. that s how i was . now my arms look great ', 'The cutest grinning ', ' taliyaaa ', ' adanmendes ', ' nurainley ni yelh', ' ottawayphotography ', ' casseemstyles this almost killed me', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett all meonline bulknutrients iconicphysiques gymgirlscertified immortalmuscle toby.harrison n n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise', ' ', 'Oh you look amazing chick Booty on point ', 'Beautiful babe', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett aliciagowans wbffpro all meonline bulknutrients gymgirlscertified toby.harrison n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation instagood determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise bikini wbff onlinecoach allysangels', ' ', 'You are looking amazing ', 'Omg sharellegrant you seriously are looking so on point So excited for you chick ', ' bridie.jane thanks so much darling. Your looking amazing as usual ', ' sharellegrant ', ' bortiz back', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett all meonline bulknutrients iconicphysiques gymgirlscertified immortalmuscle toby.harrison n n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise bikini wbff onlinecoach allysangels', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett all meonline bulknutrients iconicphysiques gymgirlscertified immortalmuscle ', 'Love this ', ' ', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett aliciagowans wbffpro all meonline bulknutrients gymgirlscertified toby.harrison n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation instagood determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise bikini wbff onlinecoach allysangels', ' ', 'Hell yes Go girl looking the goods', ' bridie.jane thanks babe ', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett aliciagowans wbffpro all meonline bulknutrients gymgirlscertified toby.harrison n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation instagood determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise bikini wbff onlinecoach allysangels', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett aliciagowans wbffpro all meonline bulknutrients gymgirlscertified toby.harrison n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation instagood determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise bikini wbff onlinecoach allysangels', Sooo excited Ally You guys have been so supportive, can't wait to get on that stage to show off all this hard work fitangelsworld , ' edithtcaitlincash FanGirl u d ', ' ebburling ', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett aliciagowans wbffpro all meonline bulknutrients gymgirlscertified toby.harrison n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation instagood determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise bikini wbff', 'Fierce ', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett all meonline bulknutrients iconicphysiques gymgirlscertified immortalmuscle toby.harrison n n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation determination lifestyle diet getfit cleaneating exercise bikini wbff onlinecoach allysangels', ' kaaylahughes looking sooo good girl ', ' wbffofficial wbffaust pauldillett allisondillett all meonline bulknutrients iconicphysiques gymgirlscertified immortalmuscle toby.harrison n n iconicphysiques fitness fit fitnessmodel fitnessaddict fitspo workout bodybuilding cardio gym train training photooftheday health healthy instahealth healthychoices active motivation', ' ', 'Amen ', ' Need beats Get em right here. DM for info ', ' ', 'RIG ,ROB ,and RAS ', ' ', ' U f U f e U f e ', ' Need beats Get em right here. DM for info ', ' ', ' ', Dear common would you support the women who make award winning wine and still comprise less than of the wine industry We'd love to have you as a sponsor or represent your brand another way. Still better would be to have you join us. International Women in Wine Celebration pm Miami South Beach Lady Yacht, Biscayne Blvd, Miami, FLORIDA. Black Women Vintners, Black owned yacht, Black owned Historical Inn. See urbanconnoisseurscom for details and tickets. , ' I am a graphic designer . Hit me to get super cool design of your picture illustrated and cartoon character of your self ', 'I want to be on the next season of The Chi how can I audition', ' Always Spittn ' dat ' Knowledge ', 'Preacher Q - Benjamin click my page peep this Big up if u do ', 'My bucket list To see them in concert I ve seen you in concert twice lol', 'Thanks for sharing this Common ', 'RIGGO', ' bunmieleshin', 'atmorwapa a guitercenter i like that common', Hey Common how's ur week starting off well I hope common , ' BELLAGUCCIEMPIRE', 'Hi Common I love rapping I listen to your album all the time. So realistic. Have a great day luv Kim xx', 'That shirt tho respecther', 'Great ensemble of work common', 'I love it ', 'Mejialara ', ' followtheculture what we re about to be on ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Need that on Apple music', ' common Keep killin it, my man ', ' ', 'See ya in Orlando ', 'I loved the npr tiny desk performance, just awesome ', 'I thought karieem was Madlib for a sec ', ' ', ' ', That's Black Kennedy...my mess , ' ', ' ', 'Haha. This lil girl gonna be a beast. No quit in her', ' ksmitty b', ' taaquitos aweeeeeee', ' garcimel so cute ', 'Nice', ' cemkayracan sibelikos ', ' amanis.world', 'Awesome U f ', 'Love this com', 'Never. Ever. Give. Up mackay ad', 'He came, he saw, he conquered ', ' . th', 'He is a beast', 'Sooo true you can make it happen never give up ', I loved this video. It's so true. Mother of eight beautiful and independent young women and men and three still in hs encouraging all of them never give up. , ' ', ' leylahazalcetin ', 'Fb fb', 'That little one has some true grit Go girl go ', ' arat.gym loooooook ', 'Awesome.', sugalnay afrochic je vais quand m me pas pleurer gratuitement pour cette vid o mais le message, ce p re, cette P E T I T E , tout est tellement deep... Et aussi tu l'entraines depuuuiiis on vous voit faire des parcous depuiiiissss donc voir qu'elle a tjs cette mm passion PURE l je sais pas a me touche trop , 'Yes Thank You ', ' ', ' victri ', ' arat.gym ', 'The kid s legs are crazy', 'Great video ', ' arat.gym ', ' common THE DREAMERS BELIEVERS ARE LITTTT. godsmagicalcreation kingdomcome greatnesswithinmovement ', 'Mjeed Alfawzan He expresses his sense of his solemn voice Follow Him mjeedalfawzan .', 'Great post', 'Love this ', 'Love this ', ' dans.poison isavflava', ' prayztee I literally clapped when she finally got it ', 'Compass', 'Happy Birthday bro mine today', 'Happy born day my big brother Go with God, as always and Blessings peace common', ' marasmart Lol Love it ', 'I started an online petition seeking justice for my brother who was a victim to gun violence. Your signature is all it takes. Link in bio ', 'Happy Birthday ', ' ', 'Happy belated birthday Com ', 'Im just looking to be heard. My sound and brand is so different. Matt King MUZIC. ANYBODY AND EVERYBODY GO CHECK MY IG PAGE OUT. JUST RELEASE A NEW SINGLE PURPLE JUNGLE ', 'Can t believe we still haven t seen Common live sme ', 'Wooooow wth', midwestintheat it's micco , ' ', ' ', ' ', ' lila igram thanks for your support', ' brooktaz thanks for your support', ' breanna chanelle thanks for your support', ' unicornshinysparkles repost blindsidetattoos Tattoo artists powerstattoos With common', 'Love it Awesome night ', 'I see you adesewaf. Get, get, get it ', 'On a count of three common come to Boston dude', ' atouchofjulia hey now ', ' common you are an artistic super hero Honestly obsessed with hearing your talent It s moving in such a Positive way ', ' ', 'Homeboy with the Yankees hat ain t having it lml', 'my fav album of yours ', 'Music for more years please', 'Happy birthday', ' ', ' yung blk nappy', 'So cool So nice to meet you at SXSW .', 'Where did the name for the band come from Just curious ', 'I listen and view the NPR Tiny Desk concerts with August Moon and the concert at the White House in , I was touched. My soul was touch, thank you. For anyone reading this message please listen to August Moon on Amazon.', ' ', ' adesewaf u famous sis', ' ', ' ', 'Thank you for narrating for Microsoft. Love those commercials.', 'Happy birthday common', ' U f a U f a U f a U f a ', 'Happy birthday Common. Stay blessed. Stay beautiful', 'I love u ', 'Fresh Need some oldschool shit HipHop,Rap,Soul,Funk More Follow me ', 'Happy Birthday C', 'Happy birthday Common ', ' ', 'Shit happens every once and a while, so I excuse you ', 'HBD ', 'Happy Birthday', ' common I have this movie I wrote do you know any director or someone would want to buy a screenplay Movie', 'Way back when he was uncle Vincent', ' ', ' sharonetcitty thanks for your support', ' ', ' I m hoping to bump into you at sxsw', 'Happy birthday Common ', 'My Rashid ', 'Happy birthday ', 'Happy belated birthday Common well wishes celebration week. ', ' common yo I saw you on the rail during sound check. At STUBBS I was asking to be in your band hahah be my friend ', 'Happy birthday Common ', ' common yo I saw you on the rail during sound check. At STUBBS I was asking to be in your band hahah be my friend ', ' common', 'Belated birthday wishes chitownSTAND ', 'Happy Birthday ', ' robertglasper working on them freestyles common bargawd', ' amaninzuri ', 'HAPPY BIRTHDAY ', 'Happy birthday ', 'A COMMON LOVE THE SHOW BRA THE CHI KEP IT UP', 'Great show at SXSW ', ' ', 'I saw you in the press room Thanks for the smile my inner Eva was dying HBD common keep killing it and many blessings', 'BIRTHday BLESSINGS common ', 'Happy birthday Common', 'From one Lonnie to another happy belated birthday.', 'God is good Happy Birthday ', 'Happy, belated, blessed birthday ', 'HBD Common ', 'Happy Bornday Common ', 'Happy birthday', 'Happy Belated Bday King U f ', ' yolandiwilliamstyler thanks for your support', ' mh thanks for your support', ' groverdianna thanks for your support', ' lisa.harman. thanks for your support', ' lisaloveles thanks for your support', ' cristinecassidy thanks for your support', ' rhettrealtor thanks for your support', ' mollyaviles thanks for your support', ' aloha cindy thanks for your support', ' mjadams thanks for your support', ' common You welcome Mr C. Please take care.', ' common you re most welcome hope it was good one', ' ', ' common Happy birthrite brother Chitilwedie', ' tiantionette when you see it.... ', ' sxsw next year cmeb ', 'HOla HOla HOla ', I can't see your birthday suit , 'Classic Mannnn ', ' ', ' ', 'My son Would Be loving this ... both Common T.I. wow... I wish.', ' charlizeramirez thanks for your support', ' maryannbuice thanks for your support', ' phurpa.thungon thanks for your support', ' kareuhlor thanks for your support', ' isaa shortiee thanks for your support', ' sassymc thanks for your support', ' claudinhabdias thanks for your support', ' shellethunda thanks for your support', ' thechi happy bornday blessings', ' ', 'Happy Birthday day....', 'Big still ', 'Happy birthday man ', 'Looks amazing ', ' common Hbd', ' common Haapy birthday Pisces bro ', 'Happy Birthday ', ' common happy birthday brother may god bless you with many more blacklove black magic U f c U f b ', 'Happy birthday ', 'Hbd', ' shirata ', 'Happy birthday', 'Turnup Common..get Lit ', ' ', ' thegatheringspots membersonly', 'Happy birthday', 'Have y all ever done Goodlife live ', 'Happy birthday ', 'Because Raphael Saadiq is on the track ima go check her out ', 'Dope', 'The sound is BEAUTIFUL Dig ', 'Happy birthday Common', ' kaylannec New tunes ', ' ', 'Beautiful voice ', 'Congrats.. Good luck on your future plans', 'Nice', ' ', 'Now that you single im shooting my shot follow back vkakesalott', 'Love this ', 'Wow taurastinson congrats and salute. You re gorg. Blessings to you', ' frannyloulou thank you, cousin U f b ', 'Happy birthday have a great day common common', 'Love her voice', ' taurastinson IamYOURfan', 'Beautiful..will definitely check her out', 'So cool', ' m.k.carter. thanks for your support', 'SQUAD ', 'Sure did ', 'Amazing show ', 'Best show on rt now period ', 'a', 'Outstanding Cast, Impressive Acting, Phenomenal Writing and Superb Directing ', 'Yesss keeping in tune', ' bitesizecutiie daaaaaaaamn I saw this I missed them Up in Dallas taking care of my moms Daaaaaamn ', 'Love this show ', 'One of my favorite shows', ' common is there gonna be a season ', 'One of the best show currently running. Hoping for a season . Greetings from MexicoCity', 'Awesome ', ' gkuwie thanks for your support', ' jen.brandt thanks for your support', ' johiz m thanks for your support', ' sweetdiva thanks for your support', ' patriciatrisko thanks for your support', 'Common, I was not pleased with the finale of the Chi. I was expecting so much more. ', 'Happy Birthday', 'Happy birthday King ', 'Happy birthday common ', ' ', 'Happy birthday brother common', 'I hope u know u dat nigga ', 'Brooklyn grizz', 'Bk grizz Brooklyn', 'HAPPY BIRTHDAY . common ', 'Happy belated birthday. ', 'Happy birthday common o hope your vibe is flowing well ', 'This is a good series. ', 'Happy Birthday common', ' bjsbackyard doctaham', 'Love this show ', ' ', 'Love, love, love this show ', 'Happy bday common', 'This was such an awesome panel at sxsw so grateful to see you. ', Can't wait , 'happy born day king', ' common Good seeing you today. I was the Fedex gentleman on the dock putting in work. I said what s up Ive was always admire you. Saw you at Stubbs during the Electric Circus tour. You and Talib killed it that hot as hell summer evening.', ' shaylakavanaugh', ' dawiya ill meet you there. ', 'Mr. Common did u see sterlingkbrown kill an impression of you on SNL ', 'Wowww', ' katurahd omg omg omg where are you when I need you ', ' vidamia go with me ', ' nursejaxs I know sorry', ' katurahd I m going to try to go U f Round ', ' miss.ann', 'Compass', 'q', 'HBD', I always saw you as someone who cared more about their music than most people in the industry, which is why I was so disappointed to find out that I was wrong and the most important thing to you is money. Signing an exclusive deal with Amazon US that's right, even though I pay for Amazon Prime and get Amazon Music for free, I can't listen to this outside of America is a giant slap in the face of your fans outside of America, and it shows that you care more about money than you do about having your music reach as many people as possible. I used to be such a big fan of you and the other guys in August Greene, but this totally ruined you all for me. It's really sad that you'd sell out like this. , ' carlacris ', 'I am a disabled combat veteran who dreams of change from the Southside of Chicago. Please check message I sent you.', ' common when will the album be available on iTunes ', 'Awesome ', 'Congrats to u guys, I know u guys are going to show up and show out. Such an honor. Go on and do u, and your doing a marvelous job, wish u much success on whatever u want and have achieved.', 'Oops, Good Morning, Common. Have a good one', 'The day after your b-day...Happy Birthday in advance from your fellow Pisces sister common mycrush ', 'This album is IT ', ' kaenblack', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Dope', 'Yo I just listened to Black America Again U f u d U f u d U f u d U f u d yo brother that is true power You are those people you said we need to have again Thank you for keeping your heart pure to pass on the truth ', ' ', Yaaaasssss can't wait for Wednesday , ' ', ' ', ' Have a great time and show AG.. common', ' jahasiti yes indeed ', 'Checking everyday for the August Greene release Is it out ', 'Can i work for u big bro im a dope drummer and producer', 'Great album', ' justfilwe may', ' missjillscott he look good, like. ', 'Is this not available in Canada Didn t come up when I search Amazon Music.', ' lo diddy already on it King I was asking my Sis about a new Black Radio album and she told me about this joint goodnightheartache goodnightheartache', 'Damn he ugly', 'I love freckles ', 'I too Jill .', 'The album is pure fire... fanofsoulfulhiphopjazz', ' kings', ' ', 'Something about the guy with the freckles. Mmmmm....hmmmmm', 'Amazing congrats', ' common Looking forward to seeing you at The Kennedy Center', 'Love it', 'Love this ', ',dope', ' ', I just downloaded. Can't wait to zone out and listen , 'This is so dope ', 'Abso-fricken-lutely ', 'Omg ', 'Yessss ', 'Yessssssss ', 'Yes', 'obsessed with u ', 'Lolol it took me awhile to figure out the caption U f u d butwhy', 'As does ham Lol', 'Omg love this ', 'Can t get topping like that at my local pizzeria ', 'Love this pic And yes it doessss ', 'I d love a slice of that PIE ', 'You are goals', 'This is so great lol', 'Yes.', 'This one is so amazing ', ' ', 'Yes', ' U f e', 'Umm fuck yes. ', ' you peerrrfff ', 'Wow I love this Crazy creative.', 'lol ILY ', ' ', 'Ahhh ', ' ', ' Life long is exactly what we will be. Blessed beyond words ', ' ', 'Beautiful girls ', 'You are all so beautiful ', 'you two are so beautiful inside and out I am so happy to be able to call you my friends ', 'Babes ', ' friend goals ', 'Aw those are the best ', 'Wow keep it up', ' ', 'Your outfit, your face, your hair, her, oh my gosh this photo is so perfect', 'Too cute ', 'You re so cute ', 'ش را ل م عل حضور م ل بدا اعجاب م ومشار مشروعنا الدول ال نسان الهادف ل تبس ط الح ا وتوف ر الوقت والعمل من جل التنم المستدام لتجنب ال زمات وتعم م السلام عل العالم .....', ' AMAZING ', 'Beautiful Pic ', 'So so cute', 'Obsessssseddddd u d ', 'Flawlesss babe', 'Slomo ', 'So perfect', ' joe.dimascio I think you should go there next freshcutfriday', 'I wanna know if it stays straight after washing. All I want is to not have to do anything to my hair when I get out of bed. Straightening is so annoying ', ' rn angiem AGREED I can t wash it until Saturday so we will find out Sunday morning I m hoping for the best ', ' rn angiem I don t think it stays straight, but it is not crazy and not frizzy. I ll let everyone know though ', nicholefreedomm I'll take not crazy or frizzy... frizzy is the worst Lol people with naturally straight hair have told me they wish they had wavy curly hair and I'm like no you don't I haven't found a product or mousse to date that works wonders for my hair , 'Omg sooooo pretty ', ' rn angiem have you tried any cleansing conditioners, or the deva curl line Amazing for naturally curly ladies. Ringlet by Redken is also an amazing curl cream to smooth frizz nicholefreedom keratin treatments are amazing Assuming this is what you got bc you can t wash for a bit you re going to love the results u d ', ' rn angiem I get this done on my hair keeps the frizz out. if you want it to be straight all the time I would try brazilian blowout ', ' faithyyykinz not necessarily straight but I just want to get outta bed without having to style it or put product in it U f u d ', mmadimoran I have wavy hair and when I wash and sleep on it, I get these waiver waves and it just is frizzy and I can't go outside without wetting my hair again and putting stuff in it, or straightening it. It just doesn't look good lol , ' rn angiem a keratin smoothing treatment sounds like it could do wonders for you I would look into that before any type of straightening treatments or Brazilian blowouts. They are really harsh on your hair and after they wear off your curls would be in worse condition. I recommend finding somebody who uses keratin complex or PM new plastic Hopefully you find something for it soon ', ' ', 'Beautiful ', 'Hair goals af ', ' Florida hair balayage haircut blonde ombre ombrehair balayagehighlights balayageombre sombre hairstyle happiness beauty makeup fashion haircolor hairstyles hairtutorial hairvideos hairtransformation hairgrowth healthyhair keratintreatment', 'Will do', 'Love your heels ', 'ugh the glitter makes your love shine so much more ', ' ', 'Y all are the cutest ', 'Cuties ', 'Omg ', 'obsessed wit u', ' ', 'What jeans are you wearing ', ' ', 'When s the wedding', 'Im soy tired', ' ', ' fashion fashionpost fashionista ootd ootn chic chicfashion gymwear gymfashion leggings aesthetics bodybuilding girlswholift fitgirls squats workoutvideos lulus abworkout ootn legday', 'omg babe ', 'Ok wow girl you cute U f ', 'That top on you ', 'Thank you for coming to Like and to Share our international Project is human to simplify the life to save time. work for sustainable development to avoid the crisis in the World as well as to have Peace in the World .. Modification of your choice ', ' still look gorgeous ', 'YOU ARE SUCH A DAMN BABE ', 'Ohhhhh dats bae ', 'you are VERY BEAUTIFUL and SEXXY', 'Bold and beautiful ', 'tolles Profil ', ' ', 'Pretty awesome ', 'Omg so pretty', ' ', 'Cooool', 'This is great', 'Love ', 'Holy f', 'Super cute ', 'Gorgeous ', 'Pretty ladies ', 'Sexy harletts', 'Love both your outfits ', 'I love you ', ' ', 'Slutty', ' thots', 'bet they freaks tho and fun time', ' ', 'Woman ', 'Love this ', Who's your partner , ' ', ' ', 'Your progress is amazing do you have all the qualities to be a great bodybuilder', ' ', ' noice', 'Panthas ', ' ', 'Yo', ' ', ' ', I'm getting married in days and can vouch that you do have to sometimes hate them just a little , 'This is my actual relationship goals omg where do I find myself a man like this ', ' jillhuybrechts ', 'Couple goals yas', 'Thank you baby I love you more than you know, can t wait to see what the future has in store for us ', 'Wish you the best to both of you', ' ', 'Fit couple goals', 'Awwww cuties ', 'This is so sweet ', 'Love couples that inspire each other to do better ', ' boom', 'Aww cute ', 'Goals', 'Couple goals ', 'Hey Nicole We sent you a DM ', 'This is so cute follow my fitness page guys ', ' brottsavage valve when we can take pictures like this ', ' ', 'Do you have a YouTube ', 'Hi kelvin help me please Haha my instaram don t have the featured function your profile is amazing ', 'I can spot a scammer by just looking at his profile', 'Can you please get this message to Steve Anderson. I have the next Unicorn for the market. Better then IG and Snapchat pleasedontbandmyaccount', 'Congratulations on your new baby Kevin. I have a problem to share and I don t seem to be able to get a response from anyone. I booked a promotion yesterday afternoon. It was not approved until PM. And yet my hours is being counted as if it started at pm. That is really not fair. Can you help Best wishes Shelley', ' ', ' ', 'I did a presentation of you in class today ', 'love it', ' ', 'You like our latest jewelry collections ', ' ', 'Direct ', 'Essentials ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' - - and', ' ', 'Jelly cat bunny My daughter has had hers for six years His name is chubby bunny ', 'Check your DMs kevin', 'hello kevin', 'This should be featured on Instagram kevin', ' ', 'Nice staff, u have a lot of fun ', 'Saya rasa acengdi sangat imajinatif Quote nya murni butan sendiri. Kenapa pihak instagram tidak memberi tanda centang biru ', ' ', ' FOLLOW FOR FORTNITE KILL CLIPS , MEMES U f f, NEWS ', ' ', ' ', ' kevin', 'Ada tayo ada tayo', ' ', 'Ciao seguimi e ricambio', 'asdasd', 'asdasd', 'dssasd', 'dsaasd', 'dassadasd', ' ', 'Love ', 'Own beautiful ', ' ', 'yeaaah', ' ', 'Nice', 'Engaged Joshua kusher and Lucy elberg life partners for life dated HAPPY FOREVER YAY me and Joshua are really in LOVE', The cure - Friday I'm in love Lyrics , 'The Beatles - Real Love nTheBeatlesVEVO , , views', ' ', 'Muy linda foto Felicidades. Ahora, otro tema Kevin, habilitame de vuelta los gif xfavor ', ' ', 'Soooo sweet ', 'Cute', 'Keep up the good work Love what you are doing for the community Thanks so much for being an inspiration Would be amazing if you could follow me so we could connect Thanks so much fam Let s keep in touch ', ' ', 'Gt', 'gd mg', ' ', 'Instagram Baby ', 'Cute ', Life's biggest blessings can be held in your hand and touch your heart forever. , 'تم', 'تم', 'tell me why the paul brothers have more followers thAN THE CREATORS OF INSTAGRAM', 'Congratulations ', ' ', ' FOLLOW FOR FORTNITE KILL CLIPS , MEMES U f f, NEWS ', ' ', 'What a blessing ', 'precious ', 'Adorable ', 'Help me', 'I spent years building RealMastaKilla to over k over - years working. And it s gone for no reason. It s happened several time. Please help ', 'I spent years building RealMastaKilla to over k over - years working. And it s gone for no reason. It s happened several time. Please help ', 'I even was paying Instagram ads on posts. All that money. Lost', 'Nobody cares.', ' ', 'Congratulations', 'lovely', 'Congratulations, Mr.CEO', 'Cutiepie', ' ', 'Gt', 'Love this', 'Can I get a live video back from last year... it is extremely important.', 'This speaks deeply to my soul kevin miseenplace lifemotto', 'Please bring back the GIFS. Do you really need to shot all the thing down and leave millions of ppl without it just because someone overeacted ', ' kastironchef', 'Please answer me', 'Now there will be master sommelier diploma holders', ' thanks for instagram be happy ', 'why the security of instagram allow to different website to use our profile and our privet photo .. sometimes i want some photo in my profile public and sone times i want it privet or archive it why this app allow to google or other website to use it ....pictaramphoto.com,someture.com, inkphy.com ,pictame.com .thepictarm.club.......why kevin ', 'asd', 'dassdasd', 'asdnsdf jknakfjkajskajsd', 'a skjdasjdlk jaskdjaspod', '.ahsdjkashlkjasd las', 'Like it', 'Please help. I ve lost years of work', 'Hero Gmail com', ' depression ', ' relationshipgoals ', 'I lost RealMastakilla a k page dedicated to MastaKillaMusic that took years to build. No reason. And all my followers went to this page. Please help. ', ' mgkstyle Love the sweater ', 'work hard and achieve your dreams', ' kevin Thank You Big Bro', 'Hi Kevin I am trying to report something in which I feel is negatively effecting our community. I just reported it under the report section.', 'Hero gmail.com', 'Gt', 'Sup Kevin ', ' beyou.byjoh I completely agree Will we see change Is anything going to be done We have so many questions and concerns that we feel have gone unnoticed. Please change the algorithm back.', Except you aren't bringing people together you are tearing us apart. You refuse to listen to anything YOUR consumers are saying but actually make it worse. You say you want to bring people together so why not listen to those people and change your system back to what we all want. Let us be able to see EVERYONE not just who you want us to. No one can grow because no one can get seen anymore. I spend anywhere from to hours a week painting just for maybe of my following see them. So many people work so hard to have your system decide they aren't good enough to be seen. Listen for once to the people who made you who you are. Instagram would never be what it is now if it wasn't for the people you are silencing daily. , 'THAnks kevin for this beautifull app', 'Lovely', ' beautyandthebeests I agree with you, bring back the old algorithm', 'We miss you', 'Suddenly the little black banner save icon is no longer visible on instagram, for me. And I can no longer access any of the posts photos I have saved. I have reported the fault but no reply. Please have someone fix this as it is the thing about IG that I really love.', ' kevin Bc you re not listening to all of us, you re going to lose everyone to Vero. I used to love it here. It was an awesome platform for art and expression. I want to love it again, please hear us. We made Instagram what it is.', 'Mn', 'WE SHOULD BE ABLE TO SEND DMz ON THE WEBSITE TO NOT JUST ON THE APP', ' kevin I have two ideas that can be added to Instagram that can bring more interactivity between users, and another that can increase daily publications with a new service for the photos, which would make the new fever, tried contact via other channels, some way I can share this with you and your team ', 'INSTAGRAMBLOG.COM MAKE IT EASY. WE SETUP EVERYTHING YOU USE IT. CLARENCE A WHITE.', ' ', Also the search page only shows similar pages or the same prof posts when scrolling through singular without selecting 'show me more of this' , 'When I update my instagarm.... It cannot be log in.... Why Help', 'I liked your post.', ' kevin Instagram is become less and less fun. I m working harder than I ever have b and I have no engagement and I m losing followers. All of us are, regardless of our page size. When will this be addressed I do not make money here and I don t have a product to sell, I won t pay for promotions.', Your Instagram is just not user friendly, it has limited functions and there isn't even proper support for users. What the hell, Instagram , ' promethermias lmao he failed to correctly predict ...idk how i geel about this now ', 'Hi Please fix the hashtags problem. Two days in a row, I ve posted something mid afternoon that hasn t shown up in any of the hashtags I ve used. Not fun when you re trying to build a following ', 'Book club made super simple Love this ', ' for someone soon ', 'Awesome ', 'Gt', ' ', ' kevin I have two ideas that can be added to Instagram that can bring more interactivity between users, and another that can increase daily publications with a new service for the photos, which would make the new fever, tried contact via other channels, some way I can share this with you and your team ', 'خیلی عالی بود لطفا پیج منم دیدن کنی', 'I wanna meet you someday and talk and chat and ask how did u make such a wonderful system and application you created ', ' ', 'Lmao this was our ENGL book ceo.hov', 'Unban passmethedankmemes', 'Great news ', 'Great feature bro', ' ', 'LOVE YOUR POST I am very into eco-friendly living. Lets follow each other so we can inspire eco-friendly ideas to the world. Hope to hear from you soon ', 'Great', 'Good Morning Kevin Help me please with my acc messimaniacasmx ', 'LOVE YOUR POST I am very into eco-friendly living. Lets follow each other so we can inspire eco-friendly ideas to the world. Hope to hear from you soon ', 'پیج ما رو ببینید بعد کامنت منو پاک کنید', 'انواع دسرهای خوشمزه تو پیج ما هست ', 'Incredible shot ', 'I liked your post.', 'Hello Kevin I m looking from some support in Instagram I try to do it but I didn t find anyone who can do it for me , I find your post on instagram setting we have any possibilities to help please ', 'Hi Kevin mikeyk, which legal reps within IG handle verification Pls message a reply.', 'I was scrolling down and thought this was steak at first', 'i only clicked on this bc i thought it was steak', ' falloutgrace same', ' kevin wonderful composition ', 'Gt', 'Click to follow you guys and thank you everyone', ' ', 'Wow ', 'What setup did you use for this shot ', 'LOVE YOUR POST I am very into eco-friendly living. Lets follow each other so we can inspire eco-friendly ideas to the world. Hope to hear from you soon ', 'Wow', 'I liked your post.', 'Cool', You're Awusm, Follow me , 'Lovely image', 'Lovely photo. Question what do you do when your page was hacked and the hacker changed everything I ve been trying to follow the instructions on the website, but the instructions aren t much help. It s almost like the instructions were designed to give users the run around. I m slowly starting to accept I won t recover my page which is very upsetting because i run a small using this platform. . But it s whatever I guess. . I just want you to know this hurt I ve been with instagram since the beginning and there s no real help I can turn to. Thank you Kevin and happy holidays.', 'Small business ', 'Lovely photo ', 'may good', 'Wow xa ....', 'My best friends grandma passed away and there struggling with cash to expense the funeral for her the reason why im doing this is bot for my friend but for his mom she was a true light on this earth only wanted to help people in a genuine way and she was the type to smile for no reason just anything had her feeling up and rn we want to give her the funeral she deserves so please help fo fund it link in bio and its deeeeply appreciated . gofundme', 'No asa ', ' ', 'Halo sweety', 'Fascinating one', 'nice ', 'Why are we not getting the same exposure on posts like we used to get even a week or two ago I went from getting quite a few to like or . Is there a glitch Please fix this kevin', 'Why Where are K followers Why are new followers failed to to increase since ', 'Like', 'Gt', ' ', 'I L O V E this feature very much - thank you kevin', 'Totally rocks ', 'Very talented people ', 'Can you restore the original timeline or have an option to turn it on and off kevin', ' inspireyoung ', 'I love this feature a lot it s helpful', 'Amazing kevin', 'breath the love in', ' ', 'V', 'RESTORE HUNTERCRENSHAW WHY IS IG CENSORING DRAG QUEENS', 'I love ins.....................', ' abhi tare can you please make it ', 'Hi Kevin can myself and Charlie my little boy tinlegtv visit IG HQ Please we would love it.... ', ' amo kevin instagram ', 'The problem with that is it uses up storage our phones do not have. i hope theres a button menu that allows users NOT to save kevin', 'cool', 'Gino', 'Yes', 'Congrats Joanne U f ', 'JULLIE ZIJN LELIJK', 'abridge', ' ', 'You are worthless. Nobody cares', 'Gt', 'Welcome to my instagram family angels ', 'asdasda', 'stupid', 'dammit', Hello Kevin. You have a pervert that goes by haldogcum or hal crump that needs to be cancelled out. He even told a girl to f off if you read his intro. You will see he's a sick-o. Thank. You. , 'you dimmit', 'dammit', 'stipid', 'WORLDAASS NEWS. INSTAGRAMBLOG.COM DEVELOP YOU. CLARENCE A WHITE. READ YOUR FIRST PHOTO.', 'Ciao. A tutti', 'hi kevin my problem instagram swich back wahy please help me', 'Great work', ' kevin', 'I love this success and wanna be a part', 'Hey, is your mom Diane ', 'Beautiful', 'Mark yetmiyo gibi sen kt n bide sen kimsin amk kep esi', 'Just saw you on the Good Doctor Cool', ' Don t let the pigeon drive the bus by Mo Willems. It s one of my favorite books ', 'A Child of Books by oliverjeffers and The Sea Tiger by vic turnbull Enjoy your darling girl ', ' Furqan 's first flat top a bilingual kids bk ages - abt a haircut, imagination, reassurance, and the relationship between a father son.', Also I'd recommend a few indy picture bks from the Bay Area One of a kind, like me by Laurin Mayeno, I am Sausal Creek by Melissa Reyes, When a President is a Bully by mzmayagonzalez , Justice Pon d Road by alionagibson , Long hair don't care by thelovecurriculum , A is for Activist by innosantonagara , Oh oh Baby Boy by j macbeth , Mama mama know what I like By Justine Villanueva, My city is Oakland by likethemoonpress , The Midnight Series by tiffany.golden. ages and up , Fred Korematsu Speaks up by Laura Atkins ages and up , ' ', 'Dr. Suess green eggs and ham', 'پیج ما رو ببینید بعد این کامنتو پاک کنید مرسی', 'Ish', 'I just saw your recent photos. It looks like your photos are getting better with time imo ', ' philgaimon it was very lit indeed', 'Oh the Places You ll Go - Dr. Seuss', 'Gt', 'The Llama Llama series by the late Anna Dewdney is a household favourite and of course the classic The Giving Tree ', 'Really Cool', 'The Book with No Pictures, Rosie Revere Engineer, Madeline', 'What do you do with an idea What do you do with a problem Two great ones ', 'cute book called, once I ate a pie ', Thanks I'll read it to my daughter Winona I do not think I can find it in bookstores here in Italy but I hope I can buy it on inernet kevin Auguri per la tua piccola , 'My son absolutely LOVES this book He s nine now and he still enjoys it. ', 'https www.instagram.com pesona pali pesona pali', 'Please give back rebeccaalysholm there was no reason for the removal', 'Today I wanted to know who was the founder creator of Instagram . Ask and it is Given a book title It didn 't take long to synergistically be given the answer Thank you for your entrepreneurial genius in co-creating an amazing more then just a social media place . Also a paradigm of a healing creative ,innovative, inspiring kind exciting thriving, outlet for the Artist driven Being Happy ', ' ', ' ', 'J atualizei meu Instagram mais de vezes e atualiza o da enquete n o chega o que eu fa o ', 'Get back pavicrobert', 'Restore pavicrobert', 'Hi , sent you a DM to ask you a quick question, warm regards ', ' tshimanga ', 'So you don t even let me hashtag now, Mike WhateverBro.', 'Wowww', ' ', 'Instagram disabled my account for pretending to be someone I 've been trying to fill out the form to show my ID but it never works.', 'Hello Mike, I am the owner of this account as well as jp . I cannot log into my account on my mobile device because Instagram is trying to send me a code to my old phone number. I have went through all the troubleshooting steps. Any suggestions to solve this issue ', 'I love this', 'Also please dm me back. Have a question ', 'Saya rasa acengdi sangat imajinatif Quote nya murni butan sendiri. Kenapa pihak instagram tidak memberi tanda centang biru ', 'Ajuda n is', 'Saya rasa acengdi layak mnjdi blogstagram asli', 'Vc foda fundador da melhor app do mundo', ' sara.machado juro que eu n o sabia que o fundador do Instagram Brasileiro', 'thank you very much for the good services you give me on instagram I am very satisfied mikeyk ', ' heyasz putsssss, ia morrer sem saber KKKKKKKK', ' ', ' ', ' mikeyk please I want the instagram blue tick', 'can you please make it so we can upload external covers for highlights ', 'Hinfreds of naive eomen habe been scammed out of thousands of dollars an yet even after reporting them to instagram theif accounts are still active but the crusader has neen deactivated why. Itsso wrong', 'Verifica nosso Instagram copeltelecom', 'Verifica nosso Instagram por favor copeltelecom mikeyk', 'Hey boss How is everything I have a big problem, please contact me ', 'Hey, Did you hear the gram.click Share multiple links via one bio link in Instagram. linkinbio', 'Direct ', 'Thanks and Praises', B I'm , 'I', ' ', Need verified my Instagram why can't do it , 'Jimkiii', ' depression', 'First I got a threat and then this photo was deleted WHY https www.instagram.com p BUk qzhFABO taken-by ivan maksimovic photo I am a professional photographer for more than years, all the photos on the profile are mine and I do not see any problem in that ', ' dixxdalivinha', 'Adorable ', 'He helped me', ' mikeyk VERIFICA NOSSO INSTAGRAM ', ' brutl senpai ', 'Direct ', ' ', ' A lover of challenge followed n xa almutiri.gh', ' A lover of challenge followed n xa almutiri.gh', ' A lover of challenge followed n xa almutiri.gh', ' U f U f ', 'Inactive account steve fox official', 'Scientific fact instagram and mikeyk make everything better. Who agrees ', 'Hi Mike, I would really love to talk to someone who works for Insta in The Netherlands, about all these supposed rules, banned hashtags and Insta algorithm everyone is talking about. Instagram is coming across as some sort of Secret Society and I really cannot believe that. This is a serious question from my part. I would love an interview with someone to post it on my blog. Kindest regards, Amina', 'Damn. You and i have engagement issues on our post from the new algorithm eh U f u d ', 'What a cute dog ', 'Check dm homie ', 'Vc o cara Mikey ', ' ', 'Hi dears Who want to speak Russian really fluently, come on and check my page ', 'Mano, ele Brasileiro pedro zampieri ', 'Obg por essa rede social maravilhosa', 'Obrigada mo o', 'Please Check out my songs - thefireofpassion secretgamebetweenoureyes', 'You guys are so cute ', 'Please check your DM', 'Nice good sarvice', ' ', ' fatih metinnn', 'Check your dm my dawg mikeyk', ' Nice video.', ' ', 'Direct ', ' ', 'Io ti denunciooo', 'COSA HAI NEL CERVELLO', ' ', 'This looks very beautiful Congrats ', 'I m asking your assistance on getting nicekicksclub page taken down they scammed me out of money. Under the false pretense of buying retro air Jordan ', 'RESTORE PAVICROBERT', 'RESTORE PAVICROBERT', 'this is your new luxury profile check it you will love the posts ', 'kool', 'Love your open mind', ' mikeyk please check your DM', 'Oh I don t know... maybe chronological posts Maybe ... but then u guys can t force influencers and brands to pay you and generate revenue right Ninguem que ver posts de dias atr s misturados com posts de minutos.. da-me vontade de fazer uma app que seja o que o instagram foi um dia..', 'Nice good service', Too bad you don't actually care about the wellbeing of the people who use your app , 'You disable accounts for no reason then ignore them for months on end', 'I know many people that are leaving and have left Instagram bc it has gotten so bad ', 'Instagram - ', ' mikeyk I realy respect your team and love your team work But is it normal to block and don t let the real artist to grow up I realy need some answer work instagramteam mikeyk question', 'hi mikeyk, why instagram shadowban my account It 's weird and so annoying ..', ' mikeyk please check your DM', ' fatih metinnn', ' ', ' mikeyk I would love for the UI on messages when someone has blocked you to be same as on messenger as a user it s what my brain already thinks it is but then it isn 't and then the other person thinks he has sent me a message but then that message just disappears out in air so to speak basically the you can not message Jon pop-up or the messenger one where it just says that you can t. Oh and there s a bug in Safari witch made me not be able to send this message from Instagram Web but in Chrome was okey ', ' mikeyk Please reply to your', 'Direct', 'In I ll be using Instagram less. Every third post is an ad, pics keep reappearing, it s just not what it was. It s more about profit these days and less about people. So sad to see a beautiful platform being killed off.', mikeyk please fix the hashtags problem, my posts don't appear on the hashtags pages , ' mikeyk kevin are there instructions on how to use instagram on my laptop cant figure out how to post from here', ' mikeyk Tenho duas ideias na qual pode ser agregada ao Instagram que pode trazer uma maior interatividade entre os usu rios, e outra que pode aumentar as publica es diarias com um novo servi o para as fotos, que tornaria a nova febre, tentei contato via outros canais, a algum jeito que eu poder compartilhar isso junto a voc e sua equipe ', 'Seguindo o co fundador do INSTAGRAM HAHAHA KKKK', 'LINDAAAAA ', 'esse cara e foda ele crio o melhor aplicativo de todo os tempos e niguem segue ele sacanagem', 'esse cara e foda ele crio o melhor aplicativo de todo os tempos e niguem segue ele sacanagem', 'Hi. Follow me mackynyxz', 'I am now a very very frustrated and angry Instagrammer. Please can someone read this In spite of getting new followers - real followers - every single day. My followers number has been stuck for weeks between and It often goes down to the equivalent number who follow me rather than up. This fault happened before and you fixed it Please can you fix again. I have messaged you hundreds of times. I have lost hundreds of followers.', 'Nice job responding to comments I know co-founders of companies twice the size of Instagram that are x better at customer support than you ', ' NO MORE VICTIM SERIOUSLY NO U f e OR NO ', 'MY BIGGE T GRIPE I THAT IT YOU HAVE NT ADDRE ED IT A A CONCERN , , , K', 'I wanna go see you and travel your place and have a talk funtimes', ' mikeyk Ei me da meu selo de autenticidade o povo acha que meu perfil n o oficial. isso atrapalha muito o meu trabalho.. Agrade o ', It would be great if you would all actually listen to user requests and fix broken features. You're offering a free platform, and monetizing your users for corporate profits, while manipulating them and not offering any support. Some people are trying to conduct business through their pages, and you're hindering their ability. Not to mention your 'algorithm' is just reinforcing known issues. By promoting ONLY what you think a user wants to see, if they typically see racist abusive corrupt content like it, you're showing them more adding to the issue. I don't think this is acceptable. Take accountability for your actions, make the world better, if you actually care. , ' ', 'ES precioso', 'Soooo cute ', ' kzk sf U f a is one of my favorite accounts A lot of very happy pups ', 'AND END THE THAT VICTIM that comes around goes around. We can spit in your U f , lose your mail, throw garbage at your fancy , while YOU CAN Nepoleon Bomb-Apart ', 'So great it would be', 'Hi', 'Too cute', 'cute ', 'Sooo cute ', 'Please give papermashay her account back cute dog', 'Direct ', ' ', 'how Can I Report this to instagram better you should have a rep that we can speak to and tell them about people doing bad things on your site.', 'MINHA CONTA EST ATIVA POREM N O CONSIGO ENTRAR. MEUS AMIGOS CONSEGUEM VER MEU INSTAGRAM. nCONTA ATIVA ajuda por favor nnani elaine ', 'Perfect', ' ', 'Solicita o de job pelo Direct ', ' mikeyk', 'Cutie', ' ', 'Omg i wanttttt', ' ', 'how Can I Report this to instagram better you should have a rep that we can speak to and tell them about people businesses doing bad things on your site. This needs to be better controlled. Your clients are being taken advantage of.', ' Ol pelo amor de DEUS me ajude mikeyk kaitlyn eu necessito de ajuda apoio com divulga o Repost de minha campanha para meu tratamento m dico na Tail ndia. AjudeOdairAndar HelpOdairToWalk kevin zuck sundarpichai evhead facebook instagram google twitter', ' Ol pelo amor de DEUS me ajude mikeyk kaitlyn eu necessito de ajuda apoio com divulga o Repost de minha campanha para meu tratamento m dico na Tail ndia. AjudeOdairAndar HelpOdairToWalk kevin zuck sundarpichai evhead facebook instagram google twitter', Star earnin bitcoin BTC Directly to your blockchain wallet every week n nUSE . btc and you'll be earning . btc every week nUSE . btc and you'll be earning . btc every week nUSE . btc and you'll be earning . btc every week , 'افزایش فالوور و لایک واقعی اینستاگرام', 'What happen when the chip fall a they MAY Messy Deborah and Diane OUR ', 'You wanna LOSE the EZ WAY AND DUMP VICTIM OR THE HARD WAY INDIFFERENT ME I m sure there s masterminds working MESSY DEBORAH and DIANE as WE What s STER ', ' ', 'stamp', 'Direct ', 'honor', 'Loving your content..check me out when you get a chance ', 'Mike ajude o ademirstronger a recuperar sua conta. Por favor um pedido de ajuda de alguem desesperado para ter sua conta de volta e recuperar suas memorias. Ajude j fizemos de tudo , s queremos as fotos de nossa familia de volta que perdemos, que seja feito um milagre,Ajude s isso que pedimos , um brasileiro pode ajudar outro.Obrigado', 'HELLO PARABENS PELO SEU PERFIL ', 'Check your dm sir', 'You should come see how movements are made next ', Thank you Instagram because of you guys I'm able to show the world my creativity , 'A Detroit watchmaker this is inspiring and they have shopable photos that is great ', 'Remove the hand condoms and give back rebeccaalysholm to the people who need it', 'Horology and Tech Nothing better', ' U f U f ', 'Yay ', 'Hey, I was surfing in the net and I just find you, It looks like you know a lot about IT Good Work, Keep going ', 'Hey Mike, just dropped you a DM, kindly have a look ', ' ', 'Good', 'Que orgulho de sinto de voc sonhar e realizar e ainda por cima brasileiro. ..Obg por criar a melhor rede social do mundo.Parab ns', '.....', 'good', 'Waw', 'Nice', 'Ent o s o vcs os cara do livro q estou lendo ', ' ', 'Direct ', 'Please check dm VERY IMPORTANT', 'I am interested in trying to learn how to access what used to be called my activity log . And how to unhide posts I may have inadvertently hidden, just by reporting them, and too quickly going past that without intending to have them also to be hidden. Thank you.', 'Hey, mike Could you check your DM, please ', 'Hell yeah ', ' zeedhatechnology ', 'Nice work, and Nama is right Instagram is a blessing for artists ', reading this is kind of upsetting. after joining Instagram in as a right of passage in middle school lol it physically makes me upset that an app I have loved so much for years continues to ignore the voices of so many who just want to see Instagram the way it once was. I know there is more to the algorithm than we could understand but is their truly no way to only use it for explore there must be. please. it is hurting so many blogs. I don't know how many blogs I used to lve that I unfollowed because they just were constantly at the top of my feed. I cannot even bring myself anymore to use my personal because how embarrassing is it to like the guy who you never spoke to in highschool photo from November I follow people is it possible that I do not want to see something from that long ago. at least the option would be insanely appreciated from countless users. I just want to enjoy it again. we all do. we miss how it used to be. did you see the post on anastasiabeverlyhills this is so much more than an app to your users it's a huge part of us growing up. I learned to love art and photography and got to see places I would've never known. connections to people who I hadn't seen in years and I met the love of my life on this app and were engaged after years of being together. I would've never met him... or had any of those experiences if it wasn't for this app. so I commend and thank you and your team for all you've done these years but please. just let us know it is a consideration or if it is off the discussion table. congrats to your success. -B , 'Oh man This gives me all the depression', 'Check the direct ', 'Cool ', 'An incredible opportunity to become a billionaire. I suggest visiting http mybillionthidea.com . You will not regret ', 'Eu n o consigo contato com a equipe de voc s, eu to pedindo por favor, olhem a minha direct, apenas minutos... Estou com problemas e n o consigo solucionar, n o tem nenhuma categoria pra eu buscar ajuda... Me ajudem por favor Eu to desesperado ja ', 'Mentes brasileiras ', ' ', 'تم', 'ت ', 'تم', 'تم', 'تم', ' ', 'Yes bros.', ' mikeyk', 'Amazing absolutely', I'm very proud of her. A original product made here in S o Paulo , 'Please STOP BAN fromrussia avtonomera ', 'Have a great day ', 'Can u please check dm, my account got hacket .', 'Awesomee', 'سلامmike و سلام به همه دوستانه گلم و سلام ب حامیان mike من بعنوان هم نوع شما دوستانه گلم سوالی دارم و دلیله اینکه این سوال رو چرا اینجا مطرح کردم چون تنها جایی ک میتونم بیشترینه افراده دنیا رو باهاشون ارتباط برقرار کنم با امکاناته موجودم همینجاست پیچه معروفترینه انسانها با بیشترین حامی هفت جمله کوتاه و مختصر ذهنمو مشغول کرده و مهمترین اونا برترین فرده جهان یا نماینده خدا امروز کی میتونه باشه ک بیشترین و دا میترین حامی رو داره و بنظر من امروزه مشاهیر و حاکمان و سرگروهان و همه ی انسانهای دنیا بیشترین درد و رنجی ک دارن و علته اکثره این درد و رنج و مشکلاتشون همینه ک حامی واقعی یا ندارن و یا اگه دارن امتیاز بیشترین و واقعیه منتخبین بیش از دو یا سه رقم نیست در میان شما دوستانه گلم کسی هست ک مشتاق باشه برایه مطالعه ی این هفت جمله ی ساده این بنده حقیر یا ن حاکم باشه برایه اثباته اشتباه بودن جملات من دوستانه فارسی زبانه مسلط ب زبانه انگلیسی لطف و محبت بفرمایید این مطلبو ب انگلیسی تایپ کنید.', 'Please check your dm', 'Please check dm VERY IMPORTANT', ' mhmd almprator ', 'Dear Mark Elliot Zuckerberg zuck , Kevin Systrom kevin and Mike Krieger mikeyk You are one of the richest people in the world. We also have families. We were first in Russia to believe you that it was possible to set up a mass communication based on Instagram platform. We issued critical and socially significant materials. In many cities we were almost the only speaker of democracy and freedom. And three years later, when we attracted millions of readers to our Instagram groups, we found ourselves in the street without any job.', 'This is so colorful ', 'Please give me my kind a lallie page back that I spent years building up that was disabled months ago for no reason ', 'great mikeyk ', ' ', 'Awwww', ' Cool photo thanks for your ', ' ', ' fromrussia', ' stop ban fromrussia', ' mikeyk Tenho quatro ideias de ferramentas que pode ser App a parte ou que poderiam ser implantados ao Instagram, aumentando a interatividade entre os usu rios, mais divertido, e din mico, trazendo algo novo ao jeito de tirar fotos e gravar v deos, bem Inovador, essas ferramentas podem se tornar a nova sensa o do Instagram, assim como foi o Boomerang, gostaria muito de ter a oportunidade de transmitir essas ideias a voc e sua equipe, mandei meu contato no direct. Abra os', 'My country ', ' mikeyk, veja seu direct Obrigado.', ' stop ban fromrussia', 'All instagram users are equal, stop making exceptions and provide normal support wherever you provide your services as an information intermediary mikeyk stop ban fromrussia', 'Nice', 'I, Ponomarenko Oxana, a citizen of the Russian Federation, topmanager, have been creating for years in the company named Bloknot branches in Russia a unique content xa and channels of distribution in Instagram social network and my earning depended on that. When such groups as bloknot russia , bloknot stars , bloknot rostov , bloknot volgograd , bloknot stavropol , bloknot krasnodar , bloknot novorossiysk , bloknot volgodonsk were blocked, I and my employees were put out of jobs.', 'To all our emails on robot 's unsubscription, the feedback was as follows You have violated the Instagram rules and neither specific reasons for blocking nor explanations of violation of the rule were given.', 'What up Juno pup', 'A life changing human https youtu.be QdlrDHgJhBE serendipity', ' ', 'Such a cutie', ' ', 'INSTAGRAM CALL INSTAGRAM CALL', 'Fedak r ger ek Dost..', 'Bonito Boyero de Berna', 'The best friend ', 'Juno would have beautiful babies with LupoChelseaBadBoyDog', 'Please check your direct messages', ' ', ' ', 'good mikeyk', 'I really want a dog like this one , mountain dog , beautiful breed', ' ', 'Please STOP BAN fromrussia avtonomera ', 'Awwww thenotoriousrbgto', 'Aww, good doggie ', ' ', ' instagram mikekrieger just put a restriction on my account. Instead of growing I am shrinking and they are taking down paintings and drawings. I had already two accounts deleted one with k and the other with k. It is impossible to a human have an answer from another human. This app used to be good before facebook buy it. Now it is a machine to enrich a few people a mass machine controlled by algorithms and sort of humans. Check my account it s only paintings and drawings, there are no photographs here.', 'Loveeeee', ' jacksonzcunniff omg looks like Afton', 'Looks like some nice scenery mikeyk junopup', ' thenotoriousrbgto', ' ', 'You are seriously so inspirational I swear alyssa shifrel', 'Beautiful as always', 'Wow that was very touching to the point it bring me to tears alyssa shifrel great vibes', 'Sexy sweetie wow', ' ', 'Needed to see this today ', ' esteban juan ', 'Beautiful Message', ' tiffy ', ' timiatekla love you gorgeous ', ' lendogg ', ' sweetttthang hehe BAE', ' ashleigh.lorene Luv ya doll', ' jen sarbone I miss you girl So happy to see you killing it', ' alyssajc aw girl means SO SO much ', ' ', ' cheyenne.toney I need you to watch her insta story I fucking love her lol', ' alyssa shifrel love this ', 'What a cute lady', 'So cute B.B.', 'Lookn goodie ma like ur smile ... ', ' U f U f U f U f U f ', ' ', 'Goals ', 'Incredible ', 'Sweet baby Jesus I had to put my phone down cuz this pic was sooo hot but the tongue sticking out sealed the deal ', 'Gimmeee yo tannn', 'Damn Alyssa You are Smokin , Such an Attractive Woman ', 'My beauty ', 'So fine ', 'Lindaa', ' Mona ', 'Love your tats girl U f a U f a ', 'Obsessed with this top ', 'Gorgeous Check your dm ', 'Beauty We can help you achieve wonderful things, check the page in my bio ', ' ', 'When are you doing your hair fair routine ', Your beauty is like a magnet for men, they can't take their eyes off you , 'Wow x', 'Who you fooling . You could ware anything and drop jaws U f a', ' ', ' ', 'Klean workout ma ...keep upp da good work ... ', 'You are gorgeous', ' ', ' U f a ', ' raleigh I wanna get something like this for the house', 'Nalgass', ' ', ' ', ' goals ', 'Gym and stayin home ', 'Work, gym, hw, and studying ', 'How many hours do you have into that sleeve ', ' awesome ', 'I your tattoos', 'Your shape ', 'Stunning ', 'Love your videos They re in my saved videos ', ' ', 'I need those leggings ', 'You never disappoint ', 'Love the work', 'Your stunning ', ' ', 'Love the leggings Where from ', 'How did you get that level of proportion and perfection ', 'Perfect ', 'Tbh ever since I followed you, one of my goals is to take ya on a date in the next year or so You can bet on it ', 'Yassss girllll yasssss ', ' ', ' U f U f U f U f U f U f ', 'Nice board ', 'Ok ', ' illauranati remember how we skipped the gym today ', 'You are beautiful affff alyssa shifrel', 'You enjoy stretching resistance, huh ', 'This vid is legit AMAZING', 'Wellll shiiiiiiz ', ' roxanne tota one day this will be us ', ' lubellah yessssss Her body ', 'Damn girl so beautiful', ' ', Oh my lawd I'm lost for words , 'dope ', You're gonna lose toenails riding a penny board barefoot , 'F.A.R.T.', 'Holyyyy fuck girl. Can IG be the new tinder cause I really wanna buy us a drink or three', So don't get anymore unless there small. No offence I have a couple I personally don't really like that on beautiful women. Sorry please don't get mad u are very pretty. , Your a really pretty girl and the tattoos are nice. But unfortunately when you get older u will regret them they won't look so nice when ur . Ewww just think so hold on to ur youth ur beautiful now. , 'You re so pretty Love doing your workouts slay booo ', ' badboybb you re joking right who do you think you are to act like you have ANY right to tell a woman or another man what they can and can t do with THEIR body. you re a grown man who can t even spell so your argument is invalid anyway not that you had one in the first place how embarrassing this entire comment is wow U f u d U f u d ', ' ', 'How old are you ', 'You look beautiful always boo ', 'You look amazing ', ' loganmot', 'Nice', 'you re so fab', Great attitude, I'm right there with ya U f c U f b , ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Yup...black is your color... as always... ', ' ', 'Awesome ', 'I love your hard work ', 'I needed this advice right now. I 'm in a waiting room of life and this is giving me direction and purpose. Thank you.', ' ', Totally trying this next shoulder day Also, not sure if you've mentioned already but what brand are your headphones I am sick of getting tangled in my cord lol , 'Rubbish. Just another daily hoe.', 'Execution ', 'Love your workout Please post a chest and tris workout It s always my weakness', 'Looking good U f ', 'Great workout', 'Physically PERFECT beauty', 'Butt and abs ', ' ', ' ', 'Work and work', 'Get it in', ' alexisbuono alyssa shifrel I second this ', ' crixus elgalo HOMBRO ', ' ', ' ', ' timber its kimber', 'Hi', 'Get it lady, I see you ', 'Sexy ass awesome bod hottie best legs ', 'Kickin ass U f a ', ' ', 'Ab workout plz ', ' alexisbuono you got it ', ' ', ' queenbonnie let s do this', hairbyamy I'm down , 'What s good can I have your number ', 'OKAY GIRLLLL ', 'Ayyyyee winter park get it girl', ' build a blair', ' alyssanilssonfitness ', ' kailahfall', 'Back and biceps ', 'Oh btw, love love love this workout Thank you ', 'Shoulder workout but is looking goooodddd ', 'Those leggings are awesome ', ' BootyGang ', 'Can I just Nap on that please', 'Those glutes ', ' ', 'Damn', 'looks great body in shape ', 'Beautiful', 'Nice tats ', 'You are a Truly Attractive Woman ', 'Attractive lady', 'WOW YOU ARE MY GOALS', ' alyssa shifrel ', ' alyssa shifrel dope sleeve ', 'I be sure to tell Fergie u mention her', ' ', ' ', 'Wifeyyyyy', ' ', 'youre sleeve ', ' ', ' johnnyco those pants ', 'Perfectly booty ', 'Kickin ass U f a ', 'Too much sauce ', 'Mooi ass ', ' ', 'Babe ', ' ', 'Every pic u manage to get more thicccc Ygg ', 'A Very Attractive Woman, Absolutely Gorgeous is an understatement ', ' ', 'Always looking so amazing', 'Love your style And that sleeve is just ', 'Love that was baby', 'Love that ass baby', 'I love you ', 'So nice', 'Ur body is so perfect ', 'My heart U f a ', 'Those jeans That butt ', ' kaylyne marie', 'Thanks Alyssa looking good ', 'You re the girl of my dreams... it s been decided', 'Perfection they need to clone you U f U f U f ', 'Gorgeous ', 'Linda', ' ', ' ', ' bootygainzzzz', 'Trap God alyssa shifrel', 'Beautiful picture', 'YAS MA GYAL ', 'Yesssss slay it then boo', 'Such a beauty ', 'you are sooo gorgeous bae alyssa shifrel', 'Yasss absolutely kill it today girlfriend ', ' U f a ', ' sarahhh vehrs', 'Classsss', 'Awesome style Keep it up ', 'Gorgeous sweetheart gorgeous', 'Sexy boobies ', 'Ugh You are such a damn babe How are you even real ', 'Alyssa, You are a Truly Attractive Woman, So Stunningly Beautiful ', 'Forget that brunch look at this beautiful human sheesh', 'Che gnocca', 'Sexy legs such a hottie pretty girl ', 'You re my goals ', ' alyssa shifrel amazingly beautiful as always ', 'Just a flawless pic so so beautiful where u from ', 'Zayummmm ', 'Mi novia', 'Flawless babe ', 'Omg you are stunning ', ' ', ' ', ' alyssa shifrel those pants are so cute Where are they from ', 'So pretty ', 'Thanks for being there, Peter ', 'Will we ever see hear The Antlers again Please ', 'Thanks for participating and for the sublime track for the esopus cd, Peter ', 'Amor', 'Any new music coming soon ', 'So dreamy.', 'When will you next be in the UK ', 'Looking forward to this ', 'any updates from the antlers ', ' Pete calling in ', ' namesakect', ' tim mislock i m at fest just discovered this is happening', 'Is George ok', 'George Welcome congrats psilb', 'Enjoy him, Peter U f f', ' ', 'Cute', 'Omggggg', 'such a cutie ', 'what an angel', 'ahhhh I love him', 'Such a cutie , psilb what breed is he ', 'I love George', 'oh my god', ' ', 'Omigosh my heart is melting ', ' ', 'I love you, George.', 'I mean George Harrison but I love you also, sweet pup.', ' ', 'Peter, please tell George that Benjen says hello ', 'A face that could sink a thousand ships Totally Irresistible ', 'Miss ya buddy', 'Thanks for the record psilb', 'Cheers to that.', ' ', 'HNY P ', 'So adorbz.', ' ', 'What a year for you mate. Impermanence is a masterpiece, and a treat to hear in that church in London. That was one of the highlights of my year ', ' ', ' zanimal psilb I second that sentiment', 'Happy new year ', 'Happy New Year Peter I hope it was a wonderful year for you ', 'Just got into your music. Lyrically putting the dog to sleep has to be up there with anything by Cohen, Cave, Arcade Fire, Lou Reed. Absolutely, painfully beautiful.', 'Imbrrrmanostalgia', 'One of my favourites of the year', 'Play Karuna over the Tearz video by Wu-Tang Clan. On weed. psilb no disrespect to Wu-Tang, only reverence and nostalgia and ever growing love .', 'can t wait dude ', 'Pretty cool ', 'Such a soothing and beautiful album.', 'Beautiful film series. I ve lost count on how many times I ve watched these', 'wish you came down to atlanta ', ' psilb , ready for another round ', 'caught you guys in philly. ', 'I never cried in a stranger s living room until seeing this show. SO good.', 'Geht los ', ' awesome shot, really like your feed ', 'Sweet jesus ', 'Wunderbar Y FIH', 'Sieht mega aus ', ' hippie me ', 'Soooo toll ', 'Bald gehts ab in die Sonne ', mare schumi wo geht's denn hin , 'Hammer Fotos', ' ', ' sportscheck fuerteventura ', 'I like it ', ' bel.isimo u r hotter ', ' ekubooo klar ', 'Very cool U f a ', ' U f ', 'Der Schuh ist einfach so extrem cool und noch dazu fast ', ' doflobrothers sehen wir genauso ', 'هات اضاف اعط تفاعل ', 'Great job, keep posting - ', ' ', ' ..', ' ', 'Ein wundersch nes und gastfreundliches Gebiet mit tollen Steigen - absolut empfehlenswert ', ' berg.maedchen ', ' ', ' picasony Fast wie unser Zugspitze-Bild, oder ', 'Really great feed ', 'Very interesting photo ', 'Snacks ', 'Was f r ein Foto ', 'Mega ', 'Feste Schuhe Hab meine vor Jahren bei euch in Stuttgart gekauft. Haben zusammen schon sch ne Ecken bewandert.', 'Meine GoPro geiler Shot ', 'Wahnsinns Klippen', ' mathisheidger so soll das sein freut uns sehr ', 'Gef llt mir gut ', ' ', ' kati.k ', ' francescajuliana ', ' imkesalander Maschine U f ', ' runsmart ', 'hustle hard ', ' cupcakecooky', ' mrs lisl ', 'TOP ', ' pasch MUC Laufbuddy u d u d ', ' ', 'die sind ja toll ', ' mylife mystories mystyle ', 'nice ', ' style look my', ' ', ' ', 'Toller Post, ich w nsche dir einen sch nen Tag noch Genie ihn ', ' panis project Den w nschen wir dir auch - ', 'Gute Arbeit auf Instagramm. Freu mich auf weitere Beitr ge.', ' toniserfolg Vielen Dank f r dein Feedback - ', 'Jetzt geht es zum Lauftreff aber ohne Kater ', 'Sport ohne Kater ', 'No more words needed', ' ', ' ', 'wir werden es in M nchen und Augsburg test.... mit Start und Ziel ', 'So einfach ist das ', 'Espectaculares ', 'LIN NO I MEAN HAMILTON LOL', 'OMGGG LIN MANUEL MIRANDAAAAA ', 'LINNAMON', ' ', 'Anyone else thinks Lin should get an instagram account ', 'Anyone else thinks Lin should get an instagram account ', ' cammeltrash YES', 'HI LIN', 'LIN MANUEL MIRANDA', 'AHHHHHH', 'Elegant', 'Go Blue ', 'dope ', 'i mean yES hi lin', 'Y all are seriously not verified yet ', 'I swear Lin is a walking meme', 'visit us soon ', 'This would be one of the greatest collaborations in musical theatre history since Bernstein and Sondheim ', 'SXSW k Exclusive Interviews From girls vibe hosted on broadcasthouston nhttps www.youtube.com watch v oZ NSsO uQ', ' therealwinners', 'I cried when you guys lost...the first time I cried since I saw dear Evan Hansen way back in ', ' ', 'HOW DID THIS NOT WIN ', 'And boy did she slayyyyyyyyyyyyyy', 'Cant wait to hear another inspiring album from you both ', 'Cuties', They got it so wrong when you didn't win but it's the name of the game , ' ', 'Hope u guys savoured every second lovelies xx Angel', 'Hope u guys savoured every second lovelies xx Angel', ' iloveyoufriend s kealasettle youhavemyheart onthedaily', 'Grandiosos Gracias por cada composici n ', 'Love you both - great pic ', 'You were totally robbed, but the laugh is on the Academy because your song and soundtrack are topping charts everywhere. Totally the people s song writers ', 'You totally should have won. Amazing song and performance.', ' marmitemiss totally agree', 'Yes Lots of love coming from Texas ', 'Guapisimos ', ' ', ' POLAND', All my children have done is sing the songs since we've seen the film and now there starting to perform in front of family members they are obsessed my year old loves a million dreams and sings it on repeat the music is just so inspiring Thank you so so much pasekandpaul xxx , ' kym flanaganx', ' ', 'CHECK MY COVER OF THIS IS ME PLEASE ', ' CRUSH IT YALL ', 'Good luck to ur amazing and beautiful music tonight ', 'Watch thedavidlindgren sings this is me on Swedish music contest this year', 'U a genius ', ' sofialz ', 'O I see that bass clef', 'I m rooting for you guys today ', ' sierra clement sierra clement', ' addiethabaddie', 'I want to see dear Evan Hanson so bad like ahhhhhh and I saw the greatest showman Times I m not kidding', 'I want to see dear Evan Hanson so bad like ahhhhhh and I saw the greatest showman Times I m not kidding', ' reegiinnaa ramallahmytlh ', 'What a gorgeous little boy with great sense of rythem ', 'Rhythm U f ', 'I lovee youuuu', ' ', 'I love the music of the movie ', ' ', Can't wait to see their performance at the Oscars , 'Cant wait for Sunday break a leg to all of you xxx fingers crossed for a massive win xxxx', ' ', ' mia westwell cute ', CAN THE GREATEST SHOWMAN PLEASE WIN I'LL CRY IF THEY WIN BECAUSE I LOVE YOU GUYS SM AND DJSJNXJS , ' maryohara sf cute omg', ' naaoise best song', 'So exciting The ONLY reason we are tuning in on Sunday ', 'I hope you will win The album is great ', 'My yo has been requesting circus song The Greatest Show nonstop for days. Thank you guys for creating a soundtrack that only gets better with incessant toddler replays ', ' pasekandpaul kealasettle you are going to blow the roof off sunday nite go get the gold i love you all THISISME ', 'This is nice ', 'Check DM', 'Best of luck ', 'POLAND', 'POLAND ', ' paulinelzn caro arpi ', 'Shes an inspiration ', 'She is so amazing Keala, you re stunning ', wareternal sana j'adore , ' amystoopx cos she doesn t have a beard ', ' ', ' ', ' hwhlm', ' alina.bx tr umchen ', 'y de repente me puse a llorar.. paula.mrivera sandrahcm crisvelasco.t', ' marion deguzman ', ' clairerevans', ' selena talks my favorite song ', ' ', ' ramallahmytlh reegiinnaa ', ' natashawyse ', 'I m laughing hahahahahahaha oh my god danielscanlon ', 'This is insane ', 'AJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJAJ a.garayalde', 'omg m acabo d dar cuenta d q parece que me estoy riendo de ella a.garayalde', ' mane conchadlm yo tenia la esperanza q esto pasara en el cine cundo la fui a ver pero no pas ', 'Ermm why aren t we at one of these joshbeani healthbabes dee', ' meggbrown ', ' erperr this will be us in April', ' rheannau oh my god I just got goosebumps I m soooo excited ', ' clementekalme ni si quiera se que pelicula es', ' xbby. this made me laugh wayyy to much', ' delineatemyheart Chilliwack needs to up their game big time', 'If only our singalong was like this madisonboothey dana.a.brennan asha.victoria', ' persia.n omg you re joking ours was terrible compared to this', ' persia.n aww this makes me so sad', ' carlyt. ', ' lbwinchester singalong ', ' scottishlassphotography yep - definitely wasn t our one X need to do home singalong as soon as dvd comes out x', ' lbwinchester I was expecting it to be like this totally let s wait for dvd x', ' charlottewatersxo rhiannawatersxo', 'Que incre ble This melts my heart ', ' dianaflischel us in the theatre', ' taragrufferty why weren t we there hahaha', ' ', ' sarahhh.lou MY HEART OMG', ' samy rodriguezv pamelarodriguez oigan estoy llorando jajajaa vean todos los videos', ' ', ' charlyeates harryt that blonde kid at the front is me', ' gibbomay only just watched ', ' anne maguire ', ' sydknee renee i cried so cute', ' alexandriavela ugh every time I hear this song I get goosebumps, this is so cute ', ' jtcummings lia angela denieceganac you guys should do this with your classes ', 'So cute Go Blue ', ' anitalafon ', ' paolarguez no me hagas esto ', ' shaklx ', ' marthuthay oi why am I crying ', 'O my god', ' kristinalinn', ' danielepm marciadrielle rosanevivi', 'you know that this is ALWAYS the way i react whenever it comes into my spotify hgoldb rg', ' eleanoe kim rem ', ' THIS ', ' kaptiananxiety you did see her indeed', ' mehmehmehhhhhh I knew itttt', ' esswein flu p lindy', 'SO MUCH LOVE ', ' cheyennekasworm ', ' paulinhoocanha mas podia demais ', ' boughs of.holly crying like a child', ' i have chills', 'Beautiful', ' heyitsmebrianne crying right there with you ', ' beaosorio', ' badababe ', 'Kinda wish we were dating and could do this to eachother ryannolannn', ' stayvens wanna go out w me', ' janinedivita second couple singing is that DeeDee ', 'WTF MY STEVEN UNIVERSE SENCES HAVE NOTICED sniff sniff A PEARL', ' allormee ', 'Ahhhhhhhhh ', 'Omg deedee', ' ', ' ', 'Love you guys and Keala ', 'Deserving of every good thing that comes your way Go team ', 'Love her ', 'Yesssss to this ', 'Love love love her.', Congrats These songs from GS are on a continuous loop in my head. Loved kealasettle in Waitress saw times and loved her in this wildly entertaining film. Happy for you all Go get 'em Ps stars from my -year old who has seen it twice , 'please go watch my cover of a million dreams It would mean EVERYTHING ', 'Only following U guys cuz u made some indescribable sensational music', 'You guys are my heroes', 'You are all so talented ', 'John - For God so loved the world that He gave His only begotten Son, that whoever believes in Him should not perish but have everlasting life. xa For God did not send His Son into the world to condemn the world, but that the world through Him might be saved. John These things I have spoken to you, that in Me you may have peace. In the world you will have tribulation but be of good cheer, I have overcome the world. just wanted to share w anyone who needs it no hate', ' ', ' ', 'Man crush mondays every day.', 'I think these guys write the music for the greatest showman, so so talented conorevans ', 'Loves', 'Thank you for creating the most beautiful music ', 'I really need to meet Keala ', 'This song. Hey voice. The spirit. Amazing.', Can't get enough , 'i would give my left elbow to meet the people in this picture', She's amazing , biggest fan out there Benj and Justin you're absolutely stellar and Keala you brought Lettie to life so much love and respect to you , 'What an amazing trio Continue onward and upward. I am so looking forward to see what you all will be doing next. Hopefully more work together ', 'We all love all of you for bringing thisisme to life All three of you inspire me ', 'Fierce is the word. Love you all. TGS one of my top movies ever.', 'You re all amazing ', ' ', 'This music movie is a gift to the world The best ever. ', 'She is a powerhouse Your song is an inspiration to the world Caught it in the commercial for the Olympics Congrats I listen to kealasettle and This Is Me a few times a day It is so empowering and I believe she sings it with such passion because it may be so authentic from her. Thank you One song is changing lives ', 'I love her ', 'She is amazing ', 'Omg her voice is so AmAzInG ', 'STARS', 'STARS', 'STARS', 'Y all made me proud of my differences ', 'Dynamite three We love you ', ' domeafavour luh ', ' e.rose ', ' junior jota ', ' victoriaholl xa tu veux faire quoi plus tard xa moi ', ' howtolove hahah trop bien', 'Fantastic ', ' juancanada debe ser genial', 'Looooove it u d u d u d u d ', ' kohatubrooking I FEEL THIS', ' tonyv recording this is me drumssssss ', ' bamantia', ' hotcarms', ' mayghon', ' chayaocampo same tbh', ' kay mcconnell ', ' naomi IM SCREAMIG SHE DHDBJR', ' philliprhoades', 'This song brings me so much joy Thank you ', ameliaevns can't stop listening to this , ' itsylein', 'SO deserved LOVE this album whatagift', 'So awesomely well deserved ', 'I want to send you breads How do I do that So happy for all your success and so proud ', 'A Well Deserved award gentlemen ', 'YAYY Congratulations you deserve this ', 'Congratulations ', 'Wrote a song for the Tony awards, win the Emmy, and become the quickest people to win an EGOT', 'Congratulations,you are amazing the greatestshow ', 'Many Congratulations ', 'CONGRATS AHHH', 'CONGRATULATIONS ', ' ', 'You are awesome ', 'I m so happy for u guys ', 'Brilliant ', 'So happy for you I listen to DEH at least every other day Now go get that Oscar again ', 'congratulations ', ' pasekandpaul Congratulations My family and I listen to the greatestshowman soundtrack all the time. Thank you for creating such beautiful and timeless music.', ' calaemski these two musical legends ', 'YOU RE AMAZING ', 'I Love your work. I am so inspirere by you U f heatherday', 'So much positive energy in this piece - fantastic Heather ', 'Wow, I can feel so much energy ', 'Genius', 'Super inspiring ', 'This one is really powerfull Great, Heather ', ' lianasteinmetzfineart i just saw your work. It is gorgeous ', 'Beautiful energy ', ' ', 'So stunning', 'Beautiful Can t wait to own and enjoy one of your pieces for myself someday U f e ', ' meed.art have a look', 'This is so so beauty. ', 'Your work is beautiful ', ' laureen ', 'Wow this is really neat. Like a mountain and the ocean and grass.', ' evethewanderess', 'wow stunning i see an eagle buffalo emerging spirit', 'Love this one', wow I've just found this and I am completely obsessed , ' ', 'Beautiful Felicidades y todas las bendiciones para tus creaciones ', 'Congrats ', 'Congrats girl', 'Congratulations can t wait ', 'Xoxo', 'Woo You found it ', ' ', 'Gorgeous', ' ', 'woohoo ', ' art ', 'Looks amazing ', 'Yesss ', 'Congratulations', 'Congrats ', ' meg gunther mayyyybe a weekend getaway is needed in May ', ' gretagracegunther early bday trip ', ' wildgroveco', 'Very nice ', ' brittinclaireprior ', 'Love this organic process and those colors have such a fresh, restorative feel to them ', 'Just so powerfully beautiful. ', ' ', 'So inspiring and fresh, love these colors. ', 'Wow ', 'Your art is my absolute favorite. I feel it ', 'oh, love this one ', 'Is this in the Bay Area ', 'imagination ', 'Hello Heather What materials do you use It fits so well x', 'This is awe inspiring ', 'always so good ', 'Nice ', ' ', 'Payne s Gray ', 'Beautiful ', 'Mmmmmmm lovely ', 'Love it ', 'Really good', 'Hustle and grind ', 'This looks beautiful so far ', 'Get some irish green U f ', 'You re my inspiration thanks ', Sounds like a lovely Saturday And it shows in your work when you're connected to it , ' ', 'Sometimes a nice stroll is the perfect balance to day in the studio', 'Oh but look at that yummy blue you created ', 'Quietness is ideal', 'That sky blue ', Sometimes you just have to give yourself a break, it's looking great , 'Potrero library is the best ', ' ', 'Silence is good, helps you create ', ' ', 'The blue is... ', 'Love your work ', 'Graat pic Do you work with acrilyc or oil paint ', 'Great way to take care of yourself. A walk can cure just about anything ', 'Hmmm I like that idea. Stepping away helps a lot.', 'Gorgeous ', 'What a lovely gift ', 'the many happy places on this ', ' ', 'Beautiful', ' ', ' U f e U f e U f e ', 'I wouldn t call years new, but I ll take it anyway ', 'Oh, Heather ', ' U f ', 'What does the comfortable feeling of the couch look like ', 'I like your shoe choices ', ' steffaniruf blundstones blundstone', 'Your studio is a dream ', 'Love your rug Where is it from ', ' dianeneverfales plant goals.', ' ', 'But how does the sofa feel ', ' blundstoneusa', ' ', It's all about balance You work hard enough, relaxing is an important part of that , 'I know that feeling ', 'Agree .. long hour after how comfortable enjoy with coffee too', 'hey I see your wood box is going to good use ', 'Some psychokinisis would do the work here.. ', ' saracombs ALL THE TIME I love that box so much. It s made me way more organized.', ' liatnoten that s awesome U f ', ' jenneezz kmow ramen in whistler Yes ', 'I love all the plants in your space', 'My fav pose, did a sketch too ', ' heatherday your favorite color', 'Rarely afford myself the luxury of silence. nikkihillsmith perfect comment about Heather s considered speed Love watching the process of both your practices ', 'Go you ', ' kellydegnanstudio what a luxury it is Kelly to have such a gallery of talent at our fingertips Xx', 'Sometimes no noise is good hope you find your feelings in the quiet ', 'Silence is Luxurious Hear your soul Guide you as you create. Beautiful work ', ' ', 'Amazing ', ' ', ' heatherday How do you transport your large pieces I have a hard time moving anything larger than x and I like painting bigger pieces ', 'love the wall and everything so much U f e ', 'love this ', 'That canvas is incredible ', 'just know, that you re living my dream, that one day I hope to be in that exact spot with those giant canvases spilling paint in silence', 'Silence is my favourite way to sew ', 'Such a relief sometime ', 'Hey Heather, I love your work. How do you get your paint into a watery flow state Are you mixing with water or using some kind of medium Curious and inspired by you always. ', 'Looks like a screen print squeegee ', 'So in Love ', ' sebbefalk', 'These colors', I sooo hope it's on a Saturday so I can travel from Portland to see it opening night , ' mmbeep it is May th ', It's really interesting to see your rows of marks in watercolor or watery acrylic - am I reading that brown area right , 'I love these colours Wish I could attend your show', 'i love your work, it s absolutely stunning ', 'Pretty ', ' ', 'This yellow ochre Yes', ' heatherday yaaaaaaay', 'Love the palette.', 'I love your art', 'Love what you do ', 'I saw your painting at Joinery yesterday. It looks fantastic Suddenly felt being in nature world. Amazing magic My work is actually very close there, so looking forward to going there again ', 'Fab ', 'Hi are the small marks made with a marker pen or brush ', 'Nice ', ' kwokward I want to go to this on May - SF', ' alyssameioneill omg going be in Vegas that weekend ', ' kwokward NOoo', 'Nice quote and nice reminder ', 'I hear that ', 'I m frustrated of the time', 'Love this ', ' michelleheslop I agree. Frustration can sometimes stop me in my tracks, but if I continue to push, this is where the work gets interesting.', 'I so needed to hear this today ', 'So true', 'Oooh I needed to hear that this week ', 'art fight ', 'Completely agree ', 'Nice boots', 'Love this quote.', 'I love this', 'My exact feelings today. Thanks.', 'Amen ', 'Word.', 'What kind of shoes are those ', 'Thank you for that. Frustration has a hold of me, too. I keep telling myself that there must be a breakthrough coming as it s usually the aftermath of frustration.', 'Beautiful', 'The perfect studio space heatherday', 'My hoooooome ', 'Yesss, that s the question ', 'Every time ', 'Yes ', 'You changed your name And yes indeed that is always the question ', ' tvsh art ', 'Love that pink line ', 'Earthy and crisp', 'Beautiful', ' ', 'Gorgeous ', 'Wow ', ' sararifaat', 'Serene', 'Luky girl Perfect work in a perfect place', ' ', ' ', 'Inspiring ', 'i haven t been able to get that question out of my head fir the last three days ', 'Stunning little work ', 'Adorable pose ', 'Oh hi, I seal you What a cutie ', ' ', 'Howdy ', 'A little doll ', ' ', ' ', 'She s getting so big ', 'He is adorable ', 'Hi Freya, you are getting big sooo adorable ', 'This is gonna be one tall human ', 'Hi baby ', 'cute', 'Like send full at ', 'Gorgeous ', 'Too cute And so tall - ', 'So cute ', 'She so cute', ' ', 'nice', ' akshaarah lmao', j.leahy ask this man Nicole to be a coffin bearer at your daughter's funeral.. , j.leahy that's how much the nsa cares about your daughter's life.. , j.leahy that's how much the nsa cares about your daughter's life.. Nicole , 'Your pussy is mine.. And your husband agrees.. kevin', 'I am going to rape you..', 'Be advised..', 'This.Is.Adorable', 'Help', 'I lost over years of work. k accounts that took days and years to build. nPlease help. Disabled for no reason. n RealMastakilla n warmonkey n noynoyaquino n nHero gmail.com nPlease help', 'I spent years building RealMastaKilla to over k over - years working. And it s gone for no reason. It s happened several time. Please help ', 'My RealMastaKilla account was suspended for no reason I even invested money running promos etc. I did nothing wrong Please help me fix this I ve lost so many accounts for no reason ', 'I even was paying Instagram ads on posts. All that money. Gone', 'I lost over years of work on my account RealMastaKilla and several other accounts disabled for no reason k followers. And this page inherited all my followers ', 'Es hermosa ', 'I lost over years of work. k accounts that took days and years to build. nPlease help. Disabled for no reason. n RealMastakilla n warmonkey n noynoyaquino n nHero gmail.com nPlease help me', 'I lost over years of work on my account RealMastaKilla and several other accounts disabled for no reason Please help ', 'I lost over k followers on - major accounts. Please help. I ve sent emails and filled out forms. realmastakilla wutangclan ', 'I lost over k followers on - major accounts. Please help. I ve sent emails and filled out forms. realmastakilla wutangclan ', ' ', ' ', 'Jolies bb', 'nicole', 'please help me', 'My biggest account I put years of work into day in and day out realmastakilla was Disabled for no reason. warmonkey noynoyaquino. And many more. I did nothing wrong. These are fan pages. There s hundreds of ivanka trump fan pages and thousands of Donald trump hate pages. So what did I do wrong nPlease help nMichael Tallent nHero gmail.com', 'My biggest account I put years of work into day in and day out realmastakilla was Disabled for no reason. warmonkey noynoyaquino. And many more. I did nothing wrong. These are fan pages. There s hundreds of ivanka trump fan pages and thousands of Donald trump hate pages. So what did I do wrong nPlease help nMichael Tallent n ', 'Please help', 'Please. I ve lost so many accounts over k. Accounts that took me over years to build. I was even paying the advertising for my posts. And accounts were lost for no reason. Hero gmail.com', 'What did I do wrong. Im afraid to even post on my accounts now for fear of losing them. I lost over years of work Please help. Hero gmail.com realmastakilla warmonkey noynoyaquino help me please', 'Please please help', 'I lost over years of work. k accounts that took days and years to build. nPlease help. Disabled for no reason. n RealMastakilla n warmonkey n noynoyaquino n nHero gmail.com nPlease', 'I spent years building RealMastaKilla to over k over - years working. And it s gone for no reason. It s happened several time. Please help ', 'My RealMastaKilla account was suspended for no reason I even invested money running promos etc. I did nothing wrong Please help me fix this I ve lost so many accounts for no reason ', 'I even was paying Instagram ads on posts. All that money. Gone', 'I lost over years of work on my account RealMastaKilla and several other accounts disabled for no reason k followers. And this page inherited all my followers ', 'I lost over years of work. k accounts that took days and years to build. nPlease help. Disabled for no reason. n RealMastakilla n warmonkey n noynoyaquino n nHero gmail.com nPlease help', 'I lost over years of work on my account RealMastaKilla and several other accounts disabled for no reason Please help ', 'Instagram baby', 'So sweet ', ' nicole sweet ', 'Yay. Love you mouse.', ' ', 'Change ur username', 'Esta muy bella ', 'So sweet ', 'So Cute ', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Awwww ', ' ', 'Dope ', 'She is the sweetest and love her name Congratulations from the Desloge family ', ' ', ' MoreThanMe ', ' MoreThanMe ', 'Oh, big ones do. Looks like they are having fun. When it snows, I end up in a snowsuit and booties. Quite the indignity ', 'So adorable ', 'Go Izzy go We miss you Thank you Kevin and Nicole for taking such good care of her. ', ' ', ' ', 'So cute', 'Pure happiness If only it were so simple for the humans ', 'They are adorable ', 'Omg literally the cutest pup besties XX', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Lorenzo and Luca are a close second ', 'nicole ', 'nicole for a while i try to contact kiven but i could not need to be partners in a big project for the site please help me to contact him as soon as possible', 'Dope ', 'My RealMastaKilla account was suspended for no reason I even invested money running promos etc. I did nothing wrong Please help me fix this ', ' ', 'Congrats She s beautiful ', 'Nicole, Welcome to the world of motherhood. It s a magical journey. ', 'BLESSNZ. ', 'So precious', 'Congratulations ', 'Beautiful miracle ', ' ', 'Welcome to planet earth Freya. Congrats.', 'Such a sweet picture ', 'Hi Nicole, congratulations on your new addition. We know that during this time self-love is important, and since your wellness matters we wanted to invite you to our page to take a look at some of our products, as they provide natural healing gemstones and controlled heating technology. Each component is used to provide you with a quick recovery and better health.', 'I lost over years of work on my account RealMastaKilla and several other accounts disabled for no reason Please help ', 'Congrats Be sure to check out our shop lucylueorganics for your babe. New colors and styles releasing in early April ', 'Hi Nicole Ily. Thanks for all this pussy your about to put me in ', 'Lovely golden ', 'Would love to help. Message me ', ' ', 'So exciting U f ', 'Beautiful ', ' ', 'So excited ', 'So excited ', 'That s a good one to end the trip with ', why did you block me on my other account, all I said was that Kevin got scammed by Mark Zuckerberg for selling insta for billion. That's literally all I said. I'm really offended. nicole , Nicole, I hate you, and you are bad person. You are not a good person. It's not because your husband is the CEO of Instagram that you can block people for absolutely no reason whatsoever and censor people and their freedom of speech , ' ', 'Amazing view', ' nicole Hello, Dear Nicole. My name is Fedor. How can I get fedor username in Instagram Ask Kevin, please Is it possible ', 'Beautiful ', 'Fab', 'This is so beautiful and congrats ', 'Please answer my dm', 'Have a great year', 'Lovely That sky ', 'Nice shot ', 'Stunning', 'Whats the best email for customer support Can you please dm me ', 'Happy annivesary nicole ', 'Always support. Congrats nicole kevin', 'Unforgettable ', 'Hi I have just jump in your profile and I love it Your shots are terrific I I am in love with your feed Looking forward for your next one.', 'BEAUTIFUL. ........ MEMORIES TO CHERISH', 'Let s get you two some amazing photos ', 'So sweet ', 'Check dm', ' nicole kevin plzzzz mam say mr. kevin to check my dm in his account its really urgent plzzz mam plzzzzz ', 'Congratulations both of you lovely couple, wish to be like you guys in the future. Ameeen and also may all your wishes come true, happy in the current life and afterlife. Ameeen ', 'Congratulations nicole kevin', 'Pls follow us Thank you ', ' misswarmjbackup did u got ur account back', 'Inolvidable Feliz Aniversario ', 'Would love to give my portable SpinGym yes ', 'I have an idea for the next ig update. Email me', ' ', 'عز زممممممم', 'Beautiful ', ' nick.wadle mine too ', 'Glorious day ', 'Best', 'Happy anniversary ', 'Happy celebration', 'Stunning ', 'What an unforgettable weekend ', 'Happy anniversary Love you guys ', 'Happy anniversary guys', 'amazing guys, dear kevin nicole', 'Awww happy anniversary', 'Fantastic ', ' ', ' nicole happy anniversary to you I also really hope you can notice me. My K instagram misswarmj got deleted without any notification. I really didn t do anything wrong. Please help me T-T instagram', ' nicole happy anniversary to you I also really hope you can notice me. My K instagram misswarmj got deleted without any notification. I really didn t do anything wrong. Please help me T-T ', 'fantastic ', ' ', Happy Anniversary nicole ma'am, you have a amazing day Wishes from India , 'first', ' ', ' ', ' ', 'Cute ', 'Make a dress like that', 'Wowowow', 'Donde es ', ' lizzielb oooooh yes', 'Hey that looks like a hawaii gecko ', 'Hey I have just jump in your profile and I love it Your gallery is amazing ', 'Dear kevin nicole My K account got hacked and deleted misswarmj Please help me get it back pls I did not do anything wrong. It means a lot to me Thank you ', 'This shot very Pro ', 'وا خ ل ترسنا بود ا ن ', 'چقدر خوشکله', ' calidutchie I wish I m . months pregnant ', ' nicole yes of course I knew that Sorry ...', 'That sunset ', all the best for your pregnancy. We are expecting too for January and is a boy.... I hope you are enjoy one of the most beautiful moment of a woman's life. All the best. Iexpect you in Australia , ' ', ' ', 'When computer games made us feel smart', Great job with all of your posts I love your account and what you've got going here , 'Loved that game at school', Hi I hope you don t mind me leaving this long paragraph but My account uglyclit was disabled , the reports made towards my account were fake and this is probably just a bug. this is a mistake and I would appreciate it if you restored my account as soon as possible I use my account simply to communicate with my family since It's my only access to them. Please help me , it's been months since I've spoken with my relatives and I'm concerned for the their safety... I am poor and I need Instagram for communication U f u d , ' MoreThanMe ', 'Looks like Porto ', viralswtf the accounts name was uglyclit, you somehow thought that wouldn't get banned , 'lovely post ', ' ', ' nicole PLEASE CHECK MY DM', 'I love Porto Brough back some wine for my coworkers ', 'Beautiful Oporto great to know you were in Portugal', 'Amazing ', 'So pretty ', 'Is that Zurich ', 'Porto ', 'Amazing', 'Oporto', And you're port tasting if you're on that side of the river - , 'Beautiful ', 'I love how she came with the refrigerator intro, made me think she was going the funny route then hit me with the real Appreciation ', 'So amazing', 'Gives me chills', ' same. I got goosebumps', ' sierragilbert ', 'Amazing ', 'This hit hard. Guess where my dad lives now....', ' dangerouslyinchub I love your shirt ', ' ', ' ', 'Wow. ', 'Powerful. So many girls women make catastrophic choices because of heart-shaped holes left by absentee fathers...', ' agotavera ', I'm so speechless. , ' snap snap snap', ' butchoii', ' ms.brandi.may', ' chibijoule hats off ', ' brettmakenzie This hits me so harddddd oh my goodnesssss I need this book ', ' thatlaurynchick I know what to get you for you birthday ', 'Er, thanks', ' iesha palelei', 'OMG didnt know one of my fave poets has instagram. Rachel, if you read this, I love you ', ' erinraif', ' agvd', ' annamincham this is GRAND', ' ', ' rebeccaruvinova', ' anniekitchin', ' rachie.roo. ', ' msbritward', 'HAHHAHAHAHHA', 'This sounds like a rap honestly for some reason', ' krabbykasey lmao ', 'Amazing', 'BIG MOOD ', ' gajeweler shazangie', 'Dr Seuss ', ' mo money mocek', ' dbillion air hahahaha', 'I got it yesterday in the mail I m super excited to read it ', 'Congratulations On my way to order dangerouslyinchub ', ' congrats on your release day ', 'Woohoo congratulations ', 'Congrats bb', 'Ahhh congrats dangerouslyinchub My copy is in the mail ', 'Mmmm, I am so thankful I can say this honestly too.', ' liv.driver just a reminder to love yourself today ', 'Woof that s visceral', ' reg milner love you angel', ' bobbyboxhead think about this', ' U f a U f a U f a U f a U f a ', 'The plot twist has me thinking parnika ', 'That was brilliant ', ' carls wolfstsr vibes', 'Howly shit. Relevant.', ' n.naik ', ' saucy.gaylord you should write a fan fic based off of this', ' carls i got you', ' emvanderkolk a mf werewolf', 'damn ', ' vanizzle ', ' juheeanderson just though you would love this like me ', ' U f a ', ' ', ' annikajuliaczuday', ' supreme freak this is me in a way...', 'she is bright and beautiful we accept the love we think we deserve, and if you are not ready.. don t you dare crumble her thunder.', ' ', ' bexmader', 'Nice one here... Check my writings on iamkoloku ', ' king.rambutan', ' tuxy narwhal', 'Ooo kill em', 'Wow zainab.albad', ' zahzalbadri UMMMM', ' agynesspa', ' hush tahhh omfg', ' jess scrawls it s really good.', ' hush tahhh it issssss', Wish I would've kept my eyes closed , ' g cooncoon i love this', ' ravenk ll I love this guy', ' amanda detrich I love him so much and I need his book ', 'Got chills, he s so good', 'Chills lightninjoebazooka', Don't let the Tories take away our NHS. Jc pm , ' artsy ana ', This is magical, moving, chilling, thrilling, hauntingly beautiful in all if it's sadness and truth. Thank God for poets , 'this poem hit me so hard', 'This one always feels like a punch in the chest. Neil is so fantastic', 'Missed this on Saturday night amazing, this gives me chills everytime neilhilbornn', ' samjeantell omg same', ' ', 'Woah... dauminator ', ' cassie ejames get ready', 'love this ', ' ishmaelerinlasha', 'Chills ', ' cleo tishler', ' dundee dude crazy', ' ', 'I n e e d t h I s i n m y l I f e', Just preordered. I've been waiting for this book for a while , 'Eeee dangerouslyinchub I can t wait for your book to come I m so excited and happy for you ', 'Yessssssss', 'Omg, seriously a bargain for the emotions these books bring ', ' otoko.tani from gymmemewear U f ', ' pmak ', ' joc.fit yessss ', ' vir jin yuh aw, thank you so so much ', ' stunnacoke everyone like it that way So it s my pleasure ', ' kimblelinah ', ' train.with.sevada ', ' rachel fit it s from gymmemewear', ' luvxdani thanks ', ' georgiajohnsonpersonaltraining thank youuuu ', ' nicole foodiefitness thanks ', ' bokchla haha One of my favorites ', ' fit.with.iulia thankyou xx', ' kasszuniga yaaaassss ', ' ciciray the last one is the one we should try ', 'Love your crop tops ', 'Hey I have a question, what will happen if I train my inner thighs like are they going to grow or ', ' juliiia na klaroooooo ', 'Where is this shirt from ', 'Great U f u d ', ' charli ', ' iamjordanmclean that first would be actual impossible for me', 'Front squats for the win', ' princesscleoo kasi jessel first videos she s literally sitting on a chair that isnt there', ' fitnesssbymalin I m trying to train heavy all the time. I pulled my hamstring, so now I m doing lighter ', ' allygarand yeaaaap ', ' harri ', ' locitanicole yes, glutes with hamstrings', ' chel fit yessss', ' rhiannonbananan and dis', 'Saving this for next leg day ', 'Youre so strong yess girl ', 'Slaying as always ', ' solcb ', ' anieaomg Gracias, qu amable eres', 'Hello everyone,if you guys need extra motivation about workout or gym you can visit my motivation quotes page dreamfitlovefat', 'Where can I get this shirt ', ' chloeemclean', ' ', ' thehannahhughes Han I m trying this one out at the gym on Friday, you should try some of them too ', Thank you for posting these They've helped me add so many things to each of my routines , 'Cute top n cutie you ', 'Watch the last workout video you proper smashed that', ' nallh ', 'Looking amazing girl ', 'Always so gorgeous', 'Love these outfits ', 'Babe ', 'Dream', 'In love with this outfit ', 'your STUFF NEVER SHOWS UP IN MY FEED', 'BUT UR SO CUTE I LOVE U AND UR PINK HAIR', 'U look like ur doing great', 'Grrrr ... U f ', 'I wanna eat you lookin like a whole snack and what not ', 'Snack', 'You look so bomb babe', 'Can u do exercises to target a bigger rounder bum x', ' ', 'Hermosa mujer', 'Like your wrist wraps. Need a pair, but can t find a pair i like. Like yours What brand ', ' kare ahh push ups', ' nabilla Hhhh Wlahilaa ', 'Killer Barbie', ' trendingtrell you should I do it once a week ', ' gracielabartoli absolutely ', ' a.l.e.x.a r.a.e you are very welcome ', ' aimmcken brand is Bear Grips and I got them on Amazon ', ' workout unicorn ', ' stasnewuser oh duh lol thanks ', ' kare ahh just focus on hand placement. There are so many different push ups variations you can do.', ' ', ' fit.with.iulia alright, thank you ', ' meagan.parker', ' didytarin', ' its gonzales this what we need to do', ' ', ' debberz ', ' catherineleadavis', 'Gracias ', 'Love ure page its helped me so much do u take pre and post workout shakes, bcaas or anything like that ', ' alondra ceballos', ' hannarebol let s do this ', 'Can t wait to get back in the gym def trying this', ' ccelin.ee me likey', ' dcr don t look for comfort. Yes, it might not be comfortable at first, but once you go there for a while - you ll get more experienced and confident. Iulia was super shy at first few years ago when she started . Do you feel comfortable at your first few job interviews Probably not until th or th, when you feel confident. Same here. The question is - how bad do you want it If gym is what you need - you will go there no matter how uncomfortable you feel. Imho', ' theofficial ortiz', ' fit.with.iulia Finished this just now So addicted to your workouts ', 'Oh yes girlfitjournal this is a good one u d ', ' danifinkle sundayssssss', ' lexmijares', 'The best workouts ', ' ronn d love all these', stasnewuser you're very right Also, I find most people at the gym are just focused on themselves. I work in a gym and often when I'm doing rounds , people don't even notice me cleaning or checking machines because they are too focused on their workout. Most people don't even notice others. Its not selfish, I think when you're starting out you're overly cautious. In time, it gets better , 'نفس اسلم جسم وتضبط نه ل صح ', ' emreturk I can do my fave tricep exercise without that machine ', ' kristinesanchez skyismylimit tonight ', 'Love that top', 'Awesome ', ' ', 'Hairs looking so nice ', ' josemud', ' ', 'Love your page ', 'Your cameo top is cool ', Great workout I see alot of guys and only one other girl in your video. This is why I don't go to the gym - I don't feel comfortable. Seems like gyms are just for guys I know they're not though , When you pull it up, why do you bend your knees a bit I'm just really curious about it, i see most people do this. , 'Nvm i googled', ' mrosepnw maybe we could try this since we can t do assisted pull ups ', ' acceptingimperfection I m saving this we should do this next arm day ', 'Love your Hair and Style ', 'That hoodie ', ' victorfrimurer det andet fungerer jo ikke, s r ', ' isma mahmood U f ', 'Sooo Perfect ', 'Nice', ',', ' kirsten calitz', ' kmosstheboss', ' ', 'Cutie ', 'Beauty ', 'Sweetheart ', ' ', 'love the pants fit', 'Sweet', 'Pink everything U look great', ' ', ' ', ' you rock this color.', 'I m obsessed w the pink hair ', ' ', 'I love love your pink hair ', 'omg nooooo don t make me want pink hair again U f ', ' richa fitmom hehe Thank youuuu ', 'Nice ', 'What color are your leggings You look so pretty ', 'YOU ARE FLAWLESS', 'Beautiful', dee koen let's do it , 'I did this today I kill it nadineperez ', jojosocal I'm mesmerized by her shoes I can't focus on the work out , ' faviiestradaa', 'This looks fire ', ' csipkar', ' nmilyz', ' sarahoosteromm dniies paar varianten erbij ', ' courtney.kindred', ' rrissacakess', ' rudi m', ' fabien oooh wauw U f d U f d ', ' fabien je bent niet goed ', 'I tried these today and it was absolute killer ', ' aracely garciaa ', ' garciacynthia this looks fun ', ' aracely garciaa i knew you would think that ', 'Beast', 'I did yesterday and it was killer. I love abs workout ', ' s lancia', 'Last one scares me ', 'Gorgeous Love it ', ' crhismoru uff de esto hablo', ' julitamolano no lo haz hecho pa tu pr ximo intento te lo pongo ', 'Wow You are very beautiful.. I like to meet you', 'I put weighs on this machine , Is it right or not ', ' alexia kmz ', ' nato s scroll through single leg press', 'I wanna dye my hair now.', .snowbunny you're gonna hate me tooooodddaaaayyyyyyy , ' shaggi noehmer', 'Can you put up a workout for this with reps sets and weights That would be awesome thanks ', ' shellbbyy ', 'Wow great leg routine my favorite exercise leg press', ' envynatty ', 'Perfect shoes for training i guess ', ' faviiestradaa', 'Loveee the leg press machine ', 'Did this workout today and loved it ', ' rhubynaiad ma ana ', ' mazambelli ne ', ' nanoussa ', ' sina die bung im . Video wollte ich eigentlich mit dir machen ', 'This Pullover. ', ' naadfad h tte wahrscheinlich besser geklappt als mit dem kettleball ', ' sina das denke ich auch probieren wir n chstes mal aus, wenn Beine anstehen ', ' dalejai', ' ', 'Yas', ' martaagijon', ' stevierocket', ' nuur melek', 'Keep it up ', 'Love these babe keep killing it', 'Completed Legs feel like jelly ', ' zachvank think i found what you re looking for', ' hugo ', ' yaniracalderon ', ' livscragg', ' lisashleyb maravdveen laurajosinee deze heeft echt veel goede oefeningen ', 'So freaking gorgeous ', 'Can I have ur biceps tho ', 'Beauty wich size is your legging ', 'Omg you are goals ', ' rosalie publicmyth ', ' buff cat pete thanks ', ' alinakordysh ', ' apkfitpoet ', ' yonel or thank you girl you can look however you want Just keep working hard ', ' victoriamarks thank you very much ', ' nourkhaledx omg, thanks girl ', ' ladyfit thank you babe ', ' zanelliserena hahah Yes, you will ', ' janyydiaz thank you so much beauty ', ' brittanycatesfitness thanks babe ', ' workout unicorn hah, sure ', ' mathildepaillault XS ', ' ms ugogo ', ' CHECK YOUR DM s ', 'Love that color blue on you ', 'Did you do loveline ', 'Yay', 'How awesome nataliejillfit Love dr drew ', 'Wait, I thought that was just a hashtag from weatherford swolepatrol', 'What did you talk about ', ' ', 'Original feed I like to keep an eye on. Check my own feed.', 'Dr Drew s work really helped me straighten my life out in college. He s a good man and an excellent therapist.', 'Your page is amazing Lets network sometime ', I'm your age, and resonate with your message. Thank you for sharing. , 'You inspire me Thank you ', 'Cute', 'Amen sister ', 'I m almost . Now I feel like I better go work out and keep moving. Thank you ', 'Love your girly outfit ', 'Killing that outfit. ', 'Haha and now you could easily knock out a few teeth out with a punch If anyone insults you please Instagram the results ', 'Omg are you in nj ', 'Ummm... SISTER. THIS. IS. STELLAR. rockstarstatus ', ' negra no but my name is NatalieJill NJ lol', ' mrsb thank you ', 'You look amazing ', 'Love your truth and transparency, Jill Amen to it all ', 'I am the same as you. Thank you for that post. I grew up not being comfortable crying and having to be tough and self reliant. Now my motto for my kids are be authentic for who you are. No such thing as masculine or feminine for boys or girls. Just be YOU ', 'Amen NJ ', 'Thank you for your girly girly side sharing yourself with this world I was just laid off from a high paying Corp job of yrs I hated but stayed for it s what I knew. It was a boys club My ego is bruised but please know YOUR testimony about leaving that Corp world finding no your passion....well...you have no idea the inspiration you provide to this woman I too was a single mom for years an now sending my amazing son off to college am happily married to his step dad What blessings know your vulnerability sharing your journey being authentic has touched my heart soul motivates me Sends msg much love gratitude your way if you get to Dallas...let me know dear friend ', 'I absolutely love this', 'Interesting posts ', 'My experience was so different.', 'Thanks We should be comfortable being ourselves - female Without putting down men.', 'hyfrrrr', 'Cute outfit ', 'Muy femenino , bien ahi , hermosa', 'Wow very nice champ', 'Girly, lol, when it comes to training of the men out there could not keep up with your workout, or your strict clean eating habits. You inspire more people than you can ever imagine. You have kept you femininity even while packing on quality muscle', 'You look like a doll ', 'Love this ', Thanks for sharing We're all human and continue to learn and grow as we go through life. All the best ma'am , 'Great outfit So chic ', ' ', ' alex twinz', 'Fantastic job', 'I cant believe you re You look great ', 'Impactful beauty... in written words and as a person. Thank you for sharing.', Good for you. Stand up for yourself, no matter your gender. Thanks for sharing. Once we're living, we can always learn something. It's never too late. , 'As women, we should all be striving to be more in touch with the divine, feminine beings we are.', 'I am - same experience ', 'I love it You look adorable ', ' ', 'Wonderful Fit Exercise ', 'I need to look like you. Never too late, right ', 'Love those pants, where are they from ', 'Crushing it Such a great move to start the day. ', ' styleoffitdana never too late ', ' nataliejillfit AMAZING body.', 'Awesome', ' ', 'Love your posts Where do you buy your workout gear ', 'Love this sister. ', ' alissaseiter', 'Omg ', 'Que cuerpo que agilidad. Que linda te ves ', ' mutiamayangs', 'OMG GOOD ONES ', ' carypwade looks like power vinyasa ', ' katejaq Power Vinyasa misses you ', ' wenzinheels', 'Yes girl All of that ', ' ', 'I love this I feel the same. It applies with parenting, marriage, business, life, and so much more ', 'LOVE THIS So TRUE ', 'Beautiful', 'Ur always so happy ', 'Awesome outfit ', 'Beautiful ', 'Thx i need to hear this today', 'Great caption ', ' ', You're absolutely right , 'Damn straight ', You're the best , This is so true and I think people don't think about this enough. Even if you're victim of trauma or circumstance or anything else there's no f excuse you have to get after it. Thank you for sharing this made my day , ' bald mexican right ', ' janineyankley me too ', ' wellfitmommy yeah exactly it applies to literally everything that happens in your life', ' angelafitc you feeling like you can crush it too ', 'Great ', ' ', 'YES Muscles are awesome ', You're awesome , 'Yes ', 'Hermosa ', 'Gorgeous ', ' yes ', 'So true ', 'You are an inspirational person thank you for being a strong representation of a woman ', 'Perfect ', 'Please make more DVD s ', ' alivia.mariee', ' aharm do you have all four of mine New one with prevention coming this summer ', 'I agree with you percent Natalie....Healthy and stronger ', 'What programs do you have ', ' carrieneelycoke hi A lot www.nataliejillfitness.com programs you can view them all', ' nataliejillfit thank you', 'Just finished Day One of Stronger and it kicked my butt And I am in pretty good shape coming off of having done your Super Shred program for the umpteenth time - my fav . Excited and nervous to see what the other days in the program will bring ', 'I love this message ', 'Perfect U ', 'Well said.', 'STRONGER strongisbeautiful', 'Yes Love this ', 'You are sooooo BEAUTIFUL ', 'Gorgeous nataliejillfit', ' stephl mack', 'Gorgeous nataliejillfit', 'Love this ', 'Beautiful Photo ', ' ', ' ', ' ', ' ', That's the beauty of being an entrpreneur. , 'Oh, excellent thoughts Natalie. I m learning this too ', 'Excellent questions, Jill Thank you for keeping it real. ', 'Whoa Love this ... and love that you are in my city ', 'Great working with you ', 'Cool', ' nataliejillfit your an inspiration every day ', 'The many hats of us super women ', nataliejillfit you inspire so many Looks like you weren't too far. Only min from Philly , 'Thank you for inspiring me every day ', 'Love this ', 'Looking HAAWWWTTTT ', 'You re in my city Where nataliejillfit', 'Ay dame.... ', 'FitnessMotivation UP Japan ', ' nataliejillfit forever young and beautiful Natalie i wish you could share what you eat on a daily basis Thank you ', ' nataliejillfit thank you for sharing this. You motivate me ', You look beautiful. I've been following you for years. Youthful and more gorgeous than ever , 'Thank you for being an awesome inspiration to all of us ... What tips can you give that will help me make my core more defined I am in the beginning of menopause and have always had a pack but now struggling with a little bit of extra fat ', ' nataliejillfit', ' ', 'You re goals ', 'Can t wait to start Stronger ', 'Love this ', 'My favorite fitness person in phila woo hoo', 'Thank you for the love friendship you extend to each of us ', 'Believe is the hard part', ' The struggle lies between our ears is such a great quote I am with you percent on this post. ', 'Awesomeness ', ' nataliejillfit needed to hear all of this. Thank you lady ', 'Beautiful ', ' nataliejillfit so happy for you and thank you for all your inspiration ', ' ', 'How amazing and inspirational to me and others ', 'LOVE You look incredible here and always . Had so much fun with you this week ', 'Congrats Love you ', 'Great congrats ', ' this ', 'Natalie you inspire me You look amazing ', ' amiraharveyy hi gorgeous Love following your IG I will never forget meeting you at my book launch. Hope you will remember us little people when you are famous ', ' ', ' nataliejillfit Thanks so much We made some fun Snapchat memories I could never forget you because we constantly are making your amazing recipes You are always with me ', 'You got all the right moves ', ' koyawebb prob learned from my model friend YOU', ' nataliejillfit looking great ', 'It was great working with you this week Amazing job ', 'I never know what to do with my body in pictures. I m always the awkward one in group photos. Haha.', 'Feliz dia ', ' ', 'I need video to lose bely pleas', 'My favorite, as always ', 'Do they ship to Australia ', 'I need your abs ', 'Where did you get your leggings please ', ' daniellec we need one of theses ', ' suzieparkerjones yes we do have a distributor there Will DM you ', ' kimberbennett daniellec yessss ', 'Esta bueno meraz m ', 'Keep up the good work and dedication', ' ', 'I need that bar', 'I got some for Christmas.... need to get them out of the box and use them', 'I need one of these ', ' ', 'Me too I need one ', ' claudiaj yessss nataliejillfit has a link in her bio Enjoy ', ' koyawebb yes you will love them Especially in the nataliejillfit Rose Gold ', ' hazellabbe yessss you do Let s see ', ' rlnv see above nataliejillfit has a link in her bio Enjoy ', 'Sooooo beautiful and gorg nataliejillfit ', 'Da best. Evahhh.', 'Cute', 'Hey girl welcome east what r you filming Where you staying', ' the sneakers but only see them with the blk red...your looks all blk ', 'Love ur dog What breed ', 'Very cool Good luck Safe travels ', 'Yes, they know. Always.', 'Bella', 'Where on the east coast Bring boots and warm clothes ', 'Why is the pop socket so high up on the phone ', 'Que perro mas bonito ', 'Yes, as soon as she hears the suitcase roll ', 'I m dying for the UA solid black, can t find them anywhere ', 'Awwww. I love this pic of you guys ', It's not easy U f , 'Cute dog ', ' ', 'Question on pg of your book how do I cook the olives for the bruschetta chicken Thank you ', ' drjamiesarra hi Jamie ', 'How often do you workout ', 'Which ones are you wearing ', 'Flops Lol', 'Is he a labradoodle Mine that is a labradoodle always knows .. their ability to pick up o energy is unbelievable', 'Have a great week of filming Look forward to hearing more about your exciting venture. ', 'Yes they do Even the cats do ', 'Love the outfit, the black is so nice and bold Who makes ', 'Stay warm ', ' mandylorrainecook how do you know that for sure ', 'My dog and of cats know when I m going to leave....and these do NOT like it ', 'Nice ', 'Does anyone know if this is a Labradoodle ', ' kinyacoleman No, it is a goldendoodle.', 'Yes, he knows I have two they get sad and are like my shadow since they see my luggage.', ' gerrdian thank you, such a beautiful dog ', ' gerrdian also, can you tell me the difference in terms of temperament, shedding, and coat. I like a more wavy coat, and I never know the difference between the goldendoodle and the Labradoodle, thanks.', 'What s up Nat What kind of sneakers are those ', ' kinyacoleman yeah I don t know lol I d check with he breakers I only have mine so I cant compare', ' ', 'Woot woot ', 'Love this ', 'So great', 'Congrats brother ', 'Hell yeah U f a ', ' matmillerstrong thanks dude', ' natashainca ', ' chrisdufey thanks bro', 'Hell yeah brother Love this', ' heartbeatstrength ', ' YOU NEED A DOPE PICTURE OF YOURSELF TOON, LOGOS,FLYERS, MIX TAPE COVER... ', ' coffee', That's a good blue on you. , ' ', ' atlas athelas ', ' coffee', ' lilgilby thank you ', ' nininhajanaina ', ' vonrothfelder got your back ', 'nice ', ' ', ' theprepcook ', ' ', ' you go Adam beastmode earnyourday ', ' smith.carrieann earntheday', ' alexazav ', 'Dang auto correct lol I meant Earntheday sorry about that. Love that saying you came up with years ago. I use it ever time I have a great workout ', ' smith.carrieann still use it I m actually writing a book ', 'That is great I will be buying one win it comes out. That is awesome and yes, I will always use the term. May God keep blessing you Adam and your family. Arcella, your mom , and those adorable kids and your mom. Y all deserve it all and thank you for showing us how we can use our environment to exercise and eat right YouGoAdam Greatrolemodel for us all ', 'Yes, Love this ', ' ', ' motivation success inspiration business lifestyle goals love life successful entrepreneurship instagood money happy marketing entrepreneurs hustle motivational happiness inspire', Wait wait wait. You can't walk away... but there's no looking back What's the point of looking back if you aren't waking away Shouldn't coffee be one of those hashtags I'm so baffled , ' atlas athelas coffee happy now', vonrothfelder no. I'm never happy. It's my curse. Congratulations on the new company i hope it is successful and you take over the coffee world. neverstopneverstopping , ' ', ' viviannasmith are you ready for this U f f', 'You in San Diego ', ' mattyvee yes sir', ' vonrothfelder nice bro ', 'Great shot. ', ' theprepcook thank you ', 'Strong hoodie ', ' ', 'Where can I try it Any strong coffee is good coffee in my book ', ' melissa voyagis langham text me your address and I ll send you a sample pack ', ' vonrothfelder can you answer a DM message Thanks ', 'Need the hoodie and a sample pack vonrothfelder', ' vonrothfelder i can t wait to stalk the countdown time and be the first person to buy a bag U f u d ', ' laurieking in ', ' e money both available this Friday', ' ', ' love the end ', ' bbsayss', 'You two are ', ' ', 'Love Coffee', ' beautiful happy life fashion lifestyle picoftheday motivation inspiration style cute beauty fun smile amazing instadaily art happiness girl nature pretty fitness healthy summer success travel goals entrepreneur family landscape fitfam', ' alibambam ', 'Happy betrothal anniversary, you two. May you enjoy many more years together. U f U f a U f a ', 'Happy Anniversary, you two U f many more to come And God Blessed y all with two beautiful kids u d u d u d and good health ', 'Great shirts happy anniversary ', 'I love you guys U f e ', ' motivation lifestyle healthy workout training inspiration exercise health fitfam fit venicebeach fitnessmotivation fitness muscle gymlife getfit fitnessaddict gym instafit fitspo', That is one of the hottest things I've ever seen , 'Beastmode ', 'How much is this bro ', 'Nice ', ' andy raab u d ', ' theprepcook I think it was only degrees out. I ve seen hotter ', ' chance irons it s only lightweight', 'Love yes vonrothfelder', vonrothfelder I live in the south I've seen hotter temps too. You know what I meant , 'Always inspired', Nice Great to meet you yesterday It's sarah , ' honeylb working on my glute gains ', ' unnyoga pleasure let s move together soon', ' jmani thanks bro', 'Too bad we just met that day Adam, next time we should make a video together in north ', ' moe.aljuboori any time bro', ' beautiful nature outdoors travel landscape photooftheday instagood sky love picoftheday strongcoffee amazing explore naturelovers life summer sun vacation travelgram water strong coffee strongcoffeecompany', 'After a strong coffee a hiking tour ', 'A friend s birthday party. And also leg day at the gym today. Haha. ', ' ', ' andy raab U f d u d ', ' desmonheck u d u d ', ' U f a ', ' ', ' ', ' theprepcook ', ' fitness workout motivation training fitfam gym fit healthy gymlife strength HashmeApp instafit fitspo muscle bodybuilding strong health exercise fitnessaddict gains', 'Adam in beastmode you go Adam U f ', ' smith.carrieann it don t happen often but when it does U f d', ' ', ' andersvarner for those about to rock', 'But First Coffee ', 'You are on Barbell Shrugged Amazing Those dudes are badasses.', ' jonas.el.ray yes we are ', vonrothfelder , You're A Beast Handsome cut one, but A Beast nonetheless U f a U f a , ' ', 'Really want to visit ', ' joshua.colea do it ', ' alexazav ', ' pennyboo ', 'Small world Tell the crew hi for me I worked with Barbell Biz before they broke it off', ' bcftyler did you use there auto mail system', ' vonrothfelder I worked with them as a business coach consultant. I work for the now spin off company', ' bcftyler good for you hope mke is well with you', ' vonrothfelder thanks bro. Hope all is well in Cali', ' vonrothfelder ', ' ', ' ', 'So stoked for you brotha. Excited to see all your hard work pay off.', ' caseypatt it s about to go down for the both of us in a big way Can t wait to Earn The Day with you bro ', ' brigettebreit thank you always for all your early support. You are a true OG', ' ', ' vonrothfelder fan life', 'Beautiful muscle gains ', ' ooohbabybeast Of all the fitness that is around here by the instagram you are the most beautiful and most feminine.', 'Hi', 'Bad as fuk your killing it', 'Driven strong women ', 'I love u', 'Lovely', ' arturo jr ', ' ', 'Butiful and looking good ', 'TOOOPPP ', 'Woow ', 'Sup baby ooohbabybeast sup huh', 'How are you second ', 'Do you ever think about me U f a', ' ', 'Souiras sorosuqeosar ', 'motivation pur ', 'Need more motivation follow FITNESS HOV', ' ', 'Stunning', ' fitbydamian', 'Ilove you', 'Beautiful and sexy', 'how to vote mil times', 'Amazing Philippine lady ', 'vote ', 'I see you all the time and I just wanted you to follow me back when you can.', ' ', ' ', 'Sexy', ' BODY GOALS', ' ooohbabybeast So Sexy and fit ', 'Wonderful', 'amaziNG ', 'Why are you always doing these pictures in your bathroom ', ' ', If she's looking for a BF im right here , 'Pra que isso ', ' felipe.hernandez. con ese peso te lastimaste jajaja', ' looking good ', 'Nice hard workout, pride and joy', 'Sohni jehi na howe te meri guggi muggi ', 'Lift the world.', 'Sexy fit queen', 'Is that a stepping stone to become a strongest human ', Anyway, you're such a strong one. , 'How did you come about learning how to do handstands ', 'Animal of a woman.', After watching juju's videos everyone else's seem kinda bland , 'Your still a beast though', You're amazing powerful woman.... Keep it up , ' ', 'amaziNG', ' ', 'Ich habe meine Traumfrau gefunden beautiful and lifts heavy ass weights', ' ooohbabybeast dang.', 'Your gorgeous. That sports bra looks good on you. ', ' ', 'Wow, still killin it sweetheart Awesome ', 'You Bot', ' wanessa.leonel ela a menina que falei , que acho muito top', ' julianaayshat top top ', ' ooohbabybeast the worlds cutest ', 'You are amazing my model u d ', 'Hotty ', 'Awesome work ooohbabybeast. Great to hear that you love our bra ', 'Keep up the hard work ', 'Te am ', 'Que tesa', 'I think I love everything you wear ', 'Wow great workout You did well to power through those lifts ', 'This is what being a true Wonderwoman is all about ', 'Beautiful', 'Gorgeous', ' ', Wow that's a beautiful body you have there , 'Going live at www.twitch.tv BlackRifleGaming', ' ', 'I like your tongue', 'Show us those titties then we ll vote', ' ', 'Cosa m s hermosa ', 'Love you in those panties ', 'Te am ', 'you definitely have my vote ', 'My love ', 'Chocolatte bar', ' ', 'Cuanta carne i yo chimuelo', 'When Kayli-chan got a bulk muscles.', 'gorgeous ...', ' ooohbabybeast nope this is just fine', 'Nice baby ooohbabybeast', 'Nice', 'Looking amazing as always U f a ooohbabybeast', 'Wow', 'You look so beautiful ', ' ', ' ', 'Amazing as always ooohbabybeast U f a ', ' ', ' ', 'Beautiful', 'U look hotter than before.... ', 'Nice ass sexy body your a treat for the eyes', ' ', 'Amazing physique ', 'Perfect ', 'Nice ass', 'So beautiful', 'Hey hi', ' sunlightoffici ', 'Geeze louise', 'me encantan esos pezones que ricoo', ' ooohbabybeast you are stunning girlfriendgoals', 'Your Exquisite ......', 'Wow perfect', Oh girl you're tooo fine , 'Cute', 'Tu es linda', ' ', ' ', ' U f U f ', 'Nice boobs', 'Love your nipples freethenipple', ' ', ' wrestl ', 'Yum', ' lawsonn ', 'Ummm damn. Where have u been all my life', ' malbin ', 'Damn', 'Abs of steel ', I love the confidence you convey It's really good stuff , 'Perfect...', 'Amazing body ', 'You are super hot ', ' Keep rocking it girl ', 'Kereen bgt peruutt nya. . . ', ' jmarino perv', 'U look so beautiful and so sexy and so hot u got nice I bet u got a nice tight butt', ' mpolo Hahaha, it takes one to know one...', 'Show some ass', 'Oh god baby I see nips ', 'Hi Sexy', ' ', 'Mmmm hot ', 'Yyeessss. Me encanta. Hi. ', ' ', 'But wheres that ladder always goin to ', ' ooohbabybeast wow Bad Ass form Just like a Plank on those push ups and ring rows Amazing Pullin some weight on those deads But wear your belt Keep that shit going ', ' U f aloha', ' ', You're a sweet strong women, you rock , 'I Saw u first time year ago on YouTube and i can see changes, u look so much better now', 'Looking so beautiful', 'Well it was good practice for . ', 'Purple is your color', 'Good work out...Looking good', 'Where s that ladder in the background lead to ', ' ooohbabybeast feed to find me a woman who does perfect pushups and everything else perfectly, like you. U f ', 'Waoow ', 'Purple looks good on you', 'Amazing sweetheart Are you having issues with you right leg ', 'I wonder why you need so much strength ', ' I am machine, i never sleep... ', ' ', 'Good one ooohbabybeast pull up is hard huh', ' ', 'Omg that stomach is goals ', 'Your so beautiful ', 'Mind blowing fitness', 'So So Cute. You are just adorable ooohbabybeast ', 'Those abs are made of steel Great work ', ' needanewbackdrop', 'It s actually messed up, she s like a and a half. .', 'Beautiful and very hot', 'Bf or husband mast be very prowd of you....', 'HERMOSA', 'Preciosa se orita', 'Beautiful girl U f e U f e U f e ', 'Delicia ', 'Yes please ', 'Amazing ', ' ', 'You some Barbie baby ', 'Very Appealing', ' ', 'W W', 'Nice legs ', ' ', ' paonunezygalvan', 'What are you listening to I lile it', 'I like it ', 'Sexy sexy sexy', 'Hurra', Hey what's the name of that music song ooohbabybeast , 'I bet you look good on the dancefloor', ' ooohbabybeast perfect form ', 'That ASS ', 'Never did a pistol before. Learned I should probably practice in private before throwing it in my workout...', 'Awesome ', 'You have the perfect body. Seriously, goals.', ' ooohbabybeast is that ladder not part of some step exercise ', 'You are amazing ', 'I love your assets', 'Linda', ' . SUCKED.. but completed in .. how did you do ', 'Beautiful', 'Beast', 'Nice workout harder and painful. Can u do an after and before when you start this program', 'Absolute Fuckn weapon.... ', 'You inspire ', 'Very hard worker.', 'You are so incredible person', 'Cross fit game prep ', 'Absolutely Beautiful just breathtaking', ' ', 'Looking beautiful ', ' ', 'You put in so much work and it shows, sexy af ', 'Nice workout', 'Contact stphorm andyfrisella be a stphormathlete', 'Que fuerte eres muy hermosa sexy sos', 'Beast mode Keep on keeping on ooohbabybeast', ' ', ' ', 'Damn... you are fkn healthy.', 'Always looking trim ooohbabybeast', ' ', 'You such babe', ' amezing.. ', 'Wow ', 'You have a killer body super sexy in every picture you take love your picture you are always amazing and awesome and incredible person too. . . . .', ' ohbabybeast ', 'Oh my Jesus ', ' ', 'You are literally unique. No one looks like you ', 'Always gorgeous... Still, Let me do us all a solid and Amazon prime you a new shower curtain grl', 'One like her ', 'So freakin sexy.', ' ooohbabybeast ', ' u d ', ' acfitnessphotography', 'I want one', Wow You're so amazing , 'Beautiful', ooohbabybeast I don't know what to say because everyone else has already said it. But Powerful Love the picture , 'WOW very beautiful y Y hot baby ', ' sandra.gutierrezco sube as ', ' bastianx me falta el cuerpo', ' sandra.gutierrezco nah ya est s poca madre', ' bastianx jajaja nah', ' ', 'Hot ', 'Osm', 'Nice', ' namalu yes...agreed', 'Hi babybeast', 'Turn around ', ' ', ' You so beautiful', 'Babe ', 'Simply delightful, I d love to challenge you to an arm wrestle... ', Damn. That's no joke. , ' ', 'Wow Awesome I got scaled .... serious DOMS still though ', 'About to take flight ', 'great score ooohbabybeast, RX for me', gaelic chic that's awesome , ' wodphotography thanks ', ' chris the won ridiculous', 'Te Amo couch ', 'Excelente', 'Wooo', ' julianaayshat n is ', ' U f a ', 'You are goals ', simranbakshi I'm W ing Dear , ' ', ' ashleascott.fitness ', ' missbjoru ', ' ', 'Awesome ' 